                      - M.A.A.D.   P R E S E N T S -

                              ZOETHROPE
                        THE ANIMATION SYSTEM

                          TABLE OF CONTENTS

1   QUICK START
7   Getting Started

9   ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW
9   Getting the Basics Out of the Way
11  Playing an Animation
13  Automatic Animation
15  Doin' the APM
17  Put It All Together
19  Moving On

21  ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING
21  The Draw Menu
25  The Modes Menu
27  The Brush Menu
29  The Color Menu
34  Using Text
35  The Clip Menu
43  The Frame Menu
44  The Load/Save Menu

47  ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CEL ANIMATION
49  A Simple Animation
52  Blueing and Changes
59  Compositing
64  Tweening

67  ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X
68  Turns
70  Axis Operations
71  Center
72  Size
73  Move
74  The Path Options
75  First and Motion
76  Clip and Sequence

79  ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR V/X
79  Multiple Pallettes
81  Color f/x
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
98  ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X & MATTE
87  Pixel f/x
91  Matte

93  ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION
94  The Playback Bar
98  The Main Menu
98	Menu
98	  About ZOETROPE
98	  Time
102	  Load/Save
108	     The Zoetrope File Selector
111	  Matte
114	  Set Font
114	  Air Speed
115	  Status
115	  Pixel f/x
119	  APM f/x
128	  Kill Seq
128	  Pause
128	  Quit
128	Clip
129	  Cut
129	  Paste
130	  Paste Below
130	  Move
131	  Clip
131	  Rotate
133	  Stretch
135	  Invert
136	  Fit Colors
136	  Mask
137	Draw
137	  Draw
137	  Streak
137	  Stipple
138	  Airbrush
138	  Fill
138	  Line
138	  Polygon
139	  Circle
140	  Box
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
141	  Text
142	Modes
142	  Zoom
143	  Ping Pong
143	  Xray Copy
143	  Filled
144	  Distinct
144	  Connected
144	  Concentric
144	Frame
144	  Undo
145	  Restore
145	  Separate
145	  Separate Many
146	  Blue Pic
146	  Unblue Pic
146	  Next Blue
147	  History Pic
147	  Unhistory Pic
148	  Get Changes
148	  Next Changes
148	  Clear Pic
148	  Delete
149	  Flip 5
149	Brush
149	  Get Brush
150	  Use Clip
150	Color
151	  Cycle
152	  Palette
156	  Color f/x

  I	Appendix A: MEMORY CONSERVATION
III	Appendix B: ZOEPLAY & QUICKRIF
VII	Appendix C: FILE FORMATS & CONVERSIONS
 XI	Appendix D: SOFTWARE ETHICS
Bibliograhy
INDEX
page 1 -----------------------------------------------------
                       QUICK START

For the those adventurous souls who shun documentation, and want to
lunge blindly into their brand-new software, we present the 
ZOETROE Quick Start.  ZOETROE has far too many functions to 
learn in a coule of pages.  But we can give you a taste of its power.

The following instructions assume you've used plenty of Amiga
software and know what terms lick click, double-click, and drag mean.
We assume you've used menu bars, and you know what to do when you
see: "Choose Fill from the Draw menu."  But if you get lost, don't
worry about it.  ZOETROPE can be learned quickly and enjoyably by 
sitting down with the program and working your way through the
tutorials following this section.  You can always come back and visit
later on.

Decided to try this anyway?  Okay, make copies of both ZOETROPE
disks.  Now, place disk A (the main disk) in your drive, open its
window, and double-click on the ZOETROPE icon.  When the blank
screen comes up, replace ZOETROPE disk A with ZOETROPE disk B
(the data disk).

PREPARATION
Before plunging into the unknown, it's always a good idea to plan a
path of retreat.

The right mouse button (or [space bar]), will back up from where you
are.  It will also toggle between the full screen and the menu display.
You can only draw on the ZOETROPE screen when there are no menus
displayed.  If you try something and it doesn't work, click the right
mouse button and try it again.  If it still doesn't work - read the
documentation.
page 2 ------------------------------------------------

note: In the following Quick Start section, we won't tell you to 
right-click to exit the menus.  But if you have to be somewhere else
on screen, you may have to leave the menu you're in to get there.

* Exit ZOETROPE by selecting Quit from the Menu drop-down
* The [Help] key will undo mistakes
* If you get lost, here's how to clean up and return to default settings:

CLEAN-UP
1.  Select Kill Seq from Menu, and click on Yes.
2.  Select Time from Menu, click on To Frame, make sure Tween is
     highlighted.
3.  Select APM f/x from Menu, select Clear, click on Yes.
4.  Select Color f/x from Color, drag the line beneath the color squares
     so that it spans all the colors, click on (and highlight) f/x and
     Normal, then select Render.
5.  Select Load/Save from Menu, click on and highlight Normal and .rif.
6.  Deselect Ping ong in Modes menu (no asterick).

You could also accomplish all of the above by exiting to the
Workbench then restarting the program.  But then you would never
learn.

Again, the following instructions are bare-bone and assume you know
how to select an item from the menu bar, how to exit a submenu, and
how to activate the full screen when you want to draw (all done with 
the right mouse button).

TEXT & APM
You've just booted.  A blank screen with a cross-shape cursor appears.
* Select Set Font from Menu
* Click to select a nice fat font from the window. (Drag the slider bar
   at the left to view more fonts).
* Select Text from Draw Menu.
* Select red color from Color menu.
* From full screen, left-click to set cursor somewhere left of center.
* Type your name on screen (first name will do).
* Right click to exit text mode.
* Select a contrasting color from the Color menu.
* Select Pixel f/x from Menu.
* Select Edge In, the click on the black background.
* Select Clip from Clip menu.
* Select Clear ic from Frame menu.
page 3 -------------------------------------------------------

* Press [Return] twice (creates 21 frames).
* Select APM f/x from Menu.
* Click on lower-case 'f' at right until it is a red, lower-case 'a' (To All
   frames).
* Adjust the full Turns slide bar (the lower one) to read l.
* Click on Center, then Default.
* Click on Axis, drag the top bar to the right (100), second bar to the
   left (-100), third bar to the right (100).
* Click on Preview.
* Select Size and Scale, drag Enlarge bar to 50 (Scale reads 2.00).
* Click on Preview.
* Select Path, click on Samle Path, drag a squiggly line on screen.
   (Release button to comlete ath).
* Click on review.  Reeat Path, above, until you like it.
* Select Render, answer Yes (or press [Y]).
* Select ing Pong from Modes menu.
* Press [F8] to play the animation.

PIXEL F/X
* Use Clean Up sequence, above, to return ot default settings.
* Select Load/Save from menu.
* Click on Load, select the FOREMAN.RIF file from selector box.
* After the file loads, return to full screen, and press [F8] to play.
* Select Time from Menu, click and highlight To All.
* Select the green color from the Color menu (first column, second
   from bottom).
* Select ixel f/x from Menu, select Edge In, left-click in black
   background, answer Yes.
* Play animation: [F8].
* From Pixel f/x menu, select Outline, answer Yes, play animation.
* From Pixel f/x menu, select Rile.  Drag box 20 by 20 ppixels
   (ignore numbers in aprentheses), release button, answer yes, play
   animation.
* From ixel f/x menu, select Tile.  Drag the box around the man's
   head, answer Yes, play animation.
* Select Time from Menu, click and highlight To Frame. Press [F10]
   to move to last frame (#12).
* Select color f/x from Color menu. Drag both ends of the line under
   the color bars to encompass all colors.  Select Chrone, click on
   Render.
* Click on Fade, and highlight Blend.  Click on lower-case 'f' until it
   is a red 'a' (To All Frames).
* Click on Render, answer Yes, play animation.
page 4 ------------------------------------------------------

CRYSTALIZE
* Use Clean Up sequence to return to default settings.
* Press [Return] four times (41 frames).
* Turn off Filled in Modes menu (no asterick).
* Select color # 16 from Color menu (fifth down in the first column).
* Select Box in the Draw menu and draw a three-inch box in center of
   screen.
* Select color # 31 from Color menu (lower-right).
* Select the second brush on the top row of the Brush menu.
* Select Draw in Draw menu.  Click once in the center of the box to
   place a brush-shaped dot.
* Select Time from Menu, click to highlight To All.
* Select Pixel f/x from Menu, select Crystalize, answer Yes.
* Select Ping Pong in Modes menu.  Play the animation.

NOTE: One-megabyte machines may run out of memory using 
certain procedures.  Try booting your system with no disk in the 
external drive.  See Appendix A for memory saving tips.
------------page 5 & page 6 are examples of screens------------------
page 7 ------------------------------------------------

The ZOETROPE manual is divided into two main sections: Tutorial
and Reference.  The several tutorials in the first section provide hands-
on introductions to ZOETROPE's features; the Reference Section 
contains all ZOETROPE features organized by screen-menu location for
easy look-up.  At the end of the manual are several appendices covering 
miscellaneous information.

BEFORE YOU BEGIN, BACK UP YOUR DISKS!  Both ZOETROPE
disks may be copied using the disk copy procedure described in your
Amiga owner's manual.  Please back them up and store the originals in
a safe place.  Throughout the manual, when we refer to the 
ZOETROPE disks, we willbe referring to the back-up copies.

There may be one or more files on your disks titled README.  These
contain important information you should read before running any
program.

Your ZOETROPE package should contain two disks: ZOETROPE
Main (disk A), and ZOETROPE Data (disk B).

ZOETROPE Main contains the ZOETROPE program itself which is
the only file needed to operate ZOETROPE.  The remaining files and
directories contain utilities and fonts.  Any operable programs besides
ZOETROPE are described in the appendices at the end of this manual.

ZOETROPE Data (disk B) contains the data files used by the
ZOETROPE tutorial section plua additional graphics demos.

You may move all files from both disks into a hard disk if you have
one.  During the tutorials, we will refer to the disk containing the
tutorial files as the ZOETROPE data disk, or disk B.
page 8---------------------------------------------------

While your'e copying disks, we suggest formatting a couple of disks to
store your animation sequences.

Now, place your copy of ZOETROE in whichever drive you wish to 
run it from, open that drive's window, and double-click on the
ZOETROPE icon.

NOTE: ZOETROPE requires a minimum of one-megabyte of RAM,
and oerates in the Amiga low-resolution graphics mode.  If you
have a one-megabyte system, we recomend booting your system
without the external drive to save memory.
page 9 -------------------------------------------------------------
              ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

ZOETROPE is many programs in one, but it is essentially an
animation program.  It is also a delta-file editor, as well as a paint
program.  It's closest relatives may be found among the high-end
grahpics workstations that create many of the titling animations you
see on such programs as the TV news, or sports programs.  Depending
on what you want to ut into it, ZEOTROPE can be powerful,
complex, or very simple.  It's also a lot of fun.

This first tutorial will quickly introduce the heart of the ZOETROPE
system without getting bogged down in a lot of details.  The succeeding
tutorials are designed to lead you through every feature of ZOETROPE
until you feel comfortable and familiar with its functions.

NOTE:  The following section assumes a cleared ZOETROPE
system.  If you're coming here directly from the Quick Start section,
above, use the Clean-Up procedure, or reboot ZOETROPE.

GETTING THE BASICS OUT OF THE WAY

When you first enter ZOETROPE, a blank screen appears.  Move the
mouse and a hollow, white cross appears as your mouse cursor.

MOUSE RULES:
* The right mouse button is used to escape from where you are.
* The left mouse butotn is used for all else.

Naturally, there is an excetion to the first rule: The right mouse
button is also used to access the top menu bar.  Hold down the right
mouse button to display the menu bar, then run it over the various
titles to dislay their menus.  While still holding down the button,
place the cursor over the item you wish (a red box will outline it), then

page 10 -------------------------------------------------------------

release the right mouse button to select that item.  If you move the
mouse pointer away from the menu before releasing the button, no
action will be taken.

In this manual, when you see a hrase like "Select Circle from the
Draw menu", it means to use the above procedure to find the item 
labeled "Circle" in the menu titled "Draw", and select it by releasing the
right mouse button while "Circle" is outlined.

NOTE:  The letters you see to the right of the menu selections are
keyboard alternatives.  These can speed things considerablyonce
you get used to ZOETROPE, but to begin with, the handiest
keyboard alternatives are [Space Bar]=right mouse button,
[Help]=Undo, and [Esc]=Clear Pic.

Examples of Mouse Rule # 1: Click the right mouse button and a bar
appears at the bottom of the screen (the Playback Bar).  Right-click
again to 'escape' from this bar.  Using the procedure described above,
select Load/Save from the Menu.  After the Load/Save menu appears,
press the right mouse button to 'escape' from the Load/Save menu.

An example of Mouse Rule # 2:  Select Circle from the Draw menu,
place your mouse cursor in the center of the screen, hold down the left
mouse button, and move the mouse away from the center to create a
circle.  Release the button to leave the circle.  Select Undo from the
Frame menu to undo the circle. (Try drawing the circle with the
Playback Bar displayed.  Doesn't work.  Remember: You can only 
draw on a full screen with no menus displayed.
page 11 -------------------------------------
                   PLAYING AN ANIMATION

ZOETROPE animation files are called 'rif' files, after the rif delta file
format developed by author Jim Kent.  Select Load/Save from Menu.
There are five file types, indicated by their extender names, which are
directly accessible by ZOETROPE.  When you first access the 
Load/Save menu, the .rif extender is already highlighted.  To load a rif
file, click on Load.

NOTE:  Special file conversion utilities are included on your
ZOETROPE disk to convert animation files from other pgorams to
the rif format.  See Appendix C for details.

The ZOETROPE file selector appears, displaying a list of rif files from 
whichever disk or drawer you booted ZOETROPE.  We want to load an
animation called DINO.RIF, which is on Disk B of your ZOETROPE
disks.  If you have two disk drives and have placed Disk B in DF1:,
click in the DF1: box of the file selector to display the files on that
drive.  If youhave one disk drive, replace ZOETROPE Disk A with
ZOETROPE Disk B, then click on DF0: to relist the files on the new
disk. (Hard disk owners: the names of your first five hard disk
partitions will also appear in buttons on your file selector).

You can scoll u and down the list of files by clicking on the arrows
to the left of the file window, or by dragging the slider bar.  DINO.RIF
page 12 -------------------------------------

will be found inthe drawer labeled TUTORIALS.  Click on the drawer
name in the file window to list the files inside.

To load DINO.RIF, either left-clickon the file name then click on OK,
or double-click onthe file name.  An arrogant dragon will appear,
strolling in the center of your screen.  (Dino is a character from an
animation by Doug Thomas).  The animation will appear jerky because
ZOETROPE is displaying each frame as it is loaded from the disk.

Once the load is comleted, click the right mouse button to remove the
Load/Save menu.  You should now have a dragon on your screen, and
the Playback Bar at the bottom. (If the Playback Bar is not there, right-
click to make it appear).

The Playback Bar works a lot like a VCR controller.  right now, your
ZOETROPE screen is displaying frame # 1 (indicated by the slider bar),
out of a total of eight frames of naimation (as shown at the right of the
Playback Bar).  To play the DINO animation, click on the plain, right-
facing arrow (three boxes to the right of the slider bar).  Right-click to
halt the animation.

Select zoom in the Modes menu, place the box over the dragon and
left-click.  Now lay the animation.  Select Zoom again to return to a
normal screen.

You can try out all the other icons in the layback Bar but, for now, 
avoid clicking on the total-frames number (8), the 'f' to its right, and
the two 'non-arrow' icons that are two boxes to the right and to the left
of the slider bar.  If you accidentally click on these, you can restore the
original animation by simple reloading it.  But go ahead and try out the
other buttons.  They're all logical enough.  You can also move
anywhere in the animation by clicking within the slider bar, or dragging
the frame number in the slider bar.

Now let's try the boxes we avoided. (If you've already clicked on them
and altered the animation, now's the time to reload the original
DINO.RIF.

Move to frame # 5 of the animation, then click on the icon that's two
boxes ot the right of the slider bar.  The slider number becomes a six,
and the total frames number increases to nine.  The icon you just
page 13 ------------------------------------- 

clicked on inserts one copy of the displayed frame at that position in the
animation, and moves the slider bar to the right one frame.  Frames # 5
and # 6 are now idential copies.  Play back the animation and note the
hesitation caused by the duplicate frames.

To get rid of the extra frame, move to frame #6 or #6, select Delete
from the Frame menu, and click on Yes.  The duplicate frame is
removed, and the animation is back ot a smooth eight frames.

The icon two boxes left of the slider barr performs the identical function,
except that the slider bar moves to the left of the inserted frame.

How's your animation?  Still looking good?  If not, reload the original
DINO.RIF before continuing.

AUTOMATIC ANIMATION

Many of ZOETROPE's functions may be applied differently over
a range of frames to automaticallyi create animation effects.

Move to frame #1 and select Cut from the Clip menu.  Move the cross
hairs that appear just above and to the left of Dino, then drag the mouse 
(hold down the left moust button) to create a box around the dinosaur
before releasing the button.  The box disappears, but you've captured
the image in the ZOETROPE clip buffer.

Select Paste from the Clip menu and drag Dino to the upper left of the
screen before releasing the button to paste him there.  Take a look at
some of the other frames to see that he's only been pasted to frame #1.

Now we'll do some Time Painting.  Select Time from the Menu.
Click on To All to highlight it, then right-click to return to whichever
frame you're on (it doesn't matter). Notice that the small 'f' in the
Playback Bar has been replaced by a while 'a' against a red background.
page 14-----------

Again, select Paste from the Clip menu.  This time, drag Dino to the
lower right of the screen before releasing the button.  A requestor asks if
you want to do this to all frames.  Sure, why not.  Click on Yes.
When ZOETROPE finishes pasting to all frames, play the animation.

Select Time again from the menu, and click on Tween to turn off the
tweening function.  Exit the Time menu, select Paste from the Clip
menu, drag Dino to the lower left, and answer Yes to the prompt.  Play
the animation.

Return to the Time menu, turn Tween back on (highlighted), then
select To Segment.  In the box below To Segment, drag the dot to the
right until it becomes a bar (the Segment Range Bar).  Drag the end of
the bar until the number to its right indicates frame #6.  Drag the other
end of the bar until its number (the one to the left) indicates frame #3.
Drag-Paste Dino one more time, then play the animation.

Notice that while in To Segment mode (note the 's' in the Playback
Bar), ZOETROPE plays only the segment of frames indicated by the
Segment Range Bar.  The frame mode must be in either To Frame or
To All for full playback of all frames.  Stop the pplayback and click on
the 's' to change the frame mode To All (each click on the frame-mode
box cycles the mode through 'f', 's', and 'a').  Now, when the entire 
animation is played, you can see that the newly pasted image appears
only through frames #3-#6.

Let's get rid ofthe clutter.  Click on the frame mode letter ('a') to set it
To Frame ('f').  Select Kill Seq from the Menu and answer 'Yes' to
clear all frames from memory.  The Playback Bar shows you have a
single frame.  Click once on the frame-total number in the Playback
Bar to append ten duplicate frames to your animation (in this case, a
total of 11 blank frames).  This is a shortcut method of adding extra
frames.  Whenever you click on the total frames number (or press
[Return] ten additional frames will be added to the end of the
animation.

You've erased the Dino animation, but your clip buffer still contains
his image. Select Move from the Clip menu, move Dino to the middle
of the screen and release the button.  Move works just like Paste -
except that it doesn't paste.  It simply moves the clip image to another
location.  Move is also handy for viewing the contents of your clip
buffer.  It's also a good way to try out the different ways of dragging an
image around.  Go ahead and move Dino around the screen.  Notice that

page 15--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

you can place the mouse pointer anywhere on screen to begin the drag
move - you can even move Dino completely off the screen!  (Don't
forget where you ut him.)  When you're through, move him back to
center screen.

Set the frame mode To All and select Rotate from the Clip menu.
Place the cursor just outside thelower-right corner of the clip box, hold
down the left button, and drag in a counter-clockwise direction about
180 degrees.  Release the left mouse button, then right-click, answer
Yes to the prompt, and play the animation.

Again, select Rotate from the Clip menu.  Place the pointer inside the
clip box and drag Dino to the lower left corner of the screen.  Place the
pointer just outside the right side of the clip box and drag it
counterclockwise to about 180 degrees before releasing it.  Note that at
this point, you may still drag the clip image from inside its box, or try
a slightly different rotation.  When you're ready, right-click, then play
back the animation.

Many of the clip functions vary, depending on where you place the
mouse pointer in relation to the clip box.  These are all described in
detail in the following tutorials, and in the Reference section.

Choose Stretch from the Clip menu, place the pointer inside the clip
box and drag Dino to the upper center of the screen.  Place the pointer
outside the right side of the clip box and drag the box to the right to
stretch the image.  Right click, answer affirmative, then watch the
animation.

Select ing Pong from the Modes menu and play the animation again.

DOIN' THE APM

As we have demonstrated, by using the Clip functions over a range of
frames, you can rotate, stretch, and move (using Paste) your images.
With the APM f/x menu, you can combine these operations - and
more.

Move Dino to the upper left corner of the screen, then select APM f/x
from the Menu.  First we'll try a rotation.  At boot-up, 'Turn' and
'Turns' are already highlighted in the APM menu. (If they're not, click 
on Turn, then on Turns.)  To the right of Turns are two slider bars.
page 16------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

The top slider adjusts partial turns (+-360 degrees), and the bottom
adjusts full turns +-16).

Adjust the lower bar for one full turn, counter-clockwise (positive
number) by clicking on arrow to its right.  Now, click on the box
labeled Preview to see the effect.  (You may click on Preview as many
times as you wish, it has no effect on your animation).

During the review, the white cross on the screen indicates the center of
rotation.  To move it, click on Center, then select Mouse XY and move
the crosshairs to the lower-right corner of the clip box (approximately).
Left-click to set the center, then click on Preview to view the results.

Now, click on Default and preview the results.  Default automatically
places the cross in the center of the clip box.

The clip box has been rotating about the Z axis. (The Z axis is the
depth axis running through the screen from your eyes.  The X axis is a
horizontal line parallel to the screen, and the Y axis is a vertical line.)
Click on Axis, then click on X and preview the turn.  Click on Y and
preview the turn.

The three slider bars above X,Y, and Z represent the placement of
(from top to bottom) the X, Y, and Z axes.  Drag the upper slider bar
all the way to the left (-100), leave the middle slider bar at 100, and drag
the lower slider bar all the way to the left (-100).  Click on preview.

Now that we have an interesting rotation, let's add movement across the
screen.  There are two ways to move an image from the APM.  We'll
use Path for this example.  Click on Path, then click on Sampled Path.
Point at Dino, hold down the left mouse button and drag a looping path
that ends near the lower-right of the screen.  Preview the result.  (You
can keep redoing the path until it moves the way you want it).
page 17------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

Now we'll add scaling to our rotating, moving image.  Select Size and
drag the lower bar (labeled Enlarge) until it reads approximately 50, and
the percentage under Scale reads about 2.00.  (Exact values are not 
always possible, depending on the size of clip buffer.)  Click on 
Preview.
Finally, click on Render, then click on Yes.  ZOETROPE will take 
care of the rest.  When the rendering is complete, play back the results.

This is the basic process of the APM.  Up until the time you select
Render, you may continue to adjust any of the APM functions,
repreviewing until you get what you like.

PUT IT ALL TOGETHER

Now that we've done some animation doodling, let's see if we can put
some of these features to use.  What if we wanted Dino to walk across
the screen?

Select Kill Seq from the Menu, answer Yes, then select Load/Save from
the menu and reload the original DINO.RIF animation.

Return to the APM f/x menu and click on Preview.  All our original
settings are still there, and the clib box floats across the screen.  Up
until now, we've moved a clip image all over the screen, but it hasn't
been animated.  Now, we want Dino to walk across the screen.  In the
lower-left corner of the APM f/x menu is the word Clip.  Click on it to
toggle it to Seq.  Now, the APM settings will affect the entire 
animation sequence.

Click on Preview.  Oops, we don't want Dino flying all over!   Click on
Clear and answer Yes to the prompt.  The Clear button erases, or
zeroes, all previous APM settings. (But don't worry, you can save your
APM settings to disk from the Load/Save menu.)

Dino is going to walk from the left side of the screen to half way off
the right.  To place him at his starting position, click on Move (the
Move in the APM menu!) and select Mouse XY.  Drag Dino (and the
entire screen) all the way to the left until his tail is about one-half inch
away from the left edge of the screen.  Note the coordinates at the top of
the screen.  The dy coordinate stands for 'delta y', or the change from
the original Y coordinate position.  Make sure this reads zero before
you release the mouse button.  When the APM menu returns, note the
page 18-----------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

values in the slider bars.  The top bar (X position)reflects the change
on the X axis (about -100).  The Y and Z bars should both read zero.  If
you accidentally joggled the mouse before releasing it, you can adjust the
Y axis to zero in the slider bar.

Click on Preview.  The entire screen glides to the left.  Hmmmm...
Looks like this won't work, he'll be walking backwards.  Click on the
't' (tween) to turn it off, and try review again.  That's better.  Withot
tween, only the final position of the sequence (or clip) is pasted
identially to each frame.  Click on Render and check out the results.
Dino should now be walking at the left of the screen.

Now, let's walk Dino across the screen.  Click on Move in the APM
menu and drag Dino to the right until he's halfway off the screen (and
the Y delta remains at dy()).  This should be approximately dx256.
Click on Preview - oops, forgot to turn the tween back on.  Click on
't' to highlight tween, then preview again.  The sequence box should
glide across the screen.  Go ahead and render it.

Turn off the Ping Pong in the Modes smenu before playing the animation.
Not bad!  All we need now is a background.

Select Load/Save from the Menu.  We want to load a background
picture, so select .pic as the type of file.  If we loaded a picture with the
settings as they are, it would replace the frame in memory. (Actually, 
it would replace all frames since the frame mode is set To All.)  For our
example, though, we want a background under Dino.  So, click on
Under.

NOTE:  File merges using Under and Over begin loading at
the frame currently displayed.  In the following examples, make
sure you are at frame #1 before loading Under or Over.

Now, click on Load.  Since you're in To All mode, any kind of file I/O
is irreversable and a prompt will warn you.  Answer Yes.  The file
selector will now display only those files with a .pic extender.  (If you
want to display all files, click on the word Wildcard.  To return to the 
.pic extender, click on Wildcard again.)  Select and load the file labeled
DINO.PIC.  Your background picture will be loaded into each frame
behind the Dino animation.
page 19-----------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

Play the animation.  Looks pretty good, but let's add one more touch.
It's just as easy to merge (or 'composite') animations as it is to
composite pictures.  Reenter the Load/Save menu, select .rif, then click
on Over.  Now, click on Load and select the file DINOTITLE.RIF.

When the first frame of the animation appears, it will wait for you to
position it.  If you liked where it was, you could simply click the right
mouse button.  This animation is a credit title which might look better
at the bottom of the screen, so drag it to the lower ortion of the screen
before releasing the button.  Answer yes to the rompt and, when the
loading is comleted, play your comleted animation.

It's easy to save your comleted dnimation (and it's a good idea to save
many interim animations before activating irreversable functions.  Place
a blank, formatted disk in whichever drive is available.  If you have a 
single drive, replace ZOETROPE disk B with the formatted disk.

NOTE:  No disk formatted?  Select Pause from the Menu to return 
to the Workbench.

Select Load/Save, make sure .rif is highlighted (we want to save the
animation, not just a single frame picture.)  During a Save operation,
the Normal, Over, Under, and Splice modes don't matter, but make sure
the frame mode is set either To All, or To Frame.

Click on Save.  Point to the box to right of the word 'File:' and click
to get a square cursor.  Type in a file name, such as: DINOALL.RIF,
and press [Return].  ZOETROPE will display each frame of the
animation as it saves it to disk.

MOVING ON

Before you move on, play around with what you have already learned.
Experiment and try new combinations.  This tutorial has been only an
introduction to ZOETROPE.  Whole menus - such as ixel f/x and
Color f/x - have not even been mentioned.

The remaining tutorials use a more methodical approach, taking you
step-by-step through all of ZOETROPS's functions:

TUTORIAL II: DRAWING, will show you how to use ZOETROPE's paint-
rogram features - the backbone of the program.
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
page 20                                     ZOETROPE TUTORIAL I: AN OVERVIEW

PAGE 20 WAS BLANK
page 21--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING
                         ZOETHROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Before beginning this tutorial, make afresh start by using the Clean Up
procedure inthe Quick Start section, or by simply Quitting 
ZOETROPE (select Quit in the Menu), and restarting it from the Workbench.

You should now be looking at the familiar cross-shaped cursor inthe
middle of the ZOETROPE screen.

NOTE: During the following tutorial, watch that the frame mode in
the Playback Bar remains at Toi Frame ('f').  If the red 's' or 'a'
appears, click on it to return to the 'f'.  Also, the total frames
number (at the right) should remain at '1'.  If you see a higher 
number while working in the earlier tutorials, it means you've 
accidentally pressed [Return].  To clear this up, select Kill Seq
from the Menu, then select 'Yes' from the requestor box.

THE DRAW MENU

In order to create your own cel animation or 'dress up' existing
animations with ZOETROPE, you should first familiarize yourself
with the many aint tools you have at hand.
page 22-----------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Examine the contents of the Draw menu.  There are nine drawing
functions (or tools), one text option, and their keyboard equivalents.
An asterick (*) to the left of any one of the features will indicate the
currently selected one.  Only one item in the Draw menu may be active
at any time.  When you first boot ZOETROEP, the Draw tool is active
and the mouse cursor is a one-pixel-sized, cross-shaped brush.

With the Draw tool selected, move the cursor to the middle of the
screen, hold down the left button and move the mouse around.  If
nothing happens, it is because the Playback bar is still displayed at the
bottom of the screen.  Right-click to display a full screen, then hold 
down the left button and move the mouse: a one-pixel-wide line is
drawn.

Play around with the Draw function a bit.  Draw quickly or slowly;
sign your name, if you want.

Triy this: Scribble a line, then press [Help] - the line is gone.  ress [Help] again - the line reappears.  Draw a second line, then a third
line, then press [Help] - only the third line is removed.  The [Help]
key is the alternative to selecting Undo in the Frame menu.  It works
with most of ZOETROPE's functions, but you may only Undo the last
operation.  If you go on the a second operation, the previous one is 
permanently set. (There is an exception to this, which we will get to
later.)

Select Streak from the Draw menu and scibble some more on the
screen.  Streak is similar to Draw, but if you move your mouse quickly
across the screen you'll see the difference.  Streak lets you draw with a
brush designed to 'skip' if you are drawing quickly.  This creates a
sketchy appearance.

Now, select Stipple from the Draw menu, and then go back to your
workscreen.  Go to a clear area of your screen, hold down your left
mouse button and move your cursor around.  Stipple sprays a 
randomly-distributed series of individual pixels in a small swatch.  (It
will also use whichever brush you've selected from the Brush menu.
We'll cover that in a bit.)

We'll be getting to color in a little while, but let's sneak ahead and 
change the color of our Stipple brush.  Move the mouse to the Color menu.
When it drops down, you will see the 32 default ZOETROPE colors,
plus some options at the bottom.  To select a new color for your
page 23-------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

current drawing tool, simply point the mouse cursor at the block
containing the color you wish. An outline will surround the selected
color.  Release the right mouse button to select the color, then try the
Stipple again.

NOTE: There's a hidden way to select colors directly from the
screen.  Place your mouse cursor over any color on the workscreen
and ress the [C] key.  This will select whichever color your
mouse is point at.

Now you can change colors at any time while continuing with the drawing 
tutorial.  But by now, your workscreen is probably getting a
little cluttered.  To erase it, select Clear ic from the Frame menu.
Your workscreen is cleared of all previous work.  Press [Hel] and
everything returns.  The keyboard alternative to Clear Pic is [Esc], press
it and your screen is blanked again.

Select Airbrush from the Draw menu and try it out.  Airbrush is similar
to Stipple except that it is adjustable.  You can set both the speed and
the spread (range) of your airbrush.

Select Air Speed from the Menu.  A menu box appears consisting of
two slider boxes labeled Speed and Spread.  Speed affects the overall 
speed of your airbrush flow, while Spread alters the range of screen area
covered by your pixels (or brushes).

You can adjust the slider bar values by one increment in either direction
biy clicking on the arrows to either side of the bar.  Hold down the left
button while pointing on the arrow, and the slider bar will begin to
scroll. Click anywhere within the slider area to move the slider bar
immediatelyi to that position - or, simly drag the slider bar to the
osition you wish.

NOTE: There are several slider bars used in the various menus of
ZOETROPE.  They all work in the fashion described above.  Take
the time now to familiarize yourself with their operation.

After your airbrush speed and sread values, right-click to return to the
main menu screen and draw with the airbrush.  Readjust the Air Speed
settings as often as you like until you have a feel for exactly how they
affect your airbrush.
page 24----------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Clear your screen when you're finished (select Clear Pic from the Frame
menu, or press [Esc].  Now, select Draw again from the Draw menu,
and scribble several overlapping, looping circles on your screen.

Return to the Draw menu and select Fill - a hollow cursor labeled
'Fill' will apear on your workscreen.  Place the center of the cursor
inside one of the enclosed areas you just drew (or whatever area you
want filled), and press the left mouse button.  You'll see a solid color
expand and fill that area.  Choose different colors and fill every enclosed
area you want, or even fill the entire screen.  Try pressing [Help] to see
if you can undo a fill.

Clear your workscreen and select Line from the Draw menu.  Place the
center of the cursor at the point where you want the line to start, then
click and hold your left mouse button.  While still holding down the
button, move your cursor around on the screen.  A rubber line will
stretch from your starting point. Move your cursor to the point where 
you want the line to end, then release the button to set it.  Repeat the
above procedure to draw more lines.

Select Polygon from the Draw menu.  Polygon lets you create straight-
edged geometric shaes of any color - squares, rectanges, trapezoids.
Place your cursor at any point on the screen, left-click once, then move
the cursor.  A rubber line appears.  Left-click a second point and move
the cursor again.  As you move your cursor away from its second
position, a swath of color emanates from your initial starting oint,
sweeping out to your cursor in a triangular shape.  Click and move
again.  If you double back over your shape, you will reveal the original
background under the polygon.  Right-click to release the mouse and set
the final polygon.

Clear your workscreen and select Circle from the Draw menu.  Place
your cursor at the sot on the workscreen where you want the center of
your circle.  Hold down theleft mouse button and move the cursor 
outward from the centeroint.  Release the button to set the circle.
Select a different color and try it again.

Choose a distinct color, and select Box from the Draw menu.  Position 
your cursor on the workscreen, hold down the left mouse button, then
drag your cursor.  As you move it away, in any direction, you'll see a
box, with right-angled sides, emanating from your starting oint.  You
can move the cursor in any direction to make the box assmall or large 
as you want.  Release the mouse button to set your box.
page 25--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Before we discuss Text, the last item in the Draw menu, let's explore
some of the other features in ZOETROPE that affect your drawing
functions.

THE MODES MENU

Point to the Modes menu and examine its list of functions. The items
in the Modes menu affect the various drawing tools and, unlike the
items in the Draw menu, more than one of the Modes may be active at
any time.  There are seven items, but for now, we're with
only five of them.

If your screen is empty, draw something simple then select Zoom from
the Modes menu.  A white box will appear.  Move the mouse to place
thebox in the area you want work, then click the left mouse button.
Your workscreen now displays a magnified version of the area you
chose.

The keyboard alternative to Zoom is [Z], and is easier to use than
selecting from the menu.  Press [Z], and your workscreen returns to
normal.  Press [Z] again, and the white box reappears.  Click the left
mouse button to return to Zoom mode on the workscreen.

You can pick and use any of your ZOETROPE drawing functions (Draw,
Line, Airbrush, etc). Use [Z] to toggle between Zoom and normal 
display mode.  Make fine adjustments to your drawing; add details to
your stick figure's face, if you want.

If you're doing detail work on an area of your painting, and find that
toggling in and out of Zoom is disruptive, you can move the Zoom
window by pressing the number keyson your numeric keypad (to the
far right of your keyboard).  The eight number keys surrounding the [5]
key will move the Zoom window in the compass direction of that
page 26--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING
particular key from the central [5] key.  For example, the [8] key is
north of the [5].  Press [8] and watch the Zoom window move upward.
Press [4] and the zoom window moves to the left (or west).  Those 
keys diagonal to the [5] key will move the window in a diagonal
direction.  ress [3] to move the window down and to the right (south-
east).  See Zoom in the Reference Section for a detailed description of
the numeric keypad function.)

Okay, turn zoom off and take another look at the Modes menu.  We'll
skip Ping Pong and X-Ray Copy for now.  Let's examine Filled.
Filled in the Modes menu is different from Fill in the Draw menu.  At
boot-up, Filled is active (as you can see bythe asterick).  This means
that drawing tools, such as Box circle, and Polygon, automatically
create solid images.  When you turn Filled off, these same functions
will create hollow images.

Let's try it.  Select Filled to toggle it off.  Now try the Circle, Box, and
Polygon functions that you used earlier from the Draw menu.  You will
readily see the effect of an inactive Filled mode.  Toggle Filled back on
and draw some more.  Leave Filled active, and clear your screen before
proceeding.

The three features at the bottom of the Modes menu (Distinct,
Connected, and Concentric) are slightly different from the other options
in the menu in that only one of them may be active at any time, and at
least one of them must be active.  These three modes affect the Circle,
Line, and Box drawing tools only. We've seen how these tools
function in Distinct mode, let's examine the others.

Select Connected, then draw several boxes and circles.  As you can see,
when Connected is activated, it takes the starting and ending points of 
your cursor and draws a circle, or box between them.  The Line tool
follows the same rule, but the mouse buttons are used a bit differently;
left-click just once to set the starting point of the line, then left-click
again to set the end point of that line.  Your cursor will remain attached
to each set point by a rubber line.  Continue to move and left-click to
draw connected lines about the screen.  To remove your cursor from the
series of lines, click the right mouse button.  You can now left-click to
set the oint on another series of lines.

Now, go back to the Modes menu and select Concentric.  When
Concentric is activated, the first point that you set, by left-clicking,
page 27--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

becomes the center point of all subsequent oerations, until you right-
click to clear the set point.

Before trying Concentric, click on Filled to deactivate it.  This will
make the Concentric effect more noticeable.  Select Box or Circle from
the Draw menu, go to youur workscreen, press the left button to place
your center oint, and drag the cursor outwards.  You'll see the box or
circle appear.  Release the mouse button to set the image, move the
cursor elsewhere on your screen, then drag to create another Box or
Circle. Concentric will remember your  original centerpoint and
automatically draw a new box or circle, radiating outward from the
original centerpoint to your new cursor position.  Right-click to release
the current center oint and set another, or to select a different tool.

The Line function works as a 'ray' tool in Concentric mode.  Select
Line and left-click only once to create a center point.  Move the mouse
away, and a rubber line will emanate from the center oint.  Left-click
to set the line, then move the mouse.  The rubber line remains attached
to the center oint.  Left-click to set several 'ray' lines.  Now, try this:
hold down the left mouse button and swee the mouse in a circle around
the center oint to make spike dandelion-shaped images.  Right-click to 
release the center point.

Now, select Distinct to turn it back on.  We're going to do some more
drawing, but this time, we're going to change our brush.

THE BRUSH MENU

ZOETROE has an array of brushes you may select for most drawing
functions, or you may define your own brush.  Move your mouse to
the Brush menu and look at the menu.  You'll notice an assortment of
page 28--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

16 brushes of various shapes and sizes, along with a couple of options
at the bottom of the menu, which we'll describe in a moment.

Go back to the Draw menu and select the draw tool.  Now, from the
Brush menu, select any one ofthe brush shapes.  The mouse cursor
becomes the shape of the chosen brush.  Return to the workscreen and
draw a few lines.

Select another brush, go back to the Draw menu and try  out some
dofferent drawing tools - sch as Line, Airbrush, Stipple, etc.  What
happens when you use circle, Brush, or Polygon? Because these tools
are creating Filled images, the Brush shape has no effect.  Move on
over to the Modes menu and turn off Filled.  Now, try your brushes 
again with Circle, Box, and Polygon.  Experiment with Connected and 
Concentric.  Set Airbrsh to maximum Spread and Speed, and try a
large brush.

Before we go on, return to Distinct, and activate Filled within the
Modes menu.  Let's see how to define our own brushes.

The Get Brush in the Brush menu lets you 'grab' a small
portion of your screen (16x16 pixels) as a brush.  To work, some part
of the grabbed portion must have a little of the background color in it.
(At default, the background color is black).

Clear your workscreen, then use any of the drawing tools to scribble a
few different colors on the screen.  In the Brush menu, select a brush
shape that you want to change.  (Yo may use any of the shapes except
for brush #1, which is the default cross shae in the upper-left corner.
Also, don't use the fat, round brush; we'll want that for later.

Now, select Get Brush.  Your workscreen will appear, along with a 
small, highlighted box.  Move this box over the area of your drawing
you want to grab as a brush, then click the left mouse button.  The area
you enclosed with the brush box is now your brush, and you can draw
with it to your heart's content.  Take another look at the Brush menu,
and you will see that your new shapes isnow included among the
others.  Hint: Zoom mode is particularly handy for creating detailed
brushes.

We'll skip Use Clip for now, but we'll discuss it when we describe the
Clip menu.
page 29--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

THE COLOR MENU

We've already shown how to select any of the 32 colors from the Color
menu.  Let's take a look at the first two options at the bottom: Palette
and Cycle.

Using several brushes and colors, create a big, scribbled, multi-colored
screen.  Now, what if you want a different color palette?  What if you
want all shades of blue, or red, or you simply want to tone down or
enhance certain colors?  That's easy enough to do with the Palette
option.

Select Palette from the Color menu.  The Palette submenu will apear
at the bottom of your screen.  At the top of the menu is the same
Playback Bar that appears at the bottom of your screen when the main
menu is displayed.  We'll ignore this sfor now.  For the moment, let's
concentrate on changing colors.

The second row of the Palette menu is the Color Selection Bar,
containing the same 32 colors available from the Color menu, only
arranged in a straight line.  Look closely, and you will see a single
pixel in one of the 32 boxes in the Color Bar to indicate the currently
selected drawing color. Point at another color in the bar and left-click.
page 30--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

The pixel moves to this color, and it becomes the current drawing
color.  You may also select colors directly from the ortion of the
screen dislayed above the Palette menu. (And, while the full screen is
displayed, press [C], and whatever color the cursor is on will become
the current drawing color.)

Select a color from the Color Bar that you wish to change.  In the left
portioin of the Color Palette menu are two boxes labeled: RGB and
HLS, and to the right of them are three numbered slider bars.   The RGB
box is highlighted (as a default), which means that the slider bars will
affect (from top to bottom) the Red, Green,and Blue intensities of the
chosen color.  When the slider bar is to the full right position, its color
(Red, Green, or Blue) is at full intensity - or 15.  The extreme left
osition is zero intensity.  By mixing the intensity of the three RGB
color values, you may create any of 4,096 colors, of which 32 may
appear on screen at any one time.

Try selecting different colors and adjusting the slider bars to diffferent
values.  Notice the effect of the colors not only in the Color Bar, but in
your workscreen.  (For a full exlanation of the theory of RGB color
mixing, see the Reference Section.)

You've probably made quite a mess of your original pallette by now.
Click on the Restore box over in the right of the Palette menu.  All the
colors are returned to their original values.  Now, try this: Select the
black background color on the far left (color register#0, and alter its
color with the slider bars. Right-click to exit the Palette menu, then
return to the Palette menu (select Palette from the Color menu).  Click
on Restore and nothing hapens. Use the slider bars to change the color
some more, then click on Restore again - the color returns to its last
value.  This illustrates that Restore will only restore the colors which
have been changed since the Palette menu was last called.

There is another form of Restore in ZOETROPE, in the Frame menu.
Exit the Palette menu and click on Restore in the Frame menu.  Return
to the palette menu and notice that the original black background color
page 31--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

has return. (You may also have lost your entire picture.  The Frame 
Restore deletes all changes that have taken lace since entering - and
before leaving - a frame.  It's related to the use of multile frames,
which we'll cover in more detail later.)

Whereas RGB stands for Red, Green, and Blue, HLS stands for Hue,
Luminance, and Saturation, and is another way to adjust your colors.
Select a color from the Color Bar, and click on HLS so that it is 
highlighted. The number boxes in the slider bars change to vertical
lines, and will now affect (from top to bottom) the Hue, Luminance,
and Saturation of the selected color.

Slide the Hue bar (the top one) back and forth while observing its effect
on the selected color.  Hue is just another word for 'color'.  When yo
adjust the Hue, the selected color changes, but maintains the luminance
(intensity) and saturation (purity; or amount of gray) of the original
color.  Try the Luminance slider.  The color remains the same hue, but
changes in brightness.  Now, adjust the third bar.  This affects the
purity of the color, or the amount of gray.  (For a full explanation of
HLS mixing, see the Reference Section.)

Return to RGB mode by clicking in its box, and click on Restore to
restore some of the original palette values.  Now, look at the row
immediately below the Color Selection Bar.  A diamond and an 'x'
connected by a line. This is the Color Range Bar, which indicates the
range of colors you wish to manipulate.  The Color Range Bar works 
with Cut, Paste, and Range in the Palette menu.  It also efects the
Cycle option in the Color menu (which we'll look at in a moment), as
well as the effects in the Color f/x menu.

You can adjust the Color Range by dragging the dots on either end of
the line so that they 'bracket' the colors in the Color bar above.  The
range of colors affected will run from the color above on end dot, to
the color above the other end dot.  Yo may afect only a single color
by dragging both dots to the same color.  The direction of the bar is
indicated by the diamond, which may be thought of as its 'arrow head'.

Cut and Paste both use the color indicated by the Color Range Bar.
Drag the Range Bar to cover the four colors: green, yellow, orange,
and red (color registers #10 - #13).  The arrow should be point to the
right.  Now, click once on Cut - which highlights briefly.  You have
just place those four colors in a special color buffer in memory.
page 32--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Adjust the Range Bar to cover the four grey colors on the far right of
the Color Selection Bar.  Click on aste, and your four cut colors are
pasted to their new position.  Reverse the direction of the Color Range
Bar by dragging its two ends across each other.  Place the reversed
Range Bar under the same four colors on the right end of the Selction
Bar.  Click on paste, and the same four colors are pasted in reverse
order.

Click on Restore to return ot the original palette.  Now, reverse the
Range Bar once more so it points from left to right, then stretch it to
cover seven colors on the far right. Click on Paste.  Notice that, since
we have only cut four colors, only four colors can be pasted.

Play around with Cut and Paste until you're comfortable wit it. Try
adjusting the Range Bar so that it covers less than the number of colors
that have been cut.   When you're ready  to go on, Restore the palette to
its original colors.

Copy presents a simle way to copy one color in the Color Bar to
another.  Click to select any color in the Color Bar as the source color.
Now, click on Copy, then click on a second color in the Color Bar as
your destination color.  The destination color will become the same as
the currently selected color.

To the right of copy is Range, which could also be thought of as
'blend'.  It works differently depending on whether RGB or HLS is
highlighted.
If RGB is active, Range averages the colors between the two end colors
in the Range Bar.  For example, if the color at the beginning of your
range strip was pure white (15-15-15) and the color at the end of your
range strip was ure black (0-0-0), clicking on Range would give you a
blend of intermediate greys between those two extremes.  Range will
also work on odd color combinations, such as urple and green, and
will try to find the best palette of intermediate colors between them.

If HLS is active, Range will create Rainbow colors.  It works best with
identical, bright colors on both ends of a wide range.

The best way to learn about Range is to experiment.  So go ahead and 
try some different colors.  You can always Restore your palette.
page 33--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

We'll look at Use Clip later, when we discuss multiple frames and
palettes.  The last item on the Palette menu is the [%] character, which
is like a secret passage to the Color f/x menu - which we will also 
cover later.  If you want to try, go ahead!  You can get right back to
the Palette menu from the Color f/x menu by clicking on the [@]
character in the Color f/x menu.

Remember the Cycle option in the Color menu?  Let's take a look at it.
Restore yor original palette, then set the Color Range Bar to
encompass all the colors in the Color Bar.

The Cycle option in the Color menu lets you cycle through a selected 
range of colors as you are drawing.

Erase your workscreen and select Cycle from the Color menu.  Now,
select Draw from the Draw men, choose a nice thick brush, and begin 
drawing.  Because the Cycle option is active (as indicated by the
asterick), your drawn line cycles through all the colors in the Range
Bar.  The order of the colors cycled though depends on the direction of
the Color Range Bar.

Move back to the Color menu and notice the astericks indicating that
Cycle is active. Select any color from the Color menu, and draw again.
What hapened to the Cycle?  Look at the Color menu again; Cycle is
inactive.  Cycle is automatically deactivated when you choose a color
from the Color menu.

lay with the Cycle effect.  Try different brushes.  Set the Range
control to encomass a different number of colors - or changes its
direction.  You can create a particularly retty effect by using the default
cursor with Stipple or Airbrush, giving you a kaleidoscopic storm of
cosmic pixels. (Don't forget that you can alter your airbrush spread and
speed, too, from the Air Speed command in the Menu drop-down.)

Experiment with Lines, Polygon, Circles, Boxes, and Fill.  They all
react a little differently in Cycle mode. (For detailed explanation of their
effects, see Cycle in the Reference Section.)

We've looked at the Palette menu as it is applied to a single frame.
ZOETROPE is, of course, an animation program which uses many
frames, like movie film.  And each ZOETROPE frame may have a
different palette.  We'll take a look at how this affects the Palete menu,
page 34--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

later in the Tutorial section. (We'll also look at the fascinating Color
f/x menu.)
Before proceeding, turn Cycle off by clicking on it again, or by
selecting another color from the Color menu.  While you're at it, make
sure that Distinct and Filled are active in the Modes menu.

USING TEXT

Now that we're finished with our drawing features, it's time to play 
with ZOETROE's text features.  These enable you to label yor
artwork or provide spinning titles for your animated spectaculars.

Clear the screen, and select a color from the Color menu in which you
want your text to appear, then select Text in the Draw menu.

On the full screen, the cursor should become an 'L' shape.  Move the
cursor to a position on screen at which you want your text to start, then
left-click to set the start oint.  The cursor chnges to an outlined box
indicating the size of your text.  Okay, type in a word or two. You can
use [Backspace] to erase errors, and the [Return] key will drop you to
the beginning of the next line.  Right-click to return to the workscreen
and the 'L' cursor.  Now, you may reposition the cursor, left-click and
add more text, or right-click to return to the main menu.

NOTE:  While in Text mode, none of the ZOETROPE keyboard alternatives 
will be operative.

You can easily select a different font.  From the Menu drop-down,
select Set Font.  The Font submenu will appear featuring whichever
fonts have been assigned to the Amiga system. Click on any of the
fonts listed in the font window and its example will be displayed to the
right.  The slider bar to the left of the window will scoll through the
list of fonts if there are more than the window can display.
page 35--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Font sizes are indicated by the number to the right of their title.  If you
want a big font, slect one with a large number.  You may further affect
the font by clicking on Underline, Bold, and Italic, in any combination.

NOTE:  ZOETROPE can access any standard, properly installed,
Amiga fonts.  Usually the fonts will be found in a directory labeled
"fonts" on your boot disk.  Your ZOETROPE disk contains a few
extra-large, public domain fonts for special titling effects.  From the
CLI, you can install fonts from another directoyr by placing the disk
containing that directory in one of your drives, and typing:

ASSIGN FONTS: df1:myfonts

The above assumes that your fonts are in a directory labeled
'myfonts' within a disk which has been placed in drive df1.

You may also change fonts by placing a disk containing fonts, which
has also been labeled FONTS, in any drive, then clicking on Relist
in the Set Font menu.

Try some of the fonts with different colors and styles.  If you want to
return to the standard default font, select topaz 8 before exiting the Set
Font menu.

THE CLIP MENU

The Clip menu contains some of ZOETROPE's most important
features, letting you grab all or part of your workscreen and move it
about, or distort it in various ways.

ZOETROPE contains a special area of memory called the clip buffer.
When a portion (or all) of the screen is cut or clipped into the clip
page 36--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

buffer, it remains there for future use, until another image is cut or
clipped into it.  Only one image may be in the clip buffer at any time.
ZOETROPE functions such as Clear Pic have no effect on the contents
of clip buffer.

The first item in the Clip menu is Cut.  But, before we use it, we need
something on our workscreen to cut out.  If you still have your text on
screen, you can use that.  Otherwise, draw some more multi-colored 
scribbles. Decide upon a small area of the screen you want to Cut out,
then select Cut from the Clip menu.  Crosshairs will appear, along
with X and Y coordinate readouts in the uper left of your screen.  (The
X coordinate represents the cursor position horizontaly, the Y
represents the cursor position vertically, based on a coordinate system
where 0,0 is the position of the cursor in the upper-left corner of the
screen.  You can see this byi moving the crosshairs to the upper-left of
the screen.  See the Reference Section for a detailed description of the
ZOETROPE coordinate system.)

To cut out your image, place the intersection of the crosshairs at any
corner of an imaginary box around the screen area you wish to capture.
Now, while holding down your left mouse buton, move the crosshairs
diagonally over the image.  A box will form, and the coordinate
numbers will change.  While still holding down the left mouse button,
examine the coordinates.

The first two numbers are the X and Y coordinates of the point set
when you first clicked the mouse, the second two numbers are the size
of the box (in pixels) along the X and Y axes, and the third pair of
numbers show the current position of the mouse.

Move the mouse until the box completely encloses the image you wish
placed in the lcip buffer (for purposes of later demonstration, select a
portion of the screen that also contains some background color), then
release the mouse button.  The box disappears nad the screen seems
unchanged, but a copy of your clipped image has been stored in the clip
buffer for later manipulation.

To demonstrate that your clipped image does indeed exist, let's look at
Move.  Move allows you to move your clip buffer image and position 
it anywhere on your workscreen, without pasting it to the workscreen.

Select Move from the Clip menu, and the clip box outline will
reappear.  (Actually, the clipped image has also reappeared, but you
page 37--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

can't tell that because it's sitting directly over the original image.)
Point the mouse anywhere in the vicinity of the clip box, hold down
the left mouse button drag the image.  You can drag the clip box,
containing a duplicate of your cut image, anywhere on your screen.
The numeric coordinates display the X and Y position coordinates of the
upper-left corner of your clip box, followed by the X and Y delta
coordinates (the amount of movement from the starting position).
Release the mouse button to deposit your image in its new location.
Once again, the box and the image will disappear, leaving you with
your original, unchanged screen.

Now that we've moved the clip buffer, we can really see the effect of the
Move command.  SelectMove again and, this time, the clip buffer
image appears in its new place - and it's obvious that not only the
box, but the image itself has appeared.  Try dragging the box to a new
location, but this time, click far outside the box before starting the drag
operation.  In ZOETROPE, you don't need to be inside the clip box to
drag it.  This makes it easiy to position a clipped image partway off the
screen.

Notice that, as you move your image about, the portions of the cliped
image that contain black (or whatever the background color sis)  remain
transparant, and the colors on the main screen show through.  This is
because we are currently in X-Ray Copy mode.  Release the mouse 
button, then go on over to the Modes Menu and turn off X-Ray Copy
mode by clicking on it.  Select Move again, and move your image
about the screen.  This time, the entire block is opaque.  X-Ray Copy
affects the transparancy of the background color (colorregister #0) in all
clip buffer operations.  Return ot X-Ray Copy and turn it back on again
so that the asterisk is beside it.

Move onliy repositions the clip buffer.  It does not paste the box down
permanently.  For that, we need to go to Paste.

Paste operates exactly the same as Move except that the image is pasted
(or drawn) to the workscreen after you release it.  Let's try it:  Select
Paste from the Clip menu.  Our clip buffer box appears along with our
image.  Drag the image to some place on the screen, then release the
mouse button - a copy of the image is pasted to the screen.  Try it
again, moving it and pasting it to another location.

Now, press [Help].  The image disappears.  Try this: Select Move and
move the image to a precise location that you want it.  (Don't worry
page 38--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

about being too precise.) Now, select Paste, but, this time, without
dragging the image, press the right mouse button- a copy of the
image is pasted right where it was.

Thus, we can use Paste to first drag, then stamp the image in a new
location, or simply to bring the moved image into view before pasting
to the existing location.

You canprobabliy guess what Paste Below does.  Go ahead and select it.
The clip image appears, as before, on top of the others.  However,
when you drag it elsewhere and relase it, the image is pasted beneath
those on screen.

Now, let's take a look at a variation of Cut - the Clip option.

Whereas Cut allowed you to cut out any portion of the workscreen at
any location, Clip is a form of automatic Cut that encompasses and
places in the clip buffer every part of your workscreen that is not part of
the background color.  Thus, if you have a tiny squiggle in the clip buffer, if
you've painted a scene that covers your entire screen, Clip will cut out
and store the whole screen.

We'll demonstrate it in several steps.  Clear your screen, select a nice,
bright color, then select the fat, round brush from the Brush menu.
Chose Draw from the Draw menu, return to the workscreen, then click
once to place a single, brush-shaped dot toward the center-top of the
screen.

Now, we could select Clip from the Clip buffer, but the menu might
obscure the effect, so let's use the keyboard alternative of Clip - the
[Tab] key.  While close watching the single dot, press [Tab]. For
just an instant, a white clip box surrounds only the colored dot before
disappearing.  Theeasiest way to check if it's there is with Move.
Select Move, and move the clipped dot around the screen.  Yup, it's
there.

Okay, release the clipped dot, then draw another dot several inches
below the first one.  Press[Tab], and, this time the clip box outline is
just large enough to take in both dots.  Let's try a third dot - place
this one to the left or right of the first two, as the third corner of a large
triangle.  Press [Tab] again.  This time, the clip box is large neough for
all three.
page 39--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Erase the screen and try Clip with various combinations and sizes of 
images.  You'll find it a very handy function.

There are a few more things we can do with our clipped images, besides
just moving and pasting them about the screen.  Erase the screen, then
using the same round brush and bright color, draw a number '4' -
about 1-1/2 inches high - in the center of the screen.  Now, press
[Tab] to place the '4' in the clip buffer.

We can rotate our clipped buffers any number of degrees about any of
the ethree X, Y, and  Z axes.  The X axis runs horizontally through an
image, the Y axis runs vertically, and the Z axis runs from front to
back - it's the depth axis.  To put it graphically, a pig rotating on a
spit rotates about the X axis; a revolving gas-station sign rotates about
the Y axis, and the hands rotating about a clock face rotate about the Z
axis.

So, let's put this to practice: Erase the screen (we've already captured
our clip images). Select Rotate from the Clip menu nad our clipped '4'
appears on the screen within its clip box.  Place the mouse cursor just
outside the lower-right corner of the box, hold down the left mouse
button, and move the mouse around the box in either direction.  Notice
that our '4' rotates about the Z axis, and the degrees of rotation are
displayed on our screen.  Rotate clockwise, and the degrees run from
360 toward zero; counter-clockwise runs from zero to 360.

Release the mouse button, and the rotated image stays where it is, with
the clip box still around it.  We have only rotated the image, we have
not yet pasted it to the screen.

Move the mouse to just outside the right side of the clip box, hold
down the left mouse button,and move the mouse around the box.
Notice two things: First, as soon as you pressed the left mouse button,
the image returned to its original orientation.  And, second, the rotation
is now around the Y axis.

Release the mouse button, and repeat the above procedure by clicking
just outside the bottom side of the box - this time the rotation is
about the X axis.

Rotate the '4' to some positoin you like, release the button, then click
the right mouse button to exit Rotate mode.  The clip box vanishes,
page 40--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

and the rotated '4' is pasted to the screen.  You could press [Help] at
this point to remove it, but don't.)

An important concept to understand is that only the pasted image has
been rotated, the clip-buffer remains in its original state.  To 
prove this, select Rotate again from the Clip buffer and - there it is.

Whenever the clip box appears on the screen, we can drag it elsewhere.
Since it's now over our previous rotation, let's move it aside by placing
the mouse inside the clip box, and dragging the '4' to one side.  We're
still in Rotate mode, so we can rotate our image as we did above.  You
may have noticed above that the rotational axes depend on where we
set our cursor outside of the clip box - Z was at the corner, and X and
Y were at the bottom and side.  Actually, anywhere outside the corners
will rotate about the Z axis; the sides will rotate about the Y axis; and
the top and bottom will rotate about the X axis.  Also, the positions
we chose, above, perform rotations in 1-degree increments, whereas the
other locations perform rotations in various increments such as 45 and
30 degrees.  (For a detailed illustration of the various rotations, see
Rotate in the Reference Section.)

Move the clipped image to varirous parts of the screen, and experiment
with various rotation.  (You may also drag a partially rotated image
elsewhere, then continue the rotation.)  At any time, feel free to clear
the screen so you can see your rotations better.  When you're ready,
we'll look at Stretch.

Stretch works, generally, like Rotate, except that it performs a stretch
(or shrink) operation on the contents of the clip buffer.  Just like
Rotate, the actual contents of the buffer are not altered, only the pasted
image.  Also like Rotate, when the clip box appears in Stretch mode,
you may first drag the image anywhere by clicking and dragging inside
the box; clicking and dragging outside the box performs the various
Stretch operations.  Unlike Rotate, the Stretch operations are performed
along only the X and/or Y axes, and the Stretch operations are
cumulative - as we shall see.

Clear the screen, and we'll use the same '4' as we did with Rotate.  (If
you've lost it, just make another.)  Select Stretch from the Clip menu
and the '4' appears in the clip box.  Place the sursor outside the bottom
side of hte box, press the left mouse button, and drg the mouse either
up or down - the '4' stretches and shrinks along the Y axis.  The
numbers in the upper-left portin of hte screen represent, from left to
page 41--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

right: the size (in pixels) of the X and Y axes of the stretched image,
followed by the percentage of the stretched axes (X then Y) compared to
their original size. Thus, if the original Y axis is 120 pixels, and it has
not yet been stretched, it will be 100 percent of its original size; it if
has been shrunk to 60 pixels, it will be 50 percent of its original size.

While still holding the left button, stretch the '4' until it's a little
larger than the original image. Now, relese the mouse button, move
the cursor to outside of the right side of the box and drag to the right.
This is what we meant by 'cumulative'.  Unlike Rotate, when we
select a different part of the box to scale, Stretch maintains the shape as
previously altered.

Okay, click the right mouse button to paste the new image to the
screen.  Select Stretch again, and drag the clipped image to a clear spot
on the screen.  Now, place the mouse near the outside of the lower-left
corner and drag that corner in, out, up and down - the image is
stretched along both the X and Y axes in either direction.  Try the
lower-right corner - the image maintains its original aspect ratio while
being stretched along both axes simultaneously.  Stretching from
different corners and sides affects not only the axes, but the increment of
stretching. (For a detailed illustration of the various Stretch modes, see
Stretch in the Reference Section.)

Play around with Stretch for awhile.  When you're ready, clear the
screen, and we'll look at Invert.

Invert is fairly simple - it 'flips' the image in your cut buffer about
the X and/or Y axes.  Like Rotate and Stretch, you may drag the clip
box to any place on the screen before, or after an Invert operation.
Unlike Rotate and Stretch, the flipped image in the clip buffer remains
in its inverted position.

Select Invert and your '4' will appear within the clip box.  The Invert
operation follows a simple rule: the side of the image away from the
mouse cursor will be flipped toward the side closest to the mouse 
cursor.  Thus, to flip the '4' upside down (around the X axis), place the
cursor outside either the bottom or top of the clip box, and left-click.
To flip it about the Y axis, place the cursor outside either the right or
left side and left-click.

You may flip the image about both axes simultaneously by simply
clicking outside one of the corners.  Thus, if you click outside the
page 42--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

lower-left corner, the upper-right corner will be flipped to the lower-left,
and vice versa.  Note that any click operation is essentially a toggle -
a second click from the same position will undo the previous flip.

Now that you have flipped '4', click the right mouse button to paste
it to the screen.  Now, select move, drag the image away, and examine
it - it's still in its inverted state.

Mask changes all colors in the clip buffer (except the background color)
to the currently selected drawing color.  This is useful for cast-shadow
effects, and to create complex masking objects from existing shapes.
It's easy to demonstrate.

Clear the screen, keep the round brush and, using Draw, draw a diagonal
line about 2-inches long in the center of the screen.  Now, select a
different color, and create an 'X' by drawing a diagonal line in the
opposite direction across the first.  We now have a two-color image.

Press [Tab] to clip the image, then use Move to drag it over to the side
of the original.  Select a third, distinct color from the Color menu, then
select Mask from the Clip menu.  For an instant, the clip box appears,
and you can see the image changing color.  Select Move,and take a
look at the image.  The two-colored 'X' is now one single color - the
current drawing color.

For an interesting shadow effect, mask the clip image with a dark color
and paste it to the screen.  Then select Cut and cut out only the original
two-color 'X'.  Now, select Paste, drag the two-colored 'X' over, but
slightly offset of the single-colored 'shadow', and relase the mouse to
paste the new image.  You can now Cut the combined images and paste
them anywhere you wish.

Oh yes!  Almost forgot to show Use Clip from the Brush menu.  Have 
you still got that two-color, shadowed 'X' in the clip buffer?  If not,
scribble some multicolored image, then Cut it into the clip buffer.
Now, select Streak from the Draw menu, and activate Use Clip in the
Brush menu.  Return to the main screen, and draw some streaky lines
- your brush is now the entire clip buffer. Use Clip will work with
Streak, Stiple, and Airbrush.  For a wild effect, try Airbrush at high
Speed and Spread with a large clip buffer.
page 43--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

At any time, you may cut a new section of the screen into the clip
buffer, and begin drawing again.  You can deselect Use Clip by clicking
on it again, or by selecting any of the other brush shapes in the Brush
menu.

THE FRAME MENU

We will now examine some miscellaneous, but nonetheless important 
items in ZOETROPE that pertain to its painting capabilities.  These
will enable you to alter your artwork in various ways, although they are
also closely tied in with ZOETROPE's animation features, which we'll
be addressing in the next tutorial.

Take a look at the Frame menu.  Plenty of items there.  We've already
covered Undo, and we've described Restore as it's used in the Ppalette
menu.  There's another use for it which we'll discuss when we talk 
about ZOETROPE's animation capabilities.  So let's move on the Separate.

Separate is a global color change that replaces every occurance of a
specific color on your screen with the currently selected drawing color.
It's a fast way to knock out complicated images (by replacing parts of
them with black) or to radically change the color of an image without
having to alter your Palette.

Let's test it.  First, let's set up a colorful screen.  Select the biggest
brush shape, activate Cycle, turn on the Airbrush and spatter the screen
with color.
page 44--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Now, pick a color from the color menu that you want another color on
screen changed to (say, red).  Select Separate from the Frame menu,
place the mouse cursor over the screen color you wish changed (say, 
puce).  Left-click, and wherever that color exists on screen, it will be
changed to the current color.

Separate Many works a little differently.  First, bring up the Palette
menu, and adjust the Color Range Bar to cover some five or six colors
you want to change.  Now, select a drawing color you want them
changed to. Exit the Palette menu, select Separate Many, and all the
colors within the Color Range Bar will be changed to the drawing
color.  (Notice that the keyboard alternative for Separate is the dash, or
hyphen, while the alternative for Separate Many is the underscore.)

Now, don't erase your workscreen!  We're going to save it to disk,
because we'll need it lter when we talk about ZOETROPE's animation
abilities.  Yes, we're finally here - we're going to do our own
computerized cartoons.

NOTE:  If you already erased your screen, don't fret.  Just make up
another abstract screen with a lot of colors.

THE LOAD/SAVE MENU

Okay, it's time to save your masterpiece on a disk.  Don't worry if it's
not an electronic recreation of the Mona Lisa; whatever you've drawn,
even if it's a screen full of multicolored scribbles, will be fine for or
purposes.
Place a blank, formatted disk in whichever drive you wish to use as a
data drive.  If yo have a single-disk system, replace your ZEOTROPE
disk with the blank disk.

NOTE:  Once ZOETROPE is booted, its disk no longer needs to 
remain in the drive.
page 45--------------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL II: DRAWING

Now, select Load/Save from the Menu drop-down.  The Load/Save
menu is filled with a variety of functions, only a few of which we're
concerned with at the moment.  For now, Load/Save allows you to load
and/or save your work to disk in various file formats, indicated by their
particular file extender names.

We'll be saving a single, static (non-animated) picture, so the file
format we're interested is .ic, a standard, low-resolution IFF file.
Click in the .pic box to select that file format, then click on Save.

A special ZOETROPE file selector appears.  At its left are a list of files
from the current disk (or drawer).  If you have placed your blank disk in
the same drive that contained the ZOETROPE disk, the file window 
will be empty.  If you have placed your blank disk in an external drive,
such as DF1, click on DF1: to switch the file path to that disk.  (If
you're using a hard disk, click on the proper partition.)

We'll call our picture MONALISA.  Click in the field to the right of
File:.  A square cursor will appear.  Press [Esc] to erase any letters in
the field, then type MONALISA, and either press [Return] or click on
OK.  You don't need to type in a file extender, because you already set
that from the Load/Save menu.

The disk drive runs, and your picture is saved to disk.

Okay!  You've completed the paint program portion of ZOETROPE.
It's a good idea, at this point, to go back and play with all the various
drawing options we've discussed until you're familiar with them.  When
you're ready, move on to the next tutorial.  If you wish, you may exit
ZOETROPE, and reboot at any time you wish to begin the next
tutorial.
page 46 IS BLANK
page 47------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

                ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III - CELL ANIMATION

Okay, you've learned how to draw with ZOETROPE, it's time you
learned how to move your drawings.  We're going to do a simle, flat
(cel) animation sequence.

But first, let's talk again about the Playback Bar at the bottom of the
main menu screen.  (Yes, we covered this in the first tutorial, but it's
an important part of the ZOETROPE system, so we thought we'd hit it
one more time in greater detail.  If you feel secure with the Playback
Bar, jump ahead to 'A Simple Animation', following this.)

From left to right, the icons in the Playback Bar are:

First Frame	Click on this to move immediately to the
		first frame of your animation.

Fast Reverse	This fast-plays your animation sequence
		backwards.

Reverse Play	This plays your animation sequence backwards,
		using the speed set in the Time menu.
page 48------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Create Frame/Previous	This inserts a copy of the current workscreen
			in the current frame position, and pushes the
			remaining frames to the right.  Thus, if you
			Create Frame/Previous while on frame #3, a
			copy of frame #3 is placed in position #3,
			and frame #3 (pls all subsequent frames) are
			shifted to the right.

Move Frame Backward	Each click on this moves you one frame
			backward in your animation sequence.  You
			may hold down the mouse button to scroll
			backward.

Frame Counter Bar	The number in this box indicates which
			frame of your animation sequence you are
			currently working on.  Clicking within the
			bar on either side of the number box will
			move you to a frame either before or after
			the one in the box.  Left will move to a
			previous frame; right to a later frame.  You
			can move thorugh your animation in real-
			time by dragging the Frame Counter Bar to
			the right or left. (There must be at least two
			frames for there to be a slider bar.)

Move Frame Forward	Each click on this moves you one frame
			forward in your animation sequence.  You 
			may hold down the mouse button to scroll forward.

Create Frame/Next	This inserts a copy of the current workscreen
			in the frame position after the current one
			and pushes the remaining frames to the
			right.  Thus, if you Create Frame/Next
			while on frame #3, a copy of frame #3 is
			placed in position #4, and frame #4 (plus all
			subsequent frames) are shifted to the right.

Forward Play		This plays your animation sequence forward,
			at the speed set in the Time menu.

Fast Forward		This fast-plays your animation sequence
			forward.
page 49------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Last Frame		Click on this to move immediately to the
			last frame in your animation sequence.

Total Frames		This displays the total number of frames in
			your animation sequence.

NOTE:  If you left-click on this number (or press [Return], 10 
frames will be added to the end of your animation sequence, all
identical to your last frame.

Frame Mode		This displays a single letter indicating the
			current frame mode: To Frame (f), To
			Segment (s), or To All (a).  Which frames
			are affected by certain ZOETROPE operations
			will depend on the frame mode setting.

A SIMPLE ANIMATION

Now that we've reviewed the Playback Bar, let's try it out.

Click on the Create Frame/Next icon four times.  With each click,
you'll notice that the Frame Counter Bar shrinks as you subdivide the
Counter strip into equal portions.  Also, the number within the bar
reflects the number of the current frames.  Over on the right, the Total
Frames box displays the total number of frames.  Since you've added
four frames, there should be a total of five frames in the Total Frames
box.

Want to try it again?  Simple - select Kill Seq from the Menu drop-
down, and reply 'Yes' to the requester.  You've just erased all your
frames, and you're back to one frame.  Okay, use the Create Frame/Next
icon to create five empty frames again.

Now that you have a real Frame Counter Bar, you can drag the
numbered box right and left to place yourself at the different parts of
your animation.  But since we havn't created anything yet, there's no
noticeable change.  Drag the number bar back to frame #1, and let's 
create something.

Select a nice, bright color from the Color menu, and choose default
brush #1 (the cross) from the Brush menu, and select Draw from the
page 50------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Draw menu.  Now, go to the center of your workscreen and draw the
number 1, about an inch high or so.  That's it - nothing fancy.

Let's move on the the next frame.  Click on the Move Frame Forward
icon, just to the right of the Frame Slider Bar.  This will bring you to
frame #2.  As yo click, you'll notice your screen going black.  This
isn't surprising, since you havn't drawn anything on this frame yet.
Right-click to return to the workscreen, and draw a number 2.

Let take a shortcut to frame #3.  Instead of returning to the Playback
Bar, clicking, then returning to the workscreen, simly press the right
cursor arrow key.  The screen will be black, and you'll be working on
frame #3.  Okay, draw a number 3.  Use the same technique ot draw a
number 4 on frame #4, and a number 5 on frame #5.

Now we're ready to play our animation.  Right-click to bring up the
Playback Bar, then click on the Forward Play icon.  You'llnotice that 
you're now moving at speed through this animated sequence, flipping
very quickly from the first frame to the last, then starting again on 
frame one.

From tiny acorns grow mightly oaks; what you've just done is the
foundation upon which you can create truly impressive, animated
Amiga graphics.

Right-click to stop your animation at any point.  Now, try dragging the
Frame Counter Bar back and forth for real-time control of your
animation.

Next, select Ping Pong from the Modes menu, then click again on
Forward Play.  Your number animation will now move back and forth.
Is your animation moving a little too fast?  Select Time from the
Menu.  The slider bar in the second row from the top controls the
playback speed.  The higher the number, the slower the playback.  Drag
the number to a higher value and try your animation again (you can
play it directly from the Time menu).

Ping Pong is useful for certain rhythmic movements.  For example, if
you have a dozen frames of a bird's wings flapping, moving down, then
back up, Ping Pong would enable you to create a realistic movement in
half the normal number of frames.)  Turn off Ping Pong before proceeding.
page 51------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Now, let's try a more advanced animation.  But first, let's examine how
we can delete our current animation sequence. We showed you Kill seq
earlier, which deletes all frames from memory.  But what if we want to
delete a chosen few?

Drag the Frame Counter so that frame #3 is displayed.  Now, select
Delete from the Frame menu.  A requestor asks yo to confirm the
deletion.  Go ahead and answer 'Yes'.  Frame #3 is deleted from the
middle of the animation, and you now have a total of four frames
containing the drawn numbers: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5.

We can also delete a segment, or range of frames.  Select Time again
from the Menu.  From the Time menu, you may alter the overall 
playback speed of an animation sequence, and you may determine which
portion of your animation is affected by various ZOETROPE functions 
- such as Delete.

You'll notice the Playback bar duplicated on the top of the Time menu.
Below it are boxes for More (which enables you to load in the
remainder of an animation that, in its entirety, cannot fit into your
Amiga's memory), the Animation Speed bar, Tween (which enables 
you to perform sequential movements on objects and paste them on
some or all of your frames), and the To Frame, To Segment and To All
boxes.

On the bottom row is the Segment Range Bar, which allows yo to set
the range of frames uon which ZOETROPE will perform certain
functions.  This bar is adjusted in exactly the same way as the Color
Range Bar that we used reviously in the Palette menu.  We only have
four frames in our animation, but let's adjust the range to include only
the middle frames #2, and # 3.  Drag one range dot to the right until the
number on the right of the bar reads [3], adjust the other end of the bar
so the number to the left reads[2].  (You may also adjust these by
clicking on the arrows to either side of the Range Bar).  Notice, that if 
you reverse the direction of the bar, the numbers to the right and left
will be reversed.
page 52------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Above the bar, To Frame is highlighted, indicating that our oerations
are being performed only on the single frame currently displayed. We
want to delete our segment of frame #2 through frame #3, so click on
To Segment.  Now, right-click to exit the Time menu, and select
Delete again from the Frame menu.

This time, the requester asks if you want to delete frames #2 through
#3.  Click on 'Yes', return to the Playback Bar, and look at your 
frames. You onliy have two frames remaining, containing the drawn
numbers 1 and 5.

Take a closer look at the Playback Bar. At the extreme right, in the
Frame Mode box is the letter 's' against a red background.  This
indicates we're in To Segment frame mode.  Click once on the 's', and
it becomes an 'a', for To All.  This is a shortcut to selecting frame
modes from the Time menu.  Click again, and it returns to the familiar
'f', for To Frame.  The red in the 's' and 'a' boxes is simly to remind
yo that you are in a frame mode that will affect several frames, and
cannot be undone.

Set the frame mode To All (a), then select Clear Pic from the Frame
Menu.  A requester appears asking if you want to 'do it (clear) over all
frames?'  Left-click on Yes.  ZOETROPE will move through all the
frames in your animation and clear them out.

Note the difference between using Delete to a range of frames, and Clear
Pic to a range of frames.  This time, we did not delete the frames - we
still have two frames left - we simply cleared the images within the
existing frames.

Play around with what we've just looked at.  Create some frames; draw 
on them; animate them; delete them individually, or by ranges;
experiment with the different frames modes.

BLUEING AND CHANGES

Let's do another short, simple animation sequence - a winking face.

Kill the animation you have in memory, put ZOETROPE in To Frame
mode, and create five blank frames.  Select the small round brush, ick
a bright color from the Color menu, then go to frame #1 of your
page 53------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

animation.  In the center of yor workscreen, draw a face, similiar to the
one shown in the figure below.

         (drawing of smiling face with round open eyes)

Now from the Frame menu, select Next Blue.  A copy of your frame
#1 is placed in frame #2, then 'blued'.  Blueing is a term taken
from 'non-repro blue' used in offset printing.  In ZOETROPE, we use
it to line up - or register- our pervious frame images so we can alter
them slightly to create animations.

NOTE: The blueing color will always be whatever color is in color
register #1. At default, this is dark blue, but will change with
different alettes.  If you're using a palette in which the blueing
color does not show well, simle adjust color register #1 from the
Palette menu to a more contrasting color.

The Next Blue command has conveniently left uus in frame #2 to
contine our cel animation. Trace over the face, as nearly as you can,
but this time, alter one of the eyes to an oval shape - as though it's 
beginning to wink.
page 54------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

    (picture of smiling face with beginning of wink)

Now, let's do a Next Blue again, but this time, use the keyboard
alternative, so you don't have to exit the menu screen each time -
press [/].  (All the blueing keyboard alternatives are in the keypad
area to the right of your keyboard.)

Next Blue not only copies and blues the previous drawing, it also
relaces the blueing color in the previous frame with whatever was
there before, leaving our new details intact.  We'll see this when we go
back to relay our animation.

Now, repeat the procedure described above the for next three frames.
Trace another face with more of a wink, press [/] for Next Blue, and
repeat until you've reached frame five.

   (3 picture of smiling face completing the wink)
page 55------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

When you reach the last frame(the eye should be completely closed; a
mere line), Next Blue will simly remove the blueing color.  Now
lay your animation from the Playback Bar.  (You may want to speed
up the playback rate from the Time menu.)

Voila!  You've just created an even more interesting animation.  A bit
simple, again, but you're well on your way to mastering ZOETROPE's
animation functions.

Well, this is fine, you say, but my face is jiggling all over the screen!
Not only the eye is animated, but the entire head as well.

So, how do we animate only a portion of our sequence?  Easy, let's
make the same animation, but only animate the winking eye.  First
delete the entire animation sequence by selecting Kill Seq from the
Menu dro-down.  When you have only one frame, draw your face
again, but this time, leave out the winking eye.

So, okay, now we have a one-eyed face.  Now, create four more frames
by clicking on the create Frame/Next icon in the Playback Bar four
times.

Drag the Frame Counter Bar back and forth, and you'll see that all five
frames contain identical, one-eyed faces.  Okay, move back to frame #1,
draw the first version of the winking eye where it belongs, then press
[/] to Next Blue it.

Because Next Blue only blues the changes that occur from the previous
frame, only the winking eye is blued to the next frame.

The rest is easy.  Trace over the blued eye in frame #2, press [/] to
move to frame #3, and so on until you've comleted your animation.
When you play it back this time, only the eye is animated, while the
rest of the drawing remains rock-steady.

When you selected Next Blue, it automatically went through the
following steps: Go to the next frame, copy the image to the next
frame, blue the image, unblue the image in the previous frame.  We can
do these steps manually using the Blue Pic and Unblue Pic functions.

First Kill all frames, then draw an image in frame #1.  Next, click on
Create Frame/Next to copy the image to frame #2.  From frame #2,
select Blue pic - the entire picture is blued.  Trace a new picture in
page 56------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

frame #2, then click on Create Frame/Next to copy it to frame #3.  Go
back to frame #2, and select Unblue ic to erase the blueing.  And, so
on.  Obviously, Next blue is a lot easier, but there are times when you
need the flexibility of using just one of the blueing tools.

And there are a few more options in the Frame menu that help in 
creating cel animations.

A standard method of animation is to first 'rough in' the extreme
positions, then return and add the 'betweens', and then, must later, the
colors.  The History and Unhistory functions are designed for this.

Kill any animation,create five blank frames, make sure the Color
Range Bar covers all colors in the Palette menu, and activate Cycle in
The Color menu.  Select a large brush and draw a large multi-color
number in each frame, labeling them from one to five.  Deactivate
Cycle.

Now, move to frame #3 and click on Create Frame/Next [F7].  You are
now on frame #4 (which dislays a duplicate number 3), the original
number 3 is in frame #3 to the left, and the drawn number 4 (which was
in frame #4 is now frame #5 to the right.  Confused?  Don't worry
about it.

Select Clear Pic to erase the duplicate drawn 3, then select History.
Your frame now contains a blue silhouette of the previous frame's
image, and a red silhouette of the next frame's image.  If this were an
animation, you could use these as references to draw your 'between'.

Go ahead and draw a squiggle.  Notice that no matter what color you
were using before, you are now drawing with a bright green.  Select
Unhistory and all colors except the bright green are removed.  Look at
your color palette.  Whenever History is selected, color registers #1-#7
are altered to provide the proper overlap shading.  History and Unhistory
are only effective when used for monochrome work - such as that used
in initial animation. Later, you can restore your palettes and begin full
coloring.

You cannot entirely undo a History by pressing [Help].  Go ahead and
try it; your images are restored, but not the palette.  To completely
undo a History, use the Restore function in the Frame menu.
page 57------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Get Changes and Next Changes are similiar to Blue Pic and Next Blue
- except that they deal with the changes drawn within the current
frame, since arriving there. The concept of what is considered a change
is important.  As we said, changes are any drawing that is done to a
frame since you arrived at that frame.  Once you leave the frame, the
changes are part of the permanent image.  If, for example, you draw in
frame #2 (using different drawing tools, brushes, colors - or clip
buffer pastes), then you move to frame #3, and right back to frame #2.
The very action of moving out and back into frame #2 makes the
previous changes permanent.  Only those changes made now that you're
back in frame #2 will be considered 'changes'.

To demonstrate the Get Changes and Next Changes fetures, first Kill
all frames, then press create four empty frames.  Return to frame #1
and, using the Box function in the Draw menu, draw a red box, about 2-
inches square, in the center of the screen.

We want this box to be permanent, and this is easily done: move over
to frame #2, then back to frame #1.  The box is now permanent.  Now,
we'll add some changes. Using the same color, select Circle from the
Draw menu, place the cursor on one corner of the box (any corner) and
create a circle that overlaps about halfway into the box.  (Of course,
yo can't see the part that's inside the box because it's the same color.)
Next, select a different color (like yellow), a think brush, and Draw
from the Draw menu.  Draw a squiggly line across boh the box and the
circle, and into the background.

Okay, we're all set.  We have a ermanent red box, plus two changes:
the red circle and the yellow line.  Now, select Get Changes. Nothing
much seems to hapen, but what really occured was that all the changes
were placed in the clip buffer.  (Remember the clip buffer?)  There are
plenty of ways to view the cli buffer, but first, let's move to a blank 
screen so we can really see what's going on.

Move to frame #2, select Paste from the Cli buffer, and paste it to
frame #2 without moving it.  Hmmm...the changes are there, but
what's wrong with the red circle - there's a corner missing.  The 
missing corner exactly matches the overlaping red box from frame #1.
Flip back and forth between frames #1 and #2 to see the difference.  The
reason the corner is missing is because it is a part of the permanent
image in frame #1, and, because the circle was the same color, there
was no change of image in that area of the screen.  The squiggle line
was in a different color, so all of it was considered a change.
page 58------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Let's try Next Changes.  As we said, it's a little like Next Blue.  Move
to frame #3, and draw another red box, just like the one in frame #1.
Make the box ermanent by moving to frame #4, then back to frame
#3.  Now, create the same changes as we did before: the red,
overlapping circle, and the yellow squiggly line.  Now, select Next
Changes.  This time, ZOETROPE automatically moves to the next 
frame in the animation and pastes the changes to frame #4.  (It does
not, however, place the changes in the clip buffer.  You can see this by
selecting Move to see the resent contents of the clip buffer.)

Now that you understand changes, we can demonstrate Restore.  We've
already demonstrated how it can be used in the Palette menu and with 
History.  It can also be used as a more powerful version of Undo.  If
you'll remember, Undo only restores the last drawing function you did.
Restore, on the other hand, restores all changes.  (Actually, it erases all
changes, restoring the original frame.)

Try this:  Yo've already got several frames with images on them.
From any frame, select another color, then scribble something.  Change
colors, tools, and brushes, and draw all over the screen - bt don't
leave the frame. Now, select Restore.  Like magic, all yor changes are
gone.

It's imortant to note that Restore is not a toggle like [Help].  If yo
select it a second time, you changes will not return.  However, yo can
press [Help] immediately after a Restore to get your changes back.  If,
however, you have already selected Restore a second time, [Help] will
no longer restore your changes.

There's only one more thing to cover in the Frame menu: Flip 5.  This
is a special playback mode designed specifically to assist cel animation
design.  Animators are constantlyi flipping through the pages of their
flip books to get a feel of how the movement is progressing.  When
yo select Flip 5 (most easily done by pressing the [Enter] key on your
keypad), ZOETROPE plays once through five frames - the two
before, the current frame, and the two following - before returning to
the current frame.

You can easily see this by creating eight frames and numbering them.
Now, move to frame #5 and press [Enter].  ZOETROPE plays frames
#3 thorugh #7, then returns to frame #5.
page 59------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

NOTE that Flip 5 affects none of the functions usually affected by
leaving a frame, including Undo, Restore, and the various Blue nad
Changes functions.

COMPOSITING

Let's take another look at the Load/Save menu.  Kill the animation you
now have in memory, then select Load/Save from the Menu drop-down
to bring up the Load/Save menu.  We saw how to save our
MONALISA picture earlier, let's reload it.  From the Load/Save menu,
select .pic and click on Load.  From the file selector, either double-click
on the MONALISA file title in the file window, or click once on
MONALISA, then click on OK. (Or, if you know the name of your
file, you could enter it directly in the File: field.)

Take a look at the picture on your screen.  We're going to use it for
further demonstration, but first, we need to make sure there are some
areas in it that contain the background color (color #0; probably black).
If there are, you can leave it the way it is.  If not, select the largest
brush you can find, and color #0 from the color menu (it's the one in
the upper-left corner).  Now, draw a couple of black smudges here and
there on the screen.  Got it?  Okay, save MONALISA to disk again.

MONALISA is a icture type of file. Let's take a look at an 
animation, or .rif, file.  From the Load/Save menu click on .rif, then
click on Load.  Select the file called FISH.RIF.

Just before the FISH.RIF file loads, the MONALISA picture is erased
from memory.  As FISH.RIF loads, each frame is displayed on the
screen (FISH.RIF is a four-frame animation).  Now that you have fish
up there, animate it with the Playback Bar.

Let's underlay our MONALISA icture to frame #3 of the FISH
sequence.  Move to frame #3.  From the Load/Save menu, select .pic
and Under, then click on Load.  Select and load MONALISA.PIC from
the file selector.  Because you've chosen Under, the picture appears
beneath the fish.

Go back and take a look at the animation now.  As you move through,
you can see that your background only appears in frame #3, and it's
behind the fish.  You may notice that your background isn't exactly the
same color as it was originally. That's because it was probably made
page 60------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

from a different color palette, and we're using the FISH.RIF color
palette now.  When using Normal to load a file, ZOETROPE changes
to the color palette of the loaded file.  When using Under or Over to
load a file, ZOETROPE maintains the palette of the image(s) in
memory, but automatically trys to match the palette of the loaded file
- as best it can - to that in memory.  This may or may not be very
successful, depending on the differences between the two palettes.

Let's try something else.  Kill the animation, then load MONALISA 
again. (Remember to set the mode to Normal first.)  Now, we want to
load the fish as an overlya, using MONALISA as a background. But
all we have is one frame.  So, click onthe Total frames number to
create ten duplicate Mona Lisa's.

Okay, we have plenty of frames to fit our little, four-frame FISH.
Where shall we overlay it?  Adjust the Frame Counter to frame #4,
click on .rif in the Load/Save menu, and select Over.  Click on Load
and select FISH.RIF.

When the fish appears on your screen, it's surrounded by a box.
ZOETROPE is waiting for you to position him on the screen.  At this
oint, you may simply right-click to continue the load at the given
position, or you may drag the box elsewhere, and relase the mouse
button to continue the load.  A requester asks if you want to merge the
file starting at frame #4; go ahead, answer Yes.  Once the load is
comlete, look through the animation - the fish swims over the
backgrounds in frames #4 - #7.

We can also underlay the fish.  Move to frame #8, click on Under, and
load the fish back in.  He still apears in his box on top of the
background, but this is only for positioning. Drag the fish to where at
least part of hiim is over a black (or background) color on the screen.
This time, the fish animation will be pasted on each frame beneath the
background.

We have a few more tricks up our sleeves.  Kill the animation, then
press [Return] a couple of times to create 21 bklank frames.  What we
want to do is load three versions of the FISH sequence end to end.  If
we did a Normal load of FISH.RIF right now, it would erase our 21
blank frames.  (Remember, a Normal load erases and replaces anything
in memory, even blank frames.)  So, all we need to do is load
FISH.RIF as either an overlay or underlay.  (It doesn't matter, since
we're loading it to blank frames.)  So, go ahead, load FISH.RIF,
page 61------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

beginning at frame #1 as an overlay.  Once it's in, move to frame #5,
and load it again; then move to frame #9, and load it again.

So, now we have an animation of 21 frames, but only the first 12
contain our fishies, so let's get rid of the rest.  You already know how
to do this: adjust the Segment Range Bar in the Time menu to cover
frames #13 - #21, select To Segment as the frame mode, then press
[Del].  Answer the requester with a 'Yes', and they're gone.

Now that we've shown the concept of creating empty frames and
merging animations with Under or Over, let's demonstrate the easy way
to do it.  Kill the entier animation, then reload FISH.RIF in Normal 
mode.  Now, click on Splice and load it two more times.

Now we're moving!  Okay, back to the Time menu, adjust the Segment
Range to cover frames #3 through #9, and leave the frame mode at To
Segment.  Return to the Load/Save menu, and load MONALISA as an
underlay.  You guessed it, ZOETROPE loads the background to frames
#3 to #9.

Before you go on, click the frame mode back to To Frame.  It's always
a good idea to keep the frame mode in To Frame to avoid accidentallyi
changing a whole range of frames.  Remember, there's no undo on a
range change.  It's also a good idea to place the Load option back to
Normal after you're through with overlays or underlays.  (By the way,
overlay and underlay have no effect on Saves.)

What else can we do in the Load/Save menu?  Well, a couple of options
we'll just mention.  The .col file is nothing more than a color palette.
If you have a particluar color palette you like, save it as a .col file.
Load a .col file to change the palette in memory.

The .win file is used to save or load clip buffers.  It will also load
Delux Paint Brush files.  Let's try a clip file.  Move to a frame that
has both the fish and the background.  Let's put a small portion of the
screen in the clip buffer; press [~] (just above [Tab], same as selecting
Cut), and clip out the fish's head, along with some of the background.
Paste the clipped image elsewhere on the screen to confirm the contents o
of the clip buffer.  Now, return to the Load/Save menu, select .win,
and Save.  When the file selector comes up, enter the filename:
FISHHEAD in the File field, and press [Return].  As with all
ZOETROPE file save operations, the .win extender will automatically
be added.
page 62------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

What we've just done is save only the conents of the cli buffer to a
disk file for later access.  Before we load it back in, let's change the
contents of the cli buffer so we can be sure of the effect.  Simplyi clip
out another portion of the screen, then Move the clip buffer to be sure
that it's different than the segment we just saved.  Now, select Load
(Over and Under have no effect on .win or .col functions), and choose
FISHHEAD.WIN from the file selector box.  When the drive stops
turning, go back to the workscreen, and select Move to view the cli
buffer contents.  There's our old fish head, and it's back in its original
location.  

We'll talk about .APM in the APM f/x tutorial, following.  How about 
Ppatch?  atch is a sophisticated disk I/O function that lets you load,
edit, then save - all to the same file - sub-segments of .rif files.
You should never use it without first backing up the .rif file that you're
editing. To be especially safe, place yor backed-up .rif file on a blank
disk with plenty of room.

There should be plenty of room on the data disk we've been working
on.  On your ZOETROPE data disk is a .rif file called MRBLOB.RIF,
which was created by Steve Segal.  Before using it, copy it to your own
data disk.  There are several ways you can do this.  You could Quit
ZOETROPE to the Workbench and use the CLI Copy function to
transfer the file from one disk to another.  Or, you could select Pause
from the Menu, which will freeze ZOETROPE and place you in the
Workbench were you could use CLI to copy the file.  (To return to
ZOETROPE from the Workbench, either click on the front-to-back icon
in the upper-right of the screen, or drag the Workbench screen down,
then select Yes to 'Restore Zoetrope'.)  Or you could load the file into
memory, switch disk paths (or disks), then save the animation to the
new disk.  We'll describe the third method in detail.

Place your ZOETROPE data disk in whichever drive you've been using
for it, and load MRBLOB.RIF.  Once the entire animation is in
memory, swap the ZOETROPE data disk with your working data disk,
then save the file.  Youu are now ready to proceed.

Play the entire animation so you're familiar with it, and note the total
number of frames.  We'll be patching in frames #5 - #12, to begin with.

All right, Kill the entire animation in memory, then click on Patch in
the Load/Save menu - the Patch sub-menu appears.  The top three
page 63------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

All right, Kill the entire animation in memory, then click on Patch in
the Load/Save menu - the Patch sub-menu appears.  The top three
slider bars let us determine which portion of the .rif file we want to
load.  Adjust the Start slider to 5 (frame #5 is where we want to begin);
adjust the Frames slider to 7 (we're going to load 7 frames, starting at
frame #5); adjust the KBytes slider to about 200 (more than enough).
Click on Load Patch, select the MRBLOB.RIF file to load, and
ZOETROPE will lace only frames #5 - #12 in memory.  The frame
counter, however, will reflect the actual number of frames (#1 - #7).

Once it's loaded, take a look at the animation.  You can see that you're
art way into the animation, and only a portion of the animation is in
memory.

Now, let's do some quick editing. Select Cut from the Clip menu and
cut out some distinct portion of the picture.  (It doesn't matter which
frame, the cliped part should be about two inches square.)  Select To
All as the Frame Mode, Rotate from the Clip menu, place the mouse
cursor jst outside the lower-right corner of the clip box, and drag/rotate
the clip image to abot 350 degrees.  Release the mouse btton and
right click.  A requester asks yo if yo know what you're doing.  Sure,
why not.

Okay, play yor newly edited animation.  Before continuing, don't
forget to return to To Frame mode.

Now, bring up the Patch menu, (click on Patch in the Load/Save menu)
and click on Save.  ZOETROPE will go through some disk I/O
operations, and politely inform you of its progress.  When finished, 
your edited segment will have been inserted into the old file.  Right-
click to return to the Load/Save menu, then Load MRBLOB.RIF again.
Play the whole animation, and there's your new stuff smack in the
middle of the animation.

Let's go on aand examine that last visual effect - the Tween.
page 64------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

TWEENING

Tween got its name from the early days of animated cartoons.
Typically, a master animator at one of the major motion picture studios
- Walt Disney, MGM, or Warner Brothers - would draw only the
primary positions of a figure.  The expert artist would draw Mickey
Mouse with his arm outstretched, then draw him with his arm bent up
at the elbow, then draw him point at the ski.  These three drawings
represented the major movements of the figure.  The artist would then
let an apprentice animator take over to draw the 'tweens' - the frames
in-between Mickey's arm movements.

In ZOETROPE, Tween works much the same way.  When active,
Tween takes the beginning and end positions of your cut or clip buffer
contents and copies th emovements sequentially across your frames -
either your entire animation sequence (if you've select To All) or a
specific ranges of frames (if you've selected To Segment).  Tween works
with the Paste, Rotate and Stretch functions from the Clip menu, and
virtually all the image movement features in the APM f/x menu.  It
also affects various of the Pixel f/x, Color f/x, and Palette functions.
(We'll be demonstrating these in a later tutorial.)

Let's take another look at the special effect we did above.  We'll test
Tween with Rotate.  Kill any animation that may be in memory, select
a large brush, a bright color, and draw the first initial of your first name
in the center of your screen, about two inches tall.  Clip the initial
(press [Tab]), Clear the workscreen, then press [Return] to create 11
empty frames.  Finally, set the frames mode to To All (a).
Now, go back to the Clip menu and select Rotate.  As you do, you'll
see your clip buffer appear, with your initial sitting inside.  Place your 
cursor above the cli box, hold down the left mouse button, and drag
the cursor around the cli box (it can be either clockwise or counter-
clockwise).  This will rotate the clip box about its X axis, in
increments of 22.5 degrees.  When you return ot spot you originally
started from (the top), release the mouse btton, then right-click.  A
requester will appear, asking: 'Do it over all frames?'  Select Yes.

When yo select Yes, you'll see your initial being copied across all the
frames of your animation sequence. Tween is taking the incremental
movements from the Rotate command and spreading them across your
entire animation sequence.  (If you had selected a range of frames with
page 65------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

the To Segment command, Tween wouldhave spread, sequentially, the
movements across that range.)

Now, play this forward.  You'll see the letter rotating of its own accord.

You can also experiment with Tween and Paste, allowing yo to
quicklyi move an image across your screen.  Select Paste from the Clip
menu and drag the clip image to one corner of the screen.  A requester
will appear, saying: 'Do it over all frames?'  Click on Yes.

You'll see your clip box copied from its original position, moving
from its starting position to its ending position across all the frames of
your animation sequence.

Click on the Forward Play button to see the results.  You should be
rewarded with your object moving across the screen.

Note that the previous Rotation had no effect on the original clip
image, and it didn't matter which frame we started the Paste-drag from
because we were in To All frame mode.  Agaoin, if you had selected a
range of frames wiht the To Segment command, Tween would have 
spread, sequentially, the movements across that range.

What happens if we turn Tween off?  Simple: the only image pasted is
the one at the end of themovement.  Let's look.  Select Move and
reosition your image elsewhere on the screen.  Now, turn Tween off
(from the Time menu), select Rotate, and rotate the image to nay
number of degrees.  Release the image, answer Yes to the requester, and
watch the results.  The image is pasted to each frame, but only in its
last rotated position.

Turn tween back on, and take a look at the second row of the Time
menu.  To the right of the More box is the Animation Speed Control
Bar, which allows you to increase or decrease the laying speed of your
animations.  The Reference Section offers comlete details of what the
number in the slider bar stands for.  For our puroses, all we need to
know is the higher number, the slower the animation.

Set the animation speed control at 2, its fastest speed, then return to the
main menu and play your moving initial animation.  Try some higher
numbers (slower speeds).
page 66------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL III: CELL ANIMATION

Try this: Set the frame mode to To Segment, and the Segment Range 
Bar to, say, frames #4 through #7.  Now play your animation.
Because only the frames within the Segment Range Bar are played, this
can be very handy for creating a worksace while editing an animation.
You can create any number of 'junk' work frames before or after your
animation segment in whcih to create cli images, then only play back
the segment containing your animation.

Yet one more trick.  Reverse the direction of the Segment Range Bar so
that the diamond is point to the left, and the bar covers all frames of
the animation.  Now, enter the Load/Save menu, make sure you're in
To Segment mode, and save the file (call it RETRO.RIF, or 
something).  Next, change the frame mode to To Frame, and load
RETRO.RIF.  lay it back and you'llnotce it plays backward!
(Actually, it's playing forward.  It was saved backward.)

Before you continue with the next tutorial, Kill the current animation,
reset the seed to 4, and make sure the frame mode is at To Frame.
page 67------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

                ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

ZOETROPE's most powerful feature is the APM f/x (effects) menu.
With it, you can easily animate cliped images, or entire animation
sequences, creating complex, layered animations in minutes.

The APM (Antic Pixel Mover) contains tools very similar to those
found in sophisticated, $100,000 workstations - such as the Mirage,
the Quantel Paintbox, the the Abakus DDR.  You can enlarge images,
shrink them, rotate them about multiple axes, and make them follow
elaborate, twisting paths.

Select APM f/x from the Menu drop-down and examine the menu that
appears.  It might look a little daunting, at first, but it's really very
easy to use.

The APM f/x menu has many features and otions for you to choose
from, some of which we've already covered in detail, such as the
Playback Bar in the top row, and the Segment Range Bar on the second
row.

Before we can use the APM menu, we need an image.  Either a static
image from the clip buffer, or an animation sequence.  If you haven't
already, Kill any animation in memory and make sure that you're in To
Frame mode.  Select a bright color (like red) and select the large square
page 68------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

brush from the brush menu.  Now, turn off Filled from the Modes
men, and select Box from the Draw menu.  Place the square cursor
toward the upper-left ortion of the workscreen, and drag it to the lower-
right to create an index-card-size frame (about 3"x5").

Now, go to Menu, click on Set Font, and select a big font.  Return to
the main menu screen and select Text from the Draw menu, then go to
your workscreen.  Choose a different bright color if you wish, then
place your cursor where yo want your text to start (say, in the center, a
little to the left) and left-click.  Type in your initials in the center of the
screen. When you're finished, go up to the Clip menu, and clip your
entire workscreen, saving it in your clip buffer. This will be our
examle APM screen.

We don't plan on erasing our creation, but why not save the cli buffer
to disk.  Remember how?  Click on .win in the Load/Save menu, then click 
on Save, and give it any filename you like.

Okay, select Clear Pic, and we're ready to go to town.

TURNS

Select APM f/x (or press [A]) to bring up the APM f/x menu.  The 
first thing we're going to do in the APM is a simple turn.  You can 
accomplish a similar effect with the Rotate function, but the APM
menu allows you finer control over your images.

Once the APM f/x menuu appears, press [Return] on your keyboard,
which will add 10 blank frames to your work area.  If they aren't already
active, select All and Tween (at the far right of the APM menu, in the
upper-right corner).  When the APM f/x menu first apears, the word
Turn is highlighted (if not, click on it).  To the right, and below it is
the word Turns.  As we'll see, selecting different words in the Turn,
Size, Move, Path column affects what is displayed to the right.

Don't confuse the singular word Turn with the plural Turns.  When
Turn is selected, you are in a 'Turn mode', and may adjust the Center,
Axiss, and Turns.  The plural Turns is the number of Turns.

Move your cursor to the slider bar below the words 'Full Turns' and
click once on the arrow point left.  The number in the slider bar
should read -1, which means one turn in a clockwise direction.
page 69------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

Turn (singular) allows you to control exactlyi how you want the
contents of your cut buffer or your entire animation sequence to rotate.
With Turn, you can set arbitrary rotation axes by using the slider bars
on the left half of the APM f/x menu.

Turn lets you arbitrarily set the Center (of rotation) of your animation,
the Axis (X-,Y- and Z-coordinates, or the three-dimensional
positioning of your work on the ZOETROPE screen), and the number of
Turns (gross rotational movement, either full or partial turns about
the animation's center).

After setting your Turns, click on Preview in the upper-left of the APM
f/x menu.  You'llnotice a full-screen wire-frame outline of your clip
box rotating clockwise about the Z axis (the clip buffer's center) across
your range of 11 frames.

As you can see, when you select Preview (after setting the APM
motion controls) it will activate a wire-frame rendition of how the
AM will move your animation based on the current APM settings.  If
you have not set any of the motion controls, the Preview function will
show a stationary box sitting on yor workscreen.

Now, let's render our animation.  Move your cursor over to Render and
left-click. Answer Yes to the requester and you'll see your clip box
appearing and disapearing as ZOETROPE renders it across the 11
frames you have allocated (your first frame, plus the 10 frames you
appended).  Render actually creates the final APM version of yor
animation, drawing it on all frames indicated by the frame mode
settings.  (APM f/x are usually used over a range of frames for
animation effects.  However, they can also be effective in To Frame
mode, when youu want to use the flexibility of the APM functions to
manipulate a clipped imate - or screen - before pasting it to the 
single frame.)

NOTE: You can Undo a Render To Frame, but you cannot Undo a 
Render To All or To Segment.  You can, however, aboart a multiple-
frame Render by pressing any key on your keyboard, or by holding
down the right mouse button.  A requester will appear, asking if you
want to abort the Render.  Left-click on Yes or No.

Now, return to the main menu screen and play your animation.  You'll
see an 11-frame animation of your clip box rotation, full-screen.
page 70------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

This rotation is an examle of the simplest, easiest way to manipulate
an image in the APM f/x menu.

AXIS OPERATIONS

Before you return to the APM menu, clear all frames with the Clear ic
command in the Frames menu.  (Don't use the Delete Pic command,
unless you want to create 10 more frames.)  Since you are in To all
mode, a requester will apear, asking if you want to do it (clear) to all
frames.  Select Yes, the contents of every frame will be erased, then
when your workspace is clear, return to the APM menu.

Now, we're going to do something similar to the last movement, but
we're going to add a twist.  Click on Axis in the APM f/x menu and
you'll see three slider boxes appear on the right, with designator boxes
beneath them.  Axis lets you set which plane your clip box or screen
will rotate about.

The top slider bar sets the X or horizontal axis, the middle slider bar
sets the Y or vertical axis, and the bottom slider sets the Z or depth
axis.

You can set the Axes with the three slider bars on the right of the AM
f/x menu.  The three Axis sliders together represent a vector, or 3-D
location in space, about which yor artwork will be rotating.  Altering
a single axis value will not make a discernable change in rotation, but
altering two or three axes will produce interesting multi-axis rotations.

Experiment with the axis sliders individually.  We've already seen the Z
rotation.  Select the X box at the bottom left, then select Preview.
You'll see the wire-frame clip box rotating around the X axis.  Now,
select the Y box (bottom center) and then select Preview.  You'll see
the wire-frame clip box spinning about the Y axis.

Now that you've previewed the three single-axis rotations, let's look at
a double axis rotation. Click on the Y box (if you aren't set there
already), then drag the X axis slider (the top one) to a setting of 100.
Now, select Preview and take a look.  As you can see, yor clip box is
now spinning about two axes in a multi-axis rotation.  Select Render
and view the completed animation. The rotation now has a diagonal
vector since you've added one axis to another.
page 71------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

CENTER

Now we're going to explore the Center option.  First, clear out your
animation with the Clear Pic option from the Frame menu, then go
back to the APM and click on the Y axis (which zeros the other two 
axes).  Select Center and three new slider bars will appear to the right.

Again, from the top down, the three sliders represent the X, Y, and Z
axes.  This time, they represent the setting for the center of rotation.
We're using the same coordinate system, where X and Y are at zero in
the upper-left corner of the screen, and X increases with movement to
the right, while Y increases with movement downward.  The Z axis 
remains at zero at the center of the screen, increases on movement
outward, and decreases on movement inward.

For purposes of this tutorial, we won't go into details about the
coordinates.  The Reference Section has a comlete description of the
slider coordinates.  Besides, there's an easier way to set the center.

Without touching any of the axis slider bar settings, click on the
Mouse XY box below them.  A set of crosshairs and centerpoint
coordinates will apear on your workscreen, along with a second cross
indicating the current center position.  Move the centeroint to the
upper-left quadrant of your screen (50, 50, or so you don't have to be
exact) - approximately an inch away from the left edge of your screen,
then left-click to set the new centerpoint position.  As you do, you'll be
dropped back to the APM menu, where you'll see the new coordinates
appearing in the slider bar indicator boxes.

Go up to Preview and select it.  You'll see your clip box rotating about
the new centeroint - the one you just set manually with Mouse XY.
After you've reviewed the movement, go u and select Render, and
play the animation.

When you're finished, clear out all your frames and return to the APM
menu.  Note:  Selecting Default will set your center of rotation to be
the center of the cli box (if you are in Clip mode) or the center of your
screen (if you are in Sequence mode).
page 72------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

SIZE

Now we're going to exeriment with Size. Size allows you to shrink
or expand your artwork, any or all of your frames.  You can also select
a specific vanishing point (Center) where you want your art to shrink to
or expand from, and the Scale (the amount your artwork will shrink or
expand.)

First, left-click on Clear (and Yes in the requester) to clear out all of
your APM settings, then select Size. As you do, two indicator boxes
and two slider bars appear on the right side of the APM menu.

The Reduce and the Enlarge indicators work the the Size Ratio box
(the box with the number, under Scale, when Size is activiated).  When 
you set a scale, the new size of your artowkr is equal to the Reduce
factor divided by the Enlarge factor.  In mathmetical terms,s Reduce and
Enlarge are the numbers that indicate multiply and divisor  factors for an
image size, sch as your clip box.

Reduce starts out at 100.  If you move it down without altering the
Enlarge settings, it will reduce your artwork.  Enlarge starts out at 100.
If you move it down without altering the Reduce setting, it will enlarge
your artwork.

Now, drag the Reduce slider to 50.  As you alter the setting, you'll
notice the numbers changing in the box beneath the Scale indicator.  At
50, your clip box is now at .50, or 50 percent.

Select Preview.  Yo'll see your clip box shrink down across 11 frames
until it's half its original size.

Now we're going to try something a little different.  Move your cursor
up to Tween and toggle it off.  Then select Preview.  You'll see a
stationary box.  Now, select Render.

As you do, you'll see your shrunken clip box reproduced on every frame
of your animation.  By first setting the Clip/Seq box to Seq, this is
how you can shrink down entire animation sequences (necessary,
sometimes, to conserve memory).

Okay, let's try something else. Clear out all your frames and return to
the APM menu.  Toggle Tween back on, select Center, then select
page 73------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

Mouse XY.  lace your cursor and click in the upper-left area of your
screen, about one inch from the left edge. Select Scale and make sure
Reduce is still set at 50.

Select review and, after you've seen how the effect is going to look,
select Render.

This illustrates several of the functions we've just covered.  Not only
can you shrink or enlarge your image, you can make it shrink or expand
to a secific center or vanishing point.

MOVE

Here's a way to do scrolling wipes or moving titles with ZOETROPE.
Select Clear, then select Move from the APM menu.  Move lalows you
to move your artwork in a straight path, from one point on your screen
to another.  The three slider bars that appear on the right side of the
APM f/x menu allow you to set the Move coordinate points.  Again,
the bars adjust, from top to bottom, the X, Y, and Z azes.

After you've selected Move, move the top slider all the way to the
right, then select Preview.  You'll see your cli box move off to the
right across your 11 frames.  

Okay, slide the middle bar all the way to the right, Preview it. Now
you know a nifty way to do a diagonal wipe.

Onward!  Clear your frames, go back and set the Y axis (the moddle bar)
back to 0 and slide the Z axis (bottom bar) all the way to the right.
review, and Render it. You see your image flying off in the
distance and to one side.

When you're finished, clear out your frames and return to the APM,
then click on Clear to erase your previous settings.
page 74------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

THE PATH OPTIONS

The path options in ZOETROE allow you to move an image on a
predetermined corse, or path, about your screen.

Select Path, and four option buttons will appear in a column on the
right side of the APM f/x menu.

The first one we'll play with is Path of Points.  this allows you to set
a specific pathway on which you want to move your animation.

First, we're going to have to eliminate our venerable initials box. It's
served us nobly but we won't be needing it again.  Return to the main
screen, select a medium-sized brush fromthe Brush menu and draw a
hollow box about an inch-and-a-half square.  When you've finished
drawing it, Clip it [Tab], Kill all frames, then press [Return] twice to
make 21 blank frames.

Return to the APM and select Path of Points.  The full screen will
appear with the cursor and your clip box.  To define a path, move your
cursor around on the screen and click your left mouse button to set each
path point, connected by line segments.  For this example, make apath
going from one art of your screen to another (make it zig-zag) or else
make it in the center area of your screen, starting at the bottom and
working your way around, a rough diamond shae, say. Whatever your
ath shape, lay down about half-a-dozen points.

When your'e finished defining your ath, right-click to return to the
APM f/x menu and then select Preview.  When you do, you'll see your
clip box image moving along the path, starting from its original
position.  
When you move your artwork along this tye of ath, it will take the
same amount of time to travel between each oint.  Therefore, it will
apear to travel faster between points thatare far apart, and more slowly
between points that are close together. Try another Path of Points.
this time, cluster several oints close together, followed by several
widely spaced.  review, then Render the results.

Now, clear your frames and return to the APM menu.  Select Clocked 
Samled Path.  When you left-click again, you will see a small
representation of a spinning clock face.  The clock acts as a timer for
page 75------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

you to se while setting your path oints.  It runs as long as your
animation sequence will run.  This is a 'real time' path mode which
you may use to plot your ath and imart a sense of 'rhythm' to your
artwork movement.

Try this.  Select Clocked Samled Path, left-click again and, quickly,
move your mouse (you don't need to hold the button).  Preview the
move before proceeding.  Render it if you wish.

To trace a Samled Path, hold down your leftmouse button and trace
out the path you want by moving your mouse cursor. Each pixel
reresents an individual path point.  Keep in mond that if yo lay down
many more points than you have frames available, your animation
might be both fast and 'jittery'.  When you release the left mouse 
button you will return to the APM.

FIRST AND MOTION

You can set your APM controls to perform a variety of wild
movements and bizarre image transformations, then save your favorite
APM settings to disk.  Thus, you can load them at any time and use
them with whatever yo have in your clip buffer.

Clear all your APM settings.  Place the ZOETROPE data disk in your
drive, and bring up the Load/Save menu.  Click on .APM, and select
Load. Look for the file called ONE.APM, and load it into memory.

Return to the APM f/x menu, and select Turn (to get out of the path
menu).  Now select Preview, and witness the effect of ONE.APM.  The
wire-frame rendition of your clip box starts out on one side of the
screen, thengoes flying off to the far right, and off into the distance.

Let's examine the APM settings we just loaded in.

On the left-hand side of the menu, is a box labeled Motion.  This is a
toggle, click on it and it changes to First.  Motion is the default
setting, and First is the optional setting.

If you are in Motion (as we have been all along) all of the special
movement settings on the right half of the APM f/x menu will be
exected over the course of your entire animation or specified range of
frames.  However, if yo are in First, all of the special movement
page 76------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

settings on the right half of the APM f/x menu will be used to position
only the first frame - a very fancy, very recise way of placing your 
clip buffer at a particular location, then before moving it across your
screen.

The first frame of ONE.APM is almost off-screen.  Click on Motion to
toggle it to First, then select Turn. Notice that on the first frame of
our APM animation, the clip box has been rotated -117 degrees about
its Y axis.  Now, select Size.  You'll notice that the clip box starts out
at 1.00 - 100%, or normal size.  Now, select Move.  The X axis is at
-115, or the far-left of the screen.  The Y axis is 0, or normal - the
image doesn't move up or down.  The Z- (depth) axis is at -115, or
receding into the screen.

Click on First again to toggle back to Motion.  Now you'll see that the
image is moving to the right (+241 on the X axis).  Select Size, and
you'll see tha the animation is being reduced down to 10% of its
original size.

Now that you've explored these settings, you can better understand how
that first frame was positioned, and why the animation looks the way it
does.  Render it and play it a few times.  Afterwards, clear your frames,
return to the APM and alter your settings.   Add partial turns to the clip
buffer, alter the angle and axis, but be careful - it's quite easy to make
your images fly off-screen.  When you're finished, clear your frames and
then go to the main screen.

CLIP AND SEQUENCE

From the Load/Save menu, load the FOREMAN.RIF animation from 
your ZOETROPE data disk.  After it hasfinished loading, select .apm
from the Load/Save menu and Load the APM file called TWO.APM.

Play FOREMAN.RIF again to remember what it's like, then return to
the APM f/x menu.  In the lower-left corner is a box labeled Clip.
This is another toggle, like Motion/First.  Click on it, and it changes
to Seq.  If you are in Clip mode, the motion settings inthe slider boxes
on the right half of the APM f/x menu will be applied to the contents
of yor clip buffer only.  If you are in Seq(uence) mode, the motion
settings in the slider boxes on the right half of the APM f/x menu will
be applied to your entire animation sequence (either All or a Segment)
on a frame-by-frame basis.
page 77------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL IV: APM F/X

The primary difference between Clip and Seqence is that, when in Clip
mode, the APM will perform specified animation movements, or
transformations, on stationary mages (what is in your clip buffer)
while Sequence performs transformatioons on an already-existing 
animation.  In Seq mode, you are APMing each frame of your
animation sequentially, whereas in Clip Mode, you are APMing only
the contents of your clip buffer.

Make sure Seq is selected, then select Preview to examine the
TWO.APM effect.  Now, select Render.  The animation will be copied
across the entire range of frames, using the APM settings and replacing
the existing frames. This takes a bit more time than a clip APM.

After rendering the animation, play through it to see the final effect.
As the final version illustrates, you can use Sequence to produce an
additional layer of movement on alread-moving images (the animation
segment filling your entire screen), an effect equivalent to a movie
screen with images being projected on it spinning through space.

Return to the APM menu, we've got one last thing to do.

Click on Seq to toggle it back to Clip, then go to the Load/Save menu
and load THREE.APM from your ZOETROPE data disk.  After the
settings have loaded, return to the APM menu and select Render.  Don't
even bother selecting Preview.  When the rendering is finished, go to
your main menu screen and play it.

Surprise!  You'd probably forgotten about that box you had sitting in 
your clip buffer.  But ZOETROPE didn't - it rendered it on top of
your existing animation, imparting a wild, multiplanar effect to your
work.  Play through this animation, then return to the APM menu and
examine the motion settings, as you did before.

The value of this latter effect can't be understated.  Save whole libraries
of full-screen animations on disk, then reload them using different APM
settings each time to eventually create a storm of zipping, scrolling,
moving images.
page 78------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

                   ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

Now that we've covered frame modes and tweening, let's see how they
afect the ZOETROPE color system.  Before we continue, we should
restore the default of ZOETROPE palette.  And there's a fast wayto do
that:  Kill any animation in memory and set the frame mode To Frame.
Select Color f/x from the Color menu, note that the Normal box is
highlighted.  Drag both ends of the Color Range Bar (fourth row) to
cover all the palette colors, then click on Render.  Press the right
mouse button to exit the Color f/x menu.  All done.

MULTIPLE PALETTES

We mentioned in passing that ZOETROPE can have a different color
palette for every frame in memory.  In its simplest form, this means
you can move to any frame and change the colors in the Palette menu
without altering the colors in the other frames.  This also means that
any palette - or portion of a palette may be applied to another frame
- or range of frames.  (If you're rusty on color theory, take a look at
the opening paragraphs in the Color portion of the Reference section
before proceeding).

Let's create a colorful screen so we can see the efects of or palette
changes.  Select the large square brush, turn on Cycle in the Color
menu, select Airbrush, and splatter the entire screen with colors (leave
some background showing).  Finally, press [Return] twice to create 21
frames of the idential picture, each with identicalpage 79------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

                   ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

Now that we've covered frame modes and tweening, let's see how they
afect the ZOETROPE color system.  Before we continue, we should
restore the default of ZOETROPE palette.  And there's a fast wayto do
that:  Kill any animation in memory and set the frame mode To Frame.
Select Color f/x from the Color menu, note that the Normal box is
highlighted.  Drag both ends of the Color Range Bar (fourth row) to
cover all the palette colors, then click on Render.  Press the right
mouse button to exit the Color f/x menu.  All done.

MULTIPLE PALETTES

We mentioned in passing that ZOETROPE can have a different color
palette for every frame in memory.  In its simplest form, this means
you can move to any frame and change the colors in the Palette menu
without altering the colors in the other frames.  This also means that
any palette - or portion of a palette may be applied to another frame
- or range of frames.  (If you're rusty on color theory, take a look at
the opening paragraphs in the Color portion of the Reference section
before proceeding).

Let's create a colorful screen so we can see the efects of or palette
changes.  Select the large square brush, turn on Cycle in the Color
menu, select Airbrush, and splatter the entire screen with colors (leave
some background showing).  Finally, press [Return] twice to create 21
frames of the idential picture, each with identical palettes.

Go into the Time menu, set the Segment Range Bar to frames #5
through #10, and the frame mode To Segment.  Move to Frame #5,
enter the Palette menu, and alter several of the colors (using either the
RGB or the HLS sliders).  Exit the Palette menu and answer Yes to the
requestor prompt.  Reenter the Palette menu and move from frame to
page 80------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

frame.  Notice that the frames covered by the frame mode have been
changed.

If you wish to change a color for an entire animation, you would set
your frame mode To All.  (Don't do it now!)  As with all multiple-
frame changes, there is no undo.

Speaking of undo, when we first covered the Palette menu, we showed
the difference between Restore in the Palette menu, and Restore in the
Frame menu. As you'll recall, Palette Restore onlyworked on the
color changes made while still in the Palette menu.  Frame Restore,
restored the changes no matter how many times we entered and exited
the Palette menu.  The face is, Frame Restore will erase all changes
made to that frame since entering it.  Thus, while in To Frame mode,
you can make as many color changes as you wish, and move in and out
of the Palette menu as much as you like, as long as you don't leave the
frame. Once you leave the frame, all changes - including color- are
set.

Reenter the Palette menu from frame #5, and change some more colors.
Again, make sure frame mode is To Segment.  Let's say you've been
laboring over just the right color palette when you accidentially press
the right mouse button, or the [Space] bar (go ahead).  A requestor asks
you if you want to proceed. You don't want to alter that range of
frames, so you answer No (click on No).  A second requester asks if
you want to ignore changes to the palette.  You've spent too much time
on them (click on No).  You're back where you started.  If you didn't
care about the changes and just wanted to get back to the main screen,
you could have answered Yes to the second requester.

Remember Cut and Paste?  From the Palette menu, set frame mode To
Frame and move to frame #1.  Drag the Color Range Bar to cover
several colors, and clik on Cut.  Now, to move to frame #7, and click on
Paste. This is how you can move colors from one frame palette to
another. Set frame mode To Segment, exit the Palette menu, and
page 81------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

answer Yes to the requester.  You've just asted the colors to the range
of frames.

Notice that, when the frame mode is set to a multiple-frame range, the
color changes do not take effect over the indicated ranges until you exit
the Palette menu - although they do take effect immediately with the
currently displayed frame.

We have one more item to explore in the Palette menu: Use Clip. This
replaces the colors in the currently displayed palette with those from the
frame last accessed by the clip buffer.  Move to frame #1, which
contains the original palette without changes.  Press [~}, and cut out any
small portion of the screen.  (It doesn't matter which colors are included
in the cut).  Now, move to one of the altered palettes (#5-#10).  Enter
the Palette menu and click on Use Clip.  The palette is instantly
changed to that of frame #1.

COLOR F/X

Select Color f/x from the Color menu, and examine the menu that 
appears.  The Color f/x menu lets you manipulate your palette(s) to
create special effects.  Since it's closely related to the functions in the
Palette menu, it's got the [@] symbol that you can click on to go
directly to the Palette menu.  The top four rows of the menu are the
familiar Playback Bar, Segment Range Bar, Color Selection Bar, and
Color Range Bar.

The Color v/x menu is used in much the same way as the APM f/x
menu.  You choose your operationson the right section of the menu,
then click on one of the three "action" items in the far left column.
Preview lets you see the effect without permanently setting it; Render
actually makes the changes; and Restore works the same as in the
Palette menu - it's only good while in To Frame mode, before leaving
the menu.  Unlike the Palette menu, where multiple frame changes
page 82------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

occured upon exiting the menu, in the Color f/x menu, multiple frame
changes only occur after clicking on Render.

When you first arrive at the Color f/x menu, f/x is highlighted along
with Normal.  You'll remember, we used this earlier to restore the
original ZOETROPE palette.   That's the function of Normal: replace
the current palette with the palette first displayed when ZOETROPE is
booted.

When f/x is highlighted, there are nine special color effects available in
the boxes to the right. Click on Shift, and these boxes change to two
slider bars; click on Fade, and they change once more.  Okay, click on
f/x again, and let's look at the effects.

Kill any animation you might have in memory, make sure the frame
mode is set To Frame, Tween is on, and the Color Range Bar is
adjusted to cover all colors.   From the Load/Save menu, load .pic file
called DIGI.pic.  Now, press [Return] a couple of times to make some
copies of the picture.

Activate the Color f/x menu and move to frame #2.  (We'll keep frame
#1 as our original.)  You can see by looking at the Color Selection Bar,
this picture used a different palette from the ZOETROPE default palette.
Click on Normal (if it isn't already highlighted), then point to Preview,
hold down the left mouse button, and observe the effect.  Release the
button, adjust the color Range bar to cover only a few colors and, this
time, click on Render.  Remember: only those colors within the Color
Range Bar will be affected by the changes.  Before going further, adjust
the bar to cover all colors again.

Move forward one frame, click on Inverse, then click and hold the
button on Preview - just like a color film negative.  All the color
effects may be examined from Preview.  But there are plenty of frames,
so go ahead, Render one frame each of each of the nine color effects,
then move thorugh the frames to compare the effects.  Experiment with
setting the Color Range Bar to a limited number of colors.  Any of the
effects may be accomplished over multiple frames, depending on the
frame mode setting.  (Tween, however, has no effect on these f/x
options.) If you begin running out of frames, press [Return] to append
more, before you change the palette of the last frame.

Now, let's take a look at the options available from Fade.  But first,
we'll clean things up.  Set the frame mode To Segment, and the
page 83------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

Segment Range Bar to cover all frames, except frame #1.  Select delete
from the Frame menu (or press [Del] and answer Yes ot the prompt.
Press [Return] until you have some 20 copies of the frame #1 picture.
Make sure Tween is on, and the frame mode is To Frame.  Drag the
Color Range Bar to cover all colors.

Click on Fade.  There are two options available from here - Tint and
Blend.  Tint will 'tint' all the colors in a selected range with the color
you are using.

This might be easier to se with the Normal palette, so move to frame
#2, select f/x and Normal, Render it, then return to Fade.  Adjust the
Color Range Bar to cover the gree, yellow, orange, and red (color
registers #10-#13).  Select white as the drawing color.  Adjust the Max
Tinting slider bar to, say 60%, and click on Render.  Examine the
effect on the colors within the Color Range Bar.

Try this.  Click on Restore.  Select the lightest color in the palette
(white if it exists).  Set Max Tinting to 100%, set the Color Range Bar
to cover all colors, set the Segment Range Bar to cover frames #2-#10,
set Frame Mode To Segment, make sure Tween is on, and click on
Preview.  Now, click on Render.  While still in the Color f/x menu
click on the play icon and watch the range of frames fade to white.

You can use the same effect for fades to black - or to any other color.
If Tween is off, all frames in the range will be tinted to the percent
indicated by the Max Tinting slider bar.  The Tint function is also
handy when you need a palette for transparent shadowing.

Play around with Tint over different frame segments. Try adjusting the
Color Range Bar for different effects.  Before going on to Blend, delete
all frames except for frame #1, then clone it several times by pressing
[Return].  Make sure the Color Range Bar is covering all colors.
Tween has no effect on Blend, so its setting doesn't matter.

Now, click on Blend.  This funciton makes no use of the Max Tinting
bar, so you can ignore its setting. Blend only works over a range of
frames, so set the Segment Range Bar to cover frames #2-#15.  Blend
'tweens' the colors, within the Color Range Bar, between those in the
first frame palette, and those in the last frame palette - creating 
intermediate palettes in the frames in between.
page 84------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

To work, the end palette must be different from the start palette (or
there would be nothing to blend).  So, move to frame #15, click on f/x,
and select Red.  We only want to effect this end frame, so make sure the
frame mode is To Frame, then click on Render.  Now, frame #2 (the
starting frame of the segment) contains the correct palette, and the last
frame contains an all-red palette.  Set the frame mode To Segment,
click on Blend, then click on Preview to check out the effect.  Try
changing the Color range Bar and Previewing it again.  Try altering
frame #15 in other ways, and trying more Blends.

Again, feel free to experiment with the Blend function until you feel
comfortable with it.  Load one of the .rif animations from your
ZOETROPE data disk, and try the various color effects with
animations.  Try different combinations of the Color Range, Segment
Range, and Tween settings.

Way back when we were discussing the Clip menu, we skipped over an
item called Fit Colors.  Let's look at it now.  Remember, we described
how ZOETROPE, during an overlay or underlay, automatically tries to
match the loaded file's color palette to the one in memory?  Actually, it
attempts this with every frame palette - no matter how diverse.

Unlike an underway or overlay load of an animation or picture file, when
you load a .win file into the clip buffer, there is no attempt to match its
colors with the current palette, so it can look pretty strnage if you paste
a clip from a different palette.  At any time, however, you can select Fit
Colors, and ZOETROPE will attempt to match the colors of the clip
image with those of the currently displayed palette.

This this: Kill any animation in memory, set frame mode To frame,
drag the Color Range Bar to cover all colors and use Normal to restore
the ZOETROPE palette.  Click on Cycle in the Color Menu.  Select
the Draw tool, and the largest square brush from the Brush menu, and
Airbrush more multi-color squares on the screen.  Press [Return] to
create some extra copies of hte picture in frame #1, move to frame #2
and bring up the Color f/x menu.  Click on Inverse, and Render.

Okay, frame #1 has a normal palette, and frame #2 has an inversed 
palette.  Go to the full screen, press [~], and clip a small portion of the
picture into the clip buffer.  Move the clip image elsewhere on the
screen and Paste it (just to make sure you have it).  Now, move to
frame #1 and paste the clip image again.  Notice that ithas taken on the
page 85------------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL V: COLOR F/X

colors of the frame #1 palette.  Select Fit colors from the Clip menu
and paste it again.  It now matches its original color scheme.

Remember, ZOETROPE will try to fit the colors as best it can, based
on the existing colors in the current palette.  Some attempts will be
better than others.  Try altering some of the other frame palettes and
comparing the results using the same clipped image.

Let's take a look at Shift.  Delete frames #1 and #2.  We'll use the
remaining multicolored frames for our example.

Select Shift from the colro f/x menu.  Make sure that FPSh is
highlighted and its slider bar is set to 1.  Set the frame mode To
Segment, and the Segment Range Bar to cover frames #1-#9.  Click on
Render and play back the segment.

Return to the Color f/x menu, click on ShOT and set its slider bar to 4.
Set the Segment Range Bar to cover frames #10-#19, and the Color
Range Bar to cover only a few colors.  Click on Render then play the 
results.

FPSh, which stands for Frames Per Shift, shifts the selected colors in
the direction indicated by the Color Range Bar once very number of
frames as indicated by its slider bar - when Tween is on.  With Tween
off, it shifts the colors a certain number of places (as indicated by its
slider) only once, identically for each frame.

ShOT stands for Shift Over Time.  When Tween is on, this shifts the
colors within the Color Range Bar (in its direction) a total of (slider-bar
number) times over the given range of frames.  Tween has no effect on
ShOT.

The best way to understand the color-shift functions is to experiment.
Try varying the number of frames, and the numbers in the slider bars.
Try the same things with Tween on and off.  Shift colors on only one
frame.  Both Shift functions permit flexible and efficient 'color-
cycling' animation, which uses no additional memory per frame.
page 86--WAS MISSING--------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU
page 87---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

                 ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

Now we're going to take a look at some very special visual effects
which can be used to add that spectacular, professional touch to your
animations.  Set frame mode To frame, and load FOREMAN.rif.

PIXEL f/x

Move to the last frame of FOREMAN.rif, and select Pixel f/x from the
Menu drop-down.  The first two rows of the menu contain the familiar
Playback Bar, and Segment Range Bar.  Beneath them are 12 ixel
effects.  Each are affected by the Segment Range Bar, and some are also
affected by the Tween setting.  For now, we'll look at each effect on a
single frame, undo the effect, and go on to the next one.

Click on Defocus, and watch the screen carefully.  Defocus works 
slowly from the top down, blurring the entire image. When the
blurring is completed, the menu reappears.  Exit the ixel f/x menu,
and Zoom in on some portion of the picture.  Note the multi-colored
pixels around the edges of solid colored areas.  Leave Zoom on, ress
[Help], and note the difference.  Press [Help] again to see the blurred
effect again.  Before going on, press [Help] once more so the frame
image is returned to its original state.
page 88---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

Defocus creates an overall blur effect, and can be used repeatedly (up to
a oint) to create an effective illusion of depth, when applied over
varying layers of images.

Using the same procedure described above to examine the Antialias effect.
Antialias is similiar to Defocus, except that it doesn't so much blur, as
smooth the edges ina picture.  It works primarily on diagonal lines,
and leaves horizontal and vertical edges alone.  It also requires a palette
of related colors to work most effectively.

Try Shatter.  Each time you click on it. it shifts every other scan line
one pixel in the oposite direction.  As we'll soon see, this is very
effective when tweened over a range of frames.  (If you've Shattered the
frame image more than once, you can use the Frame Restore to return
to the original picture before proceeding.)

Click on Wipe, then examine the whole screen.  Hmmmm...  We just
erased the upper half of the screen.  Wipe is really designed to be used
over a range of frames.  Press [Help], set the frame mode To All, and
apply Wipe again.  Now, play the animation.  The animation sequence
is smoothly erased from the top down.  You could, at this point,
underlay another anomation which would be revealed behind the wipe.

Reset the frame mode To Frame, and reload FOREMAN.rif.  Move to
any frame, and click on Venetian.  Now, we've knocked out every other
ten scan lines.  Again, this function is designed for use over a range of
frames.  Click on Undo, set the frame mode To All, and try it again.
Venetian gives you (naturaly) a 'Venetian-blind' wipe.

Reload FOREMAN.rif, set the frame mode To Frame, and return to the
last frame in the animation.  Click on Crystalize.  What is that?
Crystalize is a strange, but beautiful effect - deending on what you
are crystalizing.  We'll return to it later with a more interesting
example.  Click on Undo to restore the image before continuing.

Click on Outline.  This effect erases all pixels of any solid area, except
those on the border.  Used with an animation, you can accomplish
some stunning effects with this.

Restore the original image, then select some bright, constrasting color
from the Color menu (like white).  Return to the Pixel f/x menu, and
select Edge In.  The full screen apears, but nothing happens, because
Edge In is waiting for you to select a color.  Click in the black
page 89---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

background.  Edge In outlines all areas of the selected area with the
current drawing color.  Click on Undo, select Edge In, once more, and
click on one of the colors on the screen.  Edge In can be used to create
neon effects, among others.  Click on Undo before proceeding.

Click on Tile.  The screen appears with the familiar crosshairs.  Drag a
box around the figure's head.  When you release the button, the entire
screen fills with duplicates.  Click on Undo and try capturing different
sized images to see how they're distributed.  Among many other uses,
you can use Tile to create grids.

Try Unrez.  This turns the screen into 2-pixel chunks.

Ripple and Buzz are identical, except that Ripple applies a sine wave
over the screen, while Buzz creates a sawtooth wave.  Select Ripple and
the crosshairs appear again.  Create a box, anywhere on screen,
approximately 30x50 (use the middle coordinates that apear in the
upper left for box size).  When you release the button, the entire screen
is waved.  Click on Undo, and try a box about 50 wide, and the entire
screen in length.  Click on Undo, and try the same effects with Buzz.
Ripple and Buzz are only applied in one direction, but you can rotate
the image 90 degrees before applying the effects, then rotate it back.
(See the Reference section for details on the wave positions of these
two functions.)

Let's look at how the pixel effects operate over a range of frames.
Defocus, Antialias, Outline, Edge In, and Unrez work the same way
over a range of frames as on a single frame, and Tween has no effect on
them.  We've seen how Wipe and Venetian work on multiple frames;
the Tween setting has no effect on them.  Let's try Ripple.

Set the frame mode To all, select Ripple, and drag a box approximately
40x40.  Answer Yes to the prompt, and watch the fun!  Play the
animation, and you'll see that Riple (as well as Buzz) modulates one
entire wave over the selected range of frames.

Go back to the Pixel f/x menu and Shatter the current animation over
all frames.  When applied over a range, Shatter - like Wipe and
Venetian - will average the number of frames in the range to split the
image comletely off the screen.  The final frame will always be blank.

Load FISH.RIF.  Set frame mode To all, select Tile, and clip just the
fish.  Play the animation - you now have a whole sea of fish!
page 90---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

NOTE: Tile used over a range of frames is extremely memory
intensive, depending on the amount of animation within the tiled
square.  In most cases, you will be able to get at least 6 frames
of Tile animation in a one-megabyte machine.

Some things to try:  Reverse the Segment Range Bar, and try Shatter
over a range of frames To Segment: The two halves of the image will 
appear from the sides and merge in the center.  Draw a large box on
screen and create 20 identical frames.  Set frame mode To All and
Ripple the entire length of the screen 20 ixels wide.  With the
Segment Range Bar reversed over all frames, set frame mode To
Segment, and ripple half the screen the same width (20x100).  Observe
the results.  Now, rotate the entire animation sequence.  (This is done
from the APM f/x menu by setting the frame mode To All, turning 
Tween off, setting Clip/Seq to Seq, and turning the entire animation 90
degrees about the Z axis).  Once you have it rotated, remember to turn
Tween back on, and repeat the two riple steps above.  Finally, turn
Tween back off, set frame mode To All, return to the APM f/x menu,
adjust the Part Turns bar to -90 degrees, and rotate the animation
sequence back to its original position.

And now, we'll look at Crystalize over multiple frames.  Crystalize
affects the ixels using a special alogrithm explained in the Reference
section.  Its efect deends on the color register used by the pixels,
rather than the color itself.  With Tween off, crystalize effects all
frames identically.  Bout with Tween on, the effect is cumulative based
on the image in the first frame.

Kill any animation sequence in memory, and restore the original
ZOETROPE palette.  Select the color in color register #16 and, using
the Box tool, draw a small, solid box (about 1/2 inch wide by 1-inch
long) to the left of the center of the screen.  Select another color, and
draw a circle - about nickle-size - to the right of center.  Select white
and draw a single, short line, somewhere below center.  Leave two to
three inches space between the three items; positoin isn't that
important, as long as they have some 'elbow room'.

Press [Return] three times, set frame mode To All, make sure Tween is
on, and click on Crystalize.  Answer Yes to the prompt and watch the
magic.  When the process is complete, select Ping Pong from the Mode
menu, and play the animation.
page 91---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

NOTE:  One-megabyte machines may run out of memory using the
above procedure.  Try reducing the number of frames, or making
smaller images.
Notice that the color from register #16 remains the same, whereas the
others use various colors from the palette.  Crystalize will always
maintain the single color of color register #16, but will use multiple
colors for the other registers.  Two other color registers will multiply
with only three colors.  Can you find them?

WARNING:  Crystalize uses only the imagery in the starting frame
as a 'seed'.  All remaining frames will be erased, when used over
multiple frames.  Don't try using it on animations, because only the
crystalized first frame will remain.

MATTE

The Matte menu is used to create traveling masks from animation files.
It can be used for animated cast-shadows, and other advanced visual
effects.

Select Matte from the Menu drop-down, click on Load and load
FOREMAN.rif.  The Load and Save in the Matte menu will only
load or save .rif files, and they will replace the animation in memory,
regardless of the settings of the Load/Save menu (such as Overlay, or
To Segment).

Now that FOREMAN is in memory, click on Mask.  Another file
selector appears.  Select the animation you created in Tutorial i -
DINOALL.RIF - and observe the loading process.  Play the resulting
animation.  Every instance of color in the FORMAN animation has
become a transparent 'hole', through which peeps the DINOALL
animation.  The original background color becomes an opaque mask,
hiding the DINOALL animation.

Reload FORMAN.rif and, this time, select Imask (Inverse Mask) and
load DINOALL.RIF.  Predictably,this time the masking is reversed -
DINOALL shows through the background, and every previous color has
become a black mask.
page 92---------------------------ZOETROPE TUTORIAL VI: PIXEL F/X MENU

Note that, in both cases, the palette of the incoming animation replaces
that of the previous animation.  Notice also that, because the
DINOALL animation has fewer frames than the FOREMAN animation,
the last frame of DINOALL is used to fill the extra FOREMAN frames.
(The same think happened in the MASK example, above, but the 
animation wasn't visible in the final frames.)

Try the same procedure with Xor.  In this instance, both animations are
merged, and their colors 'Xor'd, creating, in some cases, a translucent
effect.  Some experimentation with color registers, and colors will be
necessary to successfully use Xor as a transparency effect.  (See the
Reference section for details regarding the relationship of the various
color registers.)  The primary use of Xor is to combine two animation
sequences, through the use of an intermediate, animated mask.  A step-
by-step explanation of this procedure is included in the Reference
section.

Here's a tip: Although Matte only works with .rif files, you can mask
a picture by first saving it as a one-frame .rif file.  Load your true
animation first, then select the picture .rif file as the masked file. The
masking procedure will always duplicate the last frame of incoming
animations over the existing range of the original naimation.  In this
case, the last frame is the only frame - so the picture will be
duplicated over the entire range.
page 93--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

                     ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

All of ZOETROPE can be controlled by selecting either the function
names inthe  menus and submenus, or clicking on the icons in the
Playback Bar.  In addition, the function names in the menus are
followed by letters or other keyboard symbols representing the keyboard
equivalents for ZOETROPE functions.  While you are working with
ZOETROPE, pressing one of your Amiga's keys will automatically
activate that function (except when you are in Text mode).

NOTE: In ZOETROPE, whenever requesters appear offering 'Yes'
or 'No' options, you may point and click on the word to select it, or
you may press the corresponding keyboard key: [Y] or [N].  Alert
boxes which offer only 'Continue' may be exited by clicking either
mouse button, or by pressing any key.

ZOETROPE begins with a blank screen and mouse pointer (or cursor.
Clicking the right mouse button displays the Playback Bar at the
bottom of the screen; clicking it once more removes the Playback Bar.
Pressing and holding down the right mouse button displays the menu
bar at the top of the screen, from which you may select the various
ZOETROPE options.

Clicking the right mouse button will, generally, remove you from any
submenu into the main menu.  From the main menu, clicking the right
mouse button 'toggles' you between the blank screen (or picture), and
the main menu.  (Keyboard alternative: [Space Bar].)

NOTE: For most of ZOETROPE drawing functions to operate, all
menus must be removed, and you must be drawing on the full 
screen. If you find a particular function stubbornly refusing to
work, look to see if a menu is present.  If so, click the right mouse
button until you have a full screen to work with.
page 94--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

To select a ZOETROPE menu function, hold down the right mouse
button and point to any of hte menu titles at the to pof the screen-
Menu, Clip, Draw, etc.  The menu list for that title will drop down.
While still pressing the right mouse button, point to the desired
function so that it is outlined, then release themouse button.  The
menu will disappear and you will be in whichever drawing or picture-
manipulation mode you've chosen.  (ZOETROPE's default color
palette, will create a red outline box on selected functions.  Certain
palettes may render the outline box invisible, but you can still select
any function releasing the right button while the mouse pointer is over
the item name.)

If you change your mind and decide you do not wish to select a
function, move the mouse pointer outside of any menu and onto the
main screen before releasing the button.  No function will be selected.

In certain menus (such as Draw or Mode), an asterisk displayed to the
left of a function name indicates that the function is currently active.
Some functions are 'toggles' and may be turned either on or off by
clickong on the function name.  Other functions (such as the three at the
bottom of the Modes menu) are 'radio buttons', which means that only
one - but at least one - must be selected.

THE PLAYBACK BAR

The Playback Bar is the icon-based strip which apears at the bottom of 
the ZOETROPE screen, and at the top of the Time, Load/Save, Pixel
f/x, APM f/x, Color f/x, and Palette menus.  The Playback Bar icons
are similiar to those found on videotape recorders.  By clicking on the 
icons,you may move through an animation sequence forward,
backward, fast-forward, or fast-backward (rewind). You may also insert
frames or easily view any frame within an animation.  From left to right,
the Playback Bar icons operate as follows:

NOTE: The keyboard alternatives listed below operate whether or
not the Playback Bar is displayed.
page 95--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

- First Frame.  Go to first frame of animation sequence.  Left-
click on this icon to move immediately to the first frame of the
animation.  Keyboard alternative: [F1].

- Fast Reverse.  Left click on this icon to play your animation
sequence in reverse (last frame to first frame) at high speed.  Click the
right mouse button halt the playback.  If To Segment frame mode is
active, only the selected range of frames will be played. If you wish to
remove the Playback Bar during display, first click the right mouse 
button, then activate Fast Reverse using the keyboard alternative.
Keyboard alternative: [F2].

- Reverse Play.  Left-click on this icon to play your animation
sequence in reverse (last frame to first) at Time speed (see Time). The
Playback Bar will disappear before layback.  If you hold down your
left mouse button your animation will play up to twice the seed.
Click the rightmouse button to halt the playback and redisplay the
Playback Bar.  If To Segment frame mode is active, only the selected
range of frames will be played.  Keyboard alternative: [F3], or up
cursor arrow.

- Create Frame/Previous.  Left-click on this icon to copy the
current frame appearing on your workscreen and add backwards to the
animation, duplicating the frame before the current frame.  For
example, if you are on frame #5 of a ten-frame animation sequence, left-
click three times on this icon to insert three identical images of frame
# 5.  The original frame #5 wil become frame #8, and three identical
frames will be come frames #5, 6, and 7.  In addition, your total
animation sequence will have increased by three frames.  Keyboard 
alternative: [F4].

- Move Frame Backward.  Left-click on this icon to move
backwards one frame at a time in your animation sequence.  Keyboard
alternative: [F5] or left cursor arrow.

NOTE:  In ZOETROPE, all direction arrows controlling slider-bar
movement are auto-scroll.  Left clicking on them will perform one
page 96--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

increment of that arrow's function every time you click.  For
continuous movement, hold down the left mouse button.

- Frame Counter Bar.  The numbered box within this slider bar indicates
which frame of your animation sequence is currently displayed.  Its
position within the bar corresponds to the curent frame position within 
the animation.  Clicking within the bar on either side of the number box
will jump to a frame position relative to the entire animation.  (Click to 
the left to go backwards; right to go forwards.)  You may also move 
through your animation manually by oint at the numbered box, holding down
the left mouse button, and dragging the numbered box in either direction.

- Move Frame Forward.  Left-click on this icon to move forward one
frame at a time in your animation sequence.  Hold down the button to
scroll forward.  Keyboard alternative: [F6] or right cursor.

- Create Frame/Next.  Left-click on this icon to copy the
current frame appearing on your workscreen and insert the copied frame
after the current frame.  For example, if you are on frame #2 of a six-
frame animation sequence, left-click three times on this icon to insert 
three identical images of frame # 2.  The original frame #2 will remain 
frame #2, and three identical frames will become frames #3, 4, and 5.  
In addition, your total animation sequence will have increased by three 
frames.  Keyboard alternative: [F7].

- Forward Play.  Left-click on this icon to play your animation
sequence forward (first frame to last frame) at Time speed (see Time).
The Playback Bar will disappear before playback.  If you hold down the
button during playback, your animation will play up to twice the speed.
Click the right mouse button to halt the playback and redisplay the
Playback Bar.  If To Segment frame mode is active, only the selected
range of frames will be played.  Keyboard alternative: [F8] or down 
arrow cursor.

- Fast Forward.  Left-click on this icon to play your animation
sequence forward (first frame to last) at high speed.  Click the right
page 97--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

mouse button to halt the playback.  If To Segment frame mode is
active, only the selected range of frame will be played.  If you wish
to remove the layback Bar during dislay, first click the right mouse
button, then activate Fast Forward using the keyboard alternative.
Keyboard alternative: [F9].

- Last Frame.  Go to the last frame of your animation sequence.
Left-click on this icon to move immediately to the last frame of the
animation.  Keyboard alternative: [F10].

- Total Frames.  Displays the total number of frames of your
animation sequence.  You may click within the Total Frames box to
append 10 frames at the end of your animation, which will all be
identical to the last frame.  Keyboard alternative: [Return].

- Frame Modes:  To Frame, To Segment, To All toggle.  Left-
click on this box to cycle through the frame modes: To Frame (f), To
Segment (s) and To All (a) modes.  The frame modes determine which
frames will be affected by various ZOETROPE operations, and are set
within the Time submenu (see Time for details).  To Frame operations
affect only the frame currently displayed, To Segment operations affect
only the range of frames set in the Time submenu.  To All operations
affect all frames in the animation.  To Segment and To All operations 
are permanent and may not be undone by pressing [Help], so a requester
will appear allowing you to proceed or cancel the operation.  Keyboard
alternative: [.] (period).

NOTE:  Although you may not undo multiple frame operations, such as 
To Segment and To All, you CAN abort them at any time by
pressing any key on the keyboard or by holding down the right
mouse button.  A requester will apear displaying the number of
frames already affected, and asking if you want to continue.  Click
on Yes to proceed, or No to halt the operation at the frame it is on.
If you choose to continue the operation, ZOETROPE will pick up
where it left off, and proceed to the end of the designated frame
range.  If you decide to halt the operation, only those frames
already affected by the operation will be changed; they cannot be
undone.
page 98--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

THE MAIN MENU

The main menu bar contains the following seven menus:  MENU,
CLIP, DRAW, MODES, FRAME, BRUSH, and COLOR.  Hold down
the right mouse button to display the main menu bar.  While still
pressing the button, point to any menu title to dislay its options, then
point to the option itself and relase the mouse button to select that
option (or relase the mouse button from the main screen to avoid
selecting any option).

In the following section, we will describe each of the menus in the
menu bar, from the left side of the screen to the right.  Each function,
or command within each menu will be described in the order listed in
the menu - from top to bottom.

MENU

The MENU contains global, generalized functions affecting your entire
animation sequence; including such things as disk I/O (input/outupt),
playback time, and APM effects.  MENU also contains information
about ZOETROPE and the status of your animation, and it allows you
to return ot the workbench, either through pausing or exiting the
program.

ABOUT ZOETROPE

Displays program specification information: Title, program version, the
name of the author, publisher, copyright, etc.

TIME [T]

Activates the Time submenu, which allows you to alter the overall
playback speed of an animation sequence, and set the frame mode
(which frames are acted upon) to individual frames (To Frame), to a
range of frames - or segment (To Segment), or to the entire animation
sequence (To All).
page 99--------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

PLAYBACK BAR - The Playback Bar makes up the top row of the Time 
submenu.  Its functions are the same as when it is displayed from the 
main screen, with the one exception that the frame modes are not 
displayed (See Playback Bar, above for details).

MORE - Left-click on More to load the latter part of an animation file
that will not fit entirely into your Amiga's memory. (See Load/Save.)
If your animation file is too large for memory, ZOETROPE will load
as much of the first part as it can, leaving 10 percent of the loaded file
free for editing.  It will then display a requester saying: 'File too large
to fit into available memory', and will highlight the More box in the
Time submenu.  Click on Continue to exit the requester and resume
ZOETROPE functions.  When you are through editing the first part of
the animation, you may save your changes under a different file name,
then select More from the Time submenu to load the next ortion of
the original file.  (It is recommended that you save the changes as a
separate RIF file.)  A requester will appear saying 'Advance to next
part of DF0:\FILE?  This will destroy frames in memory'.  Left-click
on either Yes or No (or press [Y] or [N].  If you select Yes, everything
currently in memory will be replaced with the next part of the animation.

The More option is primarily desinged to break up large animation files
into manageable chunks.  More does not alter the original, oversized
animation file, and does snot append edited changes to that file upon
saving.  You will be alerted should you try to save edited segments
using the original, oversized file's name.  But it's esential that you
keep a backup copy of non-edited animation files (See Patch, below).

ANIMATION SPEED CONTROL BAR - This allows you to increase or decrease
the playback speed of your animations.  Click on the left arrow to
increase playback speed, click on the right arrow to decrease playback
speed.  You can also drag the numbered box left or right to set your
animation speed.

The Animation Speed Control indicator number displays how many
Amiga video frames are used to display each animation frame of an
animation segment.  One Amiga video frame is the eriod it takes your
monitor to scan and refresh the screen once.  The video-frame refresh
rate is measured in jiffies, which are 1/60th of a second.  The default
ZOETROE animation playback speed is four (4).  Thus, each frame of
your animation, at default, is displayed for a period of four jiffies - 
4/60, or 1/15th of a second.  If you set the box at 60, each frame will
page 100-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

be displayed for one seocnd (60/60).  ZOETROPE's fastest animation
speed is two (2) - or 30 frames per second.

TWEEN - Tween is a mode which affects ZOETROPE clip-buffer and
APM operations, and certain Pixel f/x and Color f/x functions.  It can
be either active or inactive.  When Tween is active (or highlighted, the
default condition), the beginning and end positions of your images (or
palettes) affect each frame through intermediate steps based on the
number of frames indicated by the frame modes: To Segment, or To All
(Tween has no effect on To Frame).  When Tween is inacive, only the
final, altered position of the image (or palette) affects each frame
identically.

For example, given 10 frames, and a vertically shaped clip-buffer image
that is Rotated 90 degrees to horizontal:  With Tween on and frame
mode To All - frame #1 will contain the vertical image, frame #10 will
contain the horizontal image, and frames #2-9 will contain images in
varying degrees of rotation between vertical and horizontal.  Given
exactly the same situation with Tween off, each frame would contain an
identical image in the final, horizontal position.

Left-click on Tween to toggle it on or off.  Tween works with the
Rotation, Move, Scale Paste, and APM f/x functions.  In the Pixel f/x
menu, Tween affects Shatter, Crystallize, Ripple, and Buzz.  In the
Color f/x menu, Tween affects Shift and Fade.

Tween may also be turned on or off by clicking on the lower-case (t)
found in the Pixel f/x, APM f/x, and Color f/x menus.

The third row of the Time submenu contains the three frame-mode 
functions: To Frame, To Segment, and To All.  These allow you to
select the range of frames affected byi time-oriented functions.  Click on
any one of the three boxes to activate that mode.  Only one mode may
be active at any time.  (Frame modes may also be selected from the
layback Bar to clickon on 'f' for To Frame, 's' for To Segment, and
'a' for To All.)

TO FRAME - Left-click on To Frame to activate it.  When active, time-
oriented operations will be performed only on the currently displayed
frame and will affect no other frames in the animation sequence.

TO SEGMENT - Left-click on To Segment to activate it.  When active,
time-oriented operations (including animation playbacks, and I/O Saves)
page 101-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

will be performed on the range of frames specified by the Segment
Range Bar.  Reversing the Segment Range Bar (described below) will
revers the effect of these operations.

TO ALL - Left-click on To All to activate it.  When active, time-oriented
operations will be performed on all frames in the animation sequence.

The following oeprations are affected by the frame mode settings:

	Clip:		Paste
			Rotate
			Stretch

	Frame:		Separate
			Blue Pic
			Unblue Pic
			Clr Pic
			Defocus
			Delete (To Seg. only)

	Load/Save:	Save .rif (To Seg. only)
			Over/Under (.pic only)

	Pixel f/x:	All

	APM f/x:	All

	Palette:	All

	Color f/x	All

The fourth row of the Time submenu is the Animation Segment Range
Controller, which allows you to set the range of frames affected when
the To Segment frame mode is active.  The Segment Range Controller
is duplicated in the Pixel f/x, APM f/x, and Color f/x menus.

SEGMENT STARTING FRAME - The first three boxes in the row consist of
a frame number displaying the starting frame in the segment, bracketed
by left nad right arrows allowing you to adjust the starting frame
number.  Click on the left arrow to move the starting frame backwards,
click on the right arrow to move it forwards.  Clicking on the number
page 102-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

itself will position the starting end of the Segment Range Bar (described
below) to match the currently displayed frame.

SEGMENT RANGE BAR - You maydrag the dots within the Segment
Range Bar to dynamically set the start and end frame of your segment
range.  The beginning and end frame numbers will be indicated in the
Segment Starting and Segment Ending Frame boxes.  When first
dispslayed, the Segment Range Bar will display only one dot.  Drag it to
the left or right to reveal the second dot.  Both dots will be connected
by a line.  One dot will represent the starting frame, and the other will
represent the ending frame.  Note that the segment range order may be
reversed (i.e. the starting fram enumber higher than the end frame
number) by dragging one dot across the other.  Thus, in a 20-frame
segment, you could have a range running from 1 to 20, or from 20 to
1.  By reversing the segment range numbers, time oriented operations -
such as APM f/x, clip manipulations, and Saves - will, in effect, be
reversed, and will play back in reverse.

SEGMENT END FRAME - The last three boxes in the row consist of a
frame number displaying the end frame in the segment, bracketed by left
and right arrows allowing you to adjust the end frame number.  Click
on the left arrow to move the end fram ebackwards, click on the right
arrow to move it forwards.  Clicking on the number itself will position
the end of the Segment Range Bar (described above) to match the
currently displayed frame.

LOAD/SAVE [L]

Select Load/Save to activate the file selection menu.  Load/Save allows
you to set drive paths, and to load or save a variety of ZOETROPE file
formats.  See also Appendix C for a description of how to convert the
file formats of other Amiga products into those compatible with
ZOETROPE.
page 103-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

The Playback Bar appears at the top of the Load/Save menu, permitting
a last-minute run-through of your work before you save it to disk, or
before you load in another file (effectively erasing your current work).
You may also set the frame at which to begin loading an overlay or
underlay animation, or a picture.

In addition to the Playback Bar, the ZOETROPE Load/Save menu
includes three file functions on the left: Load data from disk to memory,
Save data to disk from memory, or Kill (delete) a data file on disk.  The
second and third rows contain the types of files (file formats) which
may be affected by the I/O functions.  Below these four types of I/O
compositing modes - Normal, Over(lay), Under(lay), and Splice -
which are available with certain of the file formats.  The bottom row
contains the drive drawer field, followed by the Patch function.

In a typical file I/O operation, you first enter into the field labeled
'Drawer:' the drive ath contain your data (e.g. DF1:Zoeanims/).
Next, select the file format by clicking in its box (e.g. .rif), followed
by the type of I/O compositing operation (e.g. Normal).  Finally,
choose the I/O action (e.g. Load, Save, or Kill). Following this, a
custom ZOETROPE file selector menu will apear from which you 
may select your file.  The first three actions, above, may be done in any
order.  No action is taken until either Load, Save, or Kill is selected.  In
the case of Kill, a requester will prompt you to continue or abort the
operation.  Keyboard alternatives: [L] Load; [S] Save; [K] Kill; [D]
Drawer.

NOTE:  You may Save your .rif animation files in reverse order by
setting the frame mode To Segment and reversing the direction of 
the Segment Range Bar.  You may not, however, Load animations in
reverse order.

The ZOETROPE Load/Save menu can access the following types of file 
formats (other formats may be converted as described in Appendix C):

.rif	ZOETROPE animation file format.  Rif files are delta
	animation files designed by Jim Kent expressly for
	ZOETROPE, and for the LIVE! real-time digitizer from A-
	Squared Distributions, Inc.  Delta files use the full 40,000
	bytes of a standard Amiga low-resolution screen to display
	the first frame of an animation.  The second frame consists
	of data describing the changes that took place since the
	first frame.  The
page 104-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

	third frame describes the changes since the second, and so on.
	The rif form of delta file also compresses the first frame, (using
	vertical byte run-length encoding which is about 30 percent
	better than IFF 'normal' run-length encoding).  Using .rif files
	you can get far more screens in memory than would be possible
	using 'page-flipping'.  The more pixels changed between
	frames, the greater the memory use.  On the other hand, if no
	change takes place, each additional frame will use only74
	bytes.  Rif files load into memory one frame at a time.  You
	may abort the load process at any time by ressing any key, or
	the right mouse button.  (See Appendix C for a description of
	.rif file format.)

.pic	This is a standard, low-resolution Amiga .IFF file format used
	by amiga paint programs.  Any frame of a ZOETROPE animation
	may be saved to disk as an .IFF picture, or any frame in
	memory may be replaced by an .IFF picture.  Also, .IFF
	pictures may be loaded as overlays or underlays into any range
	of frames, depending on the frame mode. (See Over and Under,
	below.)

.apm	Allows you to load or save the motion settings from your APM
	f/x menu (see APM f/x).

.win	The contents of the clip buffer (described later in the Clip
	section).  When saved, this image takes on the palette of the
	frame it was clipped from (unless its alette has been previously
	altered by the Fit Colors comand in the Clip menu, described
	below).  When loaded, ZOETROPE does not automatically
	adapt the new cli-image colors to those of the current palette.
	You must choose Fit Colors from the Clip menu to accomplish
	this.  Note also that any image currently in the clip buffer is
	relaced by the loaded cli image.  .Win files are identical with
	Delux Paint brush files.  The ZOETROPE file selector will let
	you load brush files without the .win extender by clicking on
	the wildcard selection.

.col	Color palette files.  You may save the color palette of the
	currently dislayed frame, then reload it at a later time to effect
	the palette of whichever frame is displayed during the load.
	.Col files in ZOETROPE are the same as .col files in Aegis
	Animator and Aegis Images.
page 105-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Memory permitting, you may composite (merge) additional animations
and/or stationary graphics on top of or underneath your existing work,
or splice animations onto the end of whichever sequence is in memory.
These functions are represented by the Normal, Over(lay), Under(lay),
and Slice buttons.

NORMAL - Left-click on Normal for standard I/O operations.  Loaded
animations (.rif) will replace the animation currently in memory.
Loaded stationary grahics (.pic) will replace whichever frame is
currently displayed and will change the color palete of that frame
to that of the loaded picture.

OVER - Left-click on Over to merge an animation (.rif) or a stationary
grahic (.pic) from disk on to of the animation currently in memory.
Overlay operations maintain the color palettes of the frames currently
in memory. The background color (color register #0) will remain
transarent so that existing images will appear beneath the transparent
portion of the overlayed data.  If the incoming file is an animation file, 
its first frame will appear surrounded by a box.  You may, at this point,
drag the animation to any position on the screen befor ebeginning the
loading rocedure.  Frame by frame, ZOETROPE will automatically
remap the color alette(s) of the loaded file tomaintain, as much as
possible, their original hues.  Animation overlays will begin at the
frame currently displayed; static picture overlays will load according to
the frame mode (To Frame, To Segment, To All).  You may load as
many overlays as your Amiga's memory will allow.

UNDER - Left-Click on Under to merge an animation (.rif) or stationary
graphic (.pic) file from disk underneath the animation currently in
memory.  Underlay operations maintain the color alettes of the frames
currently in memory. The background color (color register #0) will
remain transparent so that images from the loaded underlay will appear
beneath the transparent portion of image data currently in memory.  If
the incoming file is ananimation file, its first frame will appear
surrounded by a box.  You may, at this point, drag the animation to
any position on the screen before beginning the loading procedure.  
Frame by frame, ZOETROPE will automatically remap the color 
palette(s) of the loaded file tomaintain, as much as possible, their 
original hues.  Animation overlays will begin at the frame currently 
displayed; static picture overlays will load according to the frame mode 
(To Frame, To Segment, To All).  You may load as many overlays as 
your Amiga's memory will allow.
page 106-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

SPLICE - Left-click on Splice to apend an animation onto the
naimation currently in memory.  Splice automatically appends the
chosen file to the end of the existing one, regardless of frame mode or
current frame position.

DRAWER - Left-click in the field to the right of Drawer: to activate a
cursor within the field.  You may now type in the path you wish
ZOETROPE to search ofr subsequent loads and saves. Typically, this
will be DF0: or DF1:.  If your files were in a drawer labeled
'Zoeanims', on a disk in drive DF1:, you would enter:
DF1:ZOEANIMA/.  Hard drive owners will find the first partition labeled
DH0:, and the remaining partitions labeled P2:, P3:, etc.  As
default, the drawer will point to wherever you booted ZOETROPE from.
This path may also be altered in the ZOETROPE file selector (described
below).

PATCH - Patch allows you to work on 'patches', or sub-ranges of
animation files.  This feature can be used for animations that are too
large to fit into memory.  When you click on Patch, a menu box
appears with four rows of functions, described below:

- START - Start designates the first frame of the animation segment you
wish to load.  To the right of Start is a numerical slider bar that lets
you specifiy a frame, from one to 2048.  To select the first frame of
an animation segment, click on either the left or right arrows on the
Start slider bar until you reach the desired frame.  You can also
quickly select the desired frame by manually dragging the frame
number box right or left.  You must select a frame number that
actuallly exists in the animation file for this function to work
properly.

- FRAMES - Frames represents the total number of frames you wish to
load (beginning with the designated Start Frame).  To the right of
Frames is a numerical slider bar that lets you specify the number of
frames you wish to load (see KBytes, below).  To select the number
of frames you wish to load, left-click on either the left or right
page 107-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

arrows on the Frames slider bar until you reach the desired number
of frames.  You can also quickly select the number of frames by
manually dragging the frame number box right or left.

- KBytes - KBytes represents the amount of memory in your Amiga
you want to allocate to an animation segment before you attempt to
load it (reserving the remainder for editing changes).  The numbered
box indicates how much memory you have currently allocated.  If
you drag the box to its far-right position, you will be using the total
amount of memory available in your Amiga.  To select the amount
of memory you wish to allocate, left-click on either the left or right
arows on the KBytes slider bar until you reach the desired amount
of memory.  You can also quickly select the amount of memory by
manually dragging the frame number box right or left.

NOTE:  When you Patch-load an animation segment, you can only load
in either the number of frames you've specified, or the maximum
number of frames that will fit into the memory you've specified -
whichever comes first.

- DRAWER - Left-click in the field to the right of Drawer: to activite a
cursor.  You  may now type in a path from which your animation file
may be read.

- LOAD PATCH - Left-click on Load to actually load the patch of 
animation file.  A file selector will appear from which you may select
your file name.

Once your patch is loaded, you may edit it and return to the Path
menu at any time.  (It will be highlighted in the Load/Save menu to
indicate its activity. After the first patch load, the bottom row of
icons in the Patch menu will have changed to the following:

- NEW - Left-click on New to load in another patch without saving
the one currently in memory, or to cancel the current Patch
procedure.  When you click on New, it brings back up the original
Patch menu.

- DF1:ZoeAnims/MyAnimation.rif - The second box in the lower Patch
menu displays the name of the ifle you are currently patching.

- PAGE - Left-click on Page to save the currently edited patched and
automatically load the next patch from the full animation file.  After
page 108-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

selecting Page, ZOETROPE will overwrite and replace the original
frames in the disk file of your animation with those of the patch
range in memory.  It will then automatically load in the segment of
frames from the animation file immediately following the segment
you've just completed editing.

- SAVE - Left-click on Save to save to disk the edited animation
segment patch without advancing to the next patch range.  The
edited frames will overwrite and relace the original frames in the
disk file of your animation.  When the save is completed, the
original Patch menu will reappear.

WARNING:  Do not switch data disks once you have started a Patch
operation, as ZOETROPE looks for the original file to overwrite the
new information.  Also, make sure you've made a backup of your
animation before using Patch - or before using any function which can
permenantly alter your artwork.

THE ZOETROPE FILE SELECTOR

The custom ZOETROPE file selector will appear whenever you are loading
data from disk into memory, or saving data to disk from memory.  At
the top of the file selector is a title bar describing the current
I/O action.  (I/O stands for Input/Output.  A typical disk Input action
would be to load a rif file, in which case the title bar would display: Load 
rif File.)  The remain sections of the file selector are described below.

- FILE WINDOW - Most of the left side of the file selector is taken
up by the File Window, which lists all files and drawers within the
file path designated in the Drawer field of either the Load/Save menu or 
the file selector (both Drawer fields
page 109-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

function identically).  You may enter and list the files within
any drawer by clicking on the drawer title (containing a '/'
before it) in the File Window.  You may select file by clicking
once on it, then take action (Load,Save, or Kill) by clicking
in the OK box at the bottom of the file selector.  Or, you may
both select and take action by double-clicking on the file.  If
there are more files than the File Window can show, you may
scroll through them by either dragging the slider bar to the left
of the window, or by clicking on the u or down arrows of the
slider bar.  Hold down the mouse button while pointing to a
slider area that does not contain the bar to page the file
window up or down.

- FILE - The File field will dislay the name of whichever file
is currently selected for whichever I/O action.  Typically, this
field is used to enter new file names to be saved to disk.  To
enter text in the field, you must first click inside the field so
that a square cursor appears.  You may now use the backspace, 
delete, and cursor arrow keys to edit and enter text.  Only the
filename is required.  Extenders are optional for specific types
of file actions (e.g. if youu are loading a rif file, you do not
need to include the .rif extender, ZOETROPE will assume it).
After entering the text, press [Return] and the chosen file 
action will take place.  You may click on the word 'File' to
toggle the filename between the current file entry and the last
file entry (assuming there was one).

- DRAWER - This field works as the Drawer field in the
Load/Save menu, and displays the current path of the files
displayed in the file window.  Left-click in the Drawer field to
activate a square cursor.  You may now type in the path you
wish ZOETROPE to search.  Typically, this will be DF0: or 
DF1:.  If your files were in a drawer labeled "ZoeAnims' on a
disk in drive DF1:, you would enter DF1:ZOEANIMS/.
Hard drive owners will find the first partition labeled DH0: and
the remaining partitions labeled, tyically, DH1:, DH2:,
DH3:, etc. (These labels depend on your hard disk software.
Some may label the partitions P2:, P3:, etc.)  As a default the
drawer field will point to where you booted ZOETROPE from.
If you have entered on or more drawers, you may click on the
word 'Drawer' to toggle the drive path between current path
page 110-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

and the last path (e.g. between DF0:devs/keymaps/ and DF0:devs/).

- WILDCARD - This field displays the current wildcard mask which
may be used to limit the display of files in the file window.
You may enter text in this field by first clicking in the field so
that a square cursor appears, then using the backspace, delete,
and cursor arrow keys for editing text.  You may click on the
word 'Wildcard:' to toggle between the current, default
wildcard mask (e.g. *.rif displays only .rif files), and a
wildcard mask displaying all files.  Note that drawers will be
listed no matter what the wildcard mask.

NOTE:  ZOETROPE does not use the standard Amiga 
wildcards (sorry, but neither does anyone else).
ZOETROPE wildcards are fashioned after those used by
most microcomputers today.  An asterisk (*) stands for any
or all letters on either side of the extender period, and
question marks (?) replace unknown letters. Thus, *.rif
will display all files with a .rif extender.  Frog.* will 
display all 'Frog' filenames, no matter what the extender.
Frog*.* will display all files that begin with the letters
'Frog'.   F??g*.* will display all files that begin with 'f.'
followed by any two characters, followed bya 'g', and any extender.

- DEVICE BOXES - Using the eight boxes below Wildcard, you
may quickly move beetween youur available disk devices, or
partitions.  Click in the box in the upper left (/) to move one
step out of the current drawer you are in.  If you were two
layers deep, two clicks would take you to the root directory.
The remaining boxes display the disk devices available,
depending on your Amiga's configuration.  If yo have two
disk drives, you might see DF0: and DF1:.  With two disk
drives plus a triple-partitioned hard disk containing a RAMdisk,
you would see DF0:, DF1:, DH0: (the root partition), P2:,
P3:, RAM:.  As an example, to find picture files in a drawer
labeled MYPICS that is in the third partition, of your hard
disk, you would click on P3: to move to that partition, then
click on MYPICS, which would be displayed in the file 
window.  If you see no .pic files, click on Wildcard: to
see all files.
page 111-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

- OK/CANCEL - Click on OK to take the chosen file I/O action on
the file dislayed in the File: field.  Click on Cancel to avoid
any file I/O operation and return to the Load/Save menu.

MATTE [$]

Select on Matte to activate the Matte menu - a single bar containing
the options Load, Save, Mask, Imask, and Xor. The Matte menu is
designed to create traveling masks, which are animated 'holes' through
which other images or animations may be displayed.  The holes can be
as complex as any image drawn on the ZOETROPE screen.

To see the Matte menu, first load an animation into memory which
will become your traveling mask.  Next, select the type of mask you
want - normal, inverse, or xor. Finally, load a second animation into
memory which will be merged and displayed through the masking effect
of the first animation.   Keyboard alternatives: [L] Load; [S] Save;
[M] Mask; [I] Inmask; [X] Xor.

  Load/Save - Load and save in the Matte menu are identical with the
Load/Save functions in the main Load/Save menu, except that they
are always set to normal, .rif, and To Frame.  Thus, using Load from
the Matte menu will replace any animation in memory with the selected
animation from disk.  Using save from the Matte menu will save the
current animation in memory.

  Mask - Click on Mask and a file selector will appear.  Select a .rif
file to load.  The loaded file will be merged with the animation in memory
in such a way that color register #0 of the original animation will mask
the incoming file's images, and all other colors of the original will
become transparent, allowing the merged animation to show through.
The final animation will use the palette(s) of the incoming file.

  Inmask - Click on Inmask (Inverse mask) and a file selector will appear.
Select a .rif file to load.  The loaded file willbe merged with the
animation in memory in such a way that color register #0 of the
original animation will be transparent, allowing the incoming file's
images to show through, while all other colors of the original will
mask the incoming animation with color register #0.  The final
aniation will use the palette(s) of the incoming file.
page 112-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

  Xor - Click on Xor and a file selector will appear.  Select a .rif file to
load.  The loaded file will be merged with the animation in memory in
sch a way that overlapping colors will be xor'd creating a translucent
effect.  Xor is most eful for merging two animations - one of which
has been Masked and the oter Imasked with the same mask. This
creates a full 'traveling matte' effect and is particularly useful for
elaborate wipes and disolves.  For example, create an animation that is
nothing but a box moving from one side of the screen to the other.
Save this as MATTE.SEQ.  Now Mask this with another animation,
say FIRST.SEQ. Save the results as MASKED.SEQ.  Load
MATTE.SEQ again, and Imask it with still another animation, say
SECOND.SEQ.  Finally, xor the result with MASKED.SEQ.  The
result is an animation that has FIRST.SEQ where the box was in
MATTE.SEQ, and SECOND.SEQ everywhere else.

NOTE:  In all cases, if the merging file contains less frames than the
existing animation, the last frame of the merging animation will be
duplicated throughout the remaining frames in memory. Should the
merging file contain more frames than the masking animation, the
extra frames will not be loaded.  Also, the frame mode settings have
no effect while merging files within the Matte menu.

The Xor is applied to bit planes and affects colors based on their
register position in the color palette, rather than their actual RGB value.
The following chart shows the results of Xor'ing any two color
registers.  If, for example, the color in register 0 is xor'd with the color
in register 0, the result will be the color in register 0.  If the color in
register 5 is Xor'd with the color in register 8, the result will be the 
color in register 13, and so on.
page 113-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION
  Page 113 contains Xor chart
page 114-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

SET FONT [=]
Select Set Font to alter the subsequent appearance of the text font
printed using the Text option of the Draw menu. A Font menu will
appear displaying a list of available fonts (dpending upon which fonts
were in the fonts drawer of your boot disk, or the drawer to which you
have assigned your fonts.)  If there are more fonts than may be
displayed within the font-list window, you may scroll through the list
by either dragging the slider bar, or clicking on the up or down arrows
to the left of the window.

Left-click to select the desired font, and an example of it will appear in
the lower-right window.  In the upper right of the Set Font menu box
are three text styles: Underline, Bold, and Italic.  Click on any or all of
these to affect the chosen font.

Click on Default to reselect the default ZOETROPE font (topax 8).  If
you are using separate fonts disks, (or have changed the fonts drawer
via (for examle) 'assign fonts: DF1:fonts' from the CLI), click on
Relist to refresh the list of available fonts after switching disks.

Click the right mouse button to return to the main screen.

AIR SPEED [#]
Select Air Speed to set the speed and the breadth of the Airbrush,
and the speed of Streak (see Airbrush and Streak in the Draw menu,
below).  An Air Speed adjustment box will appear with two slider bars
labeled: Speed and Spread.

The Speed of the Airbrush flow (or intensity) may be adjusted from 1 to
100 by either clicking on the left and right arrows in the slider bar, or
by dragging the number box.  (This also affects the speed at which
Streak begins to skip).  The Spread (or breadth) of the Airbrush may be
adjusted in the same way.

Click the right mouse to return to the main screen.
page 115-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

STATUS [?]
Select Status and a box will appear indicating the current status of your
computer's RAM (random access memory).

Available:		Displays the total bytes of free RAM
			currently available for your frames.

Used:			Displays the total bytes of RAM used by all
			frames of your animation.

CHIP Free:		Displays the total bytes of memory usable
			by the Amiga custom chips, including the
			blitter.  ZOETROPE uses this memory for
			rotating and stretching the clip buffer, and
			for all APM buffers.

FAST Free:		Displys the total bytes of memory not used
			by ZOETROPE and available for other
			programs after invoking the Pause command.

Last Frame Update:	Displays the number of bytes of delta
			information used between the current frame
			and the previous frame.

Next Frame Update:	Displays the number of bytes of delta
			information used between the current frame
			and the next frame.

Average Update:		Displays the average number of bytes of
			delta information used per frame over the
			entire animation.

NOTE:  The amount of delta information required between two identical
frames is 74 bytes, no matter how complex the image.

PIXEL f/x [~]
Select Pixel f/x to access the Pixel ff/x menu.  From this menu, you
may apply 12 different functions to the pixels on a frame, or range of
frames, creating stunning visual effects. Four of the functions -
Shatter,  Crystalize, Ripple, and Buzz - are affected by the status of
Tween.  You may exit the Pixel f/x menu at any time by pressing the
right mouse button.
page 116-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

The top two rows of the Pixel f/x menu contains the Playback Bar, and
Segment Range Bar respectively. Both of these have been described
earlier and their functions are identical in the Pixel f/x menu.  (See The
Playback Bar section, and Segment Range Bar in the Time section.)

The remaining 12 boxes contain the ixel effects.  While Pixel f/x
menu is displayed, the first letter of each effect becomes a keyboard
alternatives.  Thus, press [D] to activate Defocus, [T] for Tile, etc.
Press [Help] to reverse any To Frame operation, or you may click in
the Undo box in the Pixel f/x menu.  Multiple frame operations may
not be reversed, so you will be promted to proced.  You may abort
multiple frame oerations at any time by pressing a key, or holding
down the right mouse button.

NOTE:  The standard ZOETROPE keyboard alternatives are not in
effect while the pixel f/x menu is displayed.

DEFOCUS [D] - Defocus is a blurring effect similar to, but less
discriminating than Antialias (below).  It does pixel averaging over the
entire frame, or range of frames, and may be repeated a limited number
of times for increased effect.  Defocus functions identically in each
frame in a range regardless of the Tween setting.

ANTIALIAS [A] - Antialias is similar to defocus (above), save that it
does not affect vertical and horizontal edges and is a little more
discriminating in the pixels it chooses to alter. Its overall effect is to
smsooth the jagged edges caused by the visible pixels in low resolution.
It can be repeated to a limited extent for increased effect. Antialias
functions identically in each frame in a range, regardless of the Tween
setting.

NOTE:  For the best antialiasing, your palette should contain a
range of some colors similar to the color you wish to antialiase.
page 117-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

OUTLINE [O] - Outline removes all pixels within every solid, single-
colored area on screen, leaving a one-pixel edge of the original color of
each area.  The smallest possible 'solid' area of color affected by
Outline would be a 3x3 pixel square, in which the single, middle pixel
would be removed.  Outline functions identically in each frame in a
range, regardless of the Tween setting.

EDGE IN [E] - Edge In changes the one-pixel border of all solid, single-
colored areas of a selected screen color, to the current drawing color.
When selected, you will be presented with the full screen.  Click on any
color and all borders of that color will be changed - one-pixel in depth
to the current drawing color.  You may outline multi-colored clusters
within the background color by clicking on the background rather than a
color.  Edge In functions identically in each frame in a range, regardless
of the Tween setting.

SHATTER [S] - Shatter shifts every other scan line of an image
horizontally, one ixel, in opposite directions.  Over a range of frames
with Tween off, Shatter will perform an identical one-pixel shift on
each frame. Over a range of frames, with Tween on, Shatter wil
calculate the amount of shift necessary, over the range, to split the
entire screen in two, leaving a blank screen as the last frame of the
animation.  You may reverse this effect by performing Shatter To
Segment after reversing the direction of the Segment Range Bar.

CRYSTALIZE [C] - Crystalize looks at every pixel on screen, adds the
color-register numbers of the four adjacent pixels above, below, left,
and right of it, then puts the result (modula 32) in the center.

Luckily, you don't have to udnerstand how crystalize works to use it.
It works best with simle shapes. In To frame mode, select Crystalize
and its effect on an image will be immediately evident.  Crystalize is a
cumulative effect and may be repeated on a single frame for heightened
effect.  Over a range of frames with Tween off, crystalize will perform
the identical effect on each frame.  Over a range of frames with Tween
on, crystalize will use only the first frame as a 'seed' frame and
perform a growing crystalization of that seed over the given range.

WARNING:  The images in all remaining frames will be lost when
you crystalize over multiple frames with Tween on!  Only frame #1
will remain unchanged.
page 118-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

The effect of crystalization on a color depends on that color's position
in the color palette - not on its hue.  The color in register #16 (fifth
down on the left in the Color menu) will crystalize into only its own
color. Register #8 will use only registers #16 and #24, and register #24
will use only registers #8 and #16.

TILE [T] - Select Tile and full screen will appear with crosshairs
similar to those used the clip buffer.  Left-click on any portion of
the screen to set one corner of a rubber box, then hold down the mouse
button and drag the box to create the opposite corner.  When you release
the button, the defined area will remain on screen, and a duplicate copy
will be 'tiled' outward filling the entire screen.  Tween has no effect on
Tile.  When used over a range of frames, the defined area will become a
multiple window of the animation - which will continue within the
tiles.

NOTE:  Tiling animations can be extremely memory-intensive,
particularly if the most active area of the animation is chosen for
the tile.  One-megabyte machines will usually be limited to very
small images over a limited range of frames.  However, single-frame
tiling is very effective for creating grids and patterns.

UNREZ [U] - Unrez divides the screen into a grid of 2-pixel squares, then
colors each square with the color of the pixel in the upper-left corner of
that square - effectively lowering the resolution of the screen image.
The effect is not cumulative,and Tween has no effect.

WIPE [W] - Wipe is designed primarily for use over a range of frames
and ignores the Tween status.  It performs a vertical wipe, blanking the
screen from the top to the bottom, evenly over the range of frames
indicated by the frame mode.  The last frame of the range will always
become blank.  If performed on a single frame, Wipe will simple blank
out the top half of the screen.

VENETIAN [V] - Venetian, like wipe, is designed primarily for use over a
range of frames.  It also ignores the status of Tween.  Venetian
performs a 'venetian blind' wipe, until the last frame in the range is
blank.  If performed on a single frame, Dissolve will blank every other
group of ten scan lines over the entire screen.

RIPPLE [R] - Ripple applies a vertical sine wave to the screen image. It
may be aplied to a single frame, or animated over a range of frames.
When you select Ripple, the full screen will appear displaying
page 119-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

crosshairs similar to those used by Tile (above).  Drag out a box, which
will indicate the amplitude and period of the wave.  When you release
the mouse button, the screen image (in single-frame mode) will be
rippled into a sine wave.

If Ripple is aplied over a range of frames, with Tween set to off, each
frame iwll apear the same as a single-frame ripple.  When Ripple is
applied over a range of frames with Tween set to on, the sine wave will
perform one complete modulation over the given range of frames. That
is, the wave will modulate from zero to full amplitude, back to zero,
then to full amplitude in the opposite direction, and finally, back to
zero.

As mentioned, set the amplitude and period of the sine wave by
dragging the crosshair box.  The size of the box along the x axis
(horizontal) is the amplitude of the wave, not counting the single-pixel
center line of the wave; the size of hte box along the y axis (vertical) is
one-half of the period - or one 'hump' of the wave.  The position on
screen where the cursor is first clicked to create the box, will align with
the beginning of the wave as it curves to the right. (See picture below.)

BUZZ [B] - Buzz is identical to Ripple, save that it creates a sawtooth
wave instead of a sine wave.  See Ripple, above, for details.

APM f/x [A]
Select APM f/x to access the APM f/x menu.  The APM f/x (Antic
Pixel Mover effects) menu contains many of the most powerful features
of ZOETROPE.  With it, you may quickly manipulate images over any
range of frames, creating spectacular animation effects. You can scale,
page 120-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

move, and rotate abouut three axes the contents of the clip buffer, or
entire animated sequences, tweened over any range of frames.

The top row of the APM f/x menu includes the Playback Bar (see
Playback Bar, described previously).  APM adjustments most often
result in animation, in which case the frame mode must be set To All
(a), or To Segment (s).  When set To frame (f), only the final position
of the APM adjustment(s) will be pasted to the currently displayed
frame.  (See Time; To All, To Segment.)

The second row contains a duplicate of the Segment Range Bar (see
Time, in the Menu section).  With this, you may set the range of
frames affected by your APM f/x when in To Segment frame mode.  To
the right of the Range Controller bar is the Tween indicator (t).  Click
on this letter to toggle Tween on or off.  The letter box will be
highlighted when active (the default).

Tweened APM effects paste the beginning position of an image to the
first frame of a range, the end position of an image to the last frame,
and rogressive, intermediate ositions over the range of frames in
between.  When played back, this creates an illusion of smooth
animation.  If the frame mode is set To Frame, however, only the last
positoin of the image wil be pasted to the displayed frame.

When Tween is inactive, only the final position of APM
adjustments will be pasted over the range of frames.

The remainder of the APM f/x menu contains options specific to the
operation of the APM rendering.

The column on the left contins the five main APM f/x commands:
Preview, Clear, Render, Motion, and Clip:
page 121-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

PREVIEW - Left click on Preview to activate an outline box which will
represent how the current APM settings will move your animation.
The box will be as large as the current clip buffer if you are animating a
clip, or as large as the screen if you are animating an entire animation
sequence.

NOTE: If you have not set any of the APM motion controls, or your
frame mode is To Frame, the Preview function will display a
stationary box.

CLEAR - Left-click on Clear to clear all of the APM settings for both
Motion and First (see below).  A requester will prompt you to continue
with the operation or cancel it.

RENDER - Left-click on Render to actually create the final APM version
of your animation.  During a render operation, each affected frame of
the animation (depending on framemode) will be redrawn using the
APM f/x settings. Multiple-frame Render operations cannot be undone,
but you can abort any multiple-frame operation by pressing any key, or
by clicking the right mouse button.  A requester will appear asking if
you want to abort the Render. Left-click on Yes or No (or press [Y] or
[N].  If you select Yes, only those frames not yet rendered will remain
unaffected.  Any frames already rendered may not be undone.

MOTION/FIRST - Motioon is the default setting of this option, First is the
alternate setting.  Left-click on Motion ot toggle to First, and vice-
versa.  APM movement settings (Center, Turns, etc.) which are
adjusted while Motion is active will not appear when First is active.
Likewise, those settings made while First is active, will not appear
when Motion is active.

While in Motion, all APM movement settings on the right side of the
menu apply to the course of your entire animation over the specified
range of frames.

If you are in First, all the APM movement settings on the right side of
the menu will affect only the position of the starting frame.  APM
settings adjusted while in Motion have no effect on those adjusted while
in First.  thus, you may adjust your image to a particular setting while
First is active, then switch to Move and use different settings for the
tweened APM movements.  During the Render process (or Preview),
the image will begin at the First setting, then move from that setting
using the Move settings.
page 122-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

CLIP/SEQ - Clip is the default setting of this option; Seq is the alternate
setting.  Left-click on Clip to toggle to Seq, and vice-versa.

While in Clip mode, the APM settings, plus the Preview and
Rendering aply to the contents of your clip buffer.

If you are in Seq(uence) mode, the APM settings, plus the Preview and
Rendering apply to the entire animation sequence.

The primary difference between Clip and Sequence is that, when in Clip
mode, the APM will perform specified animation movements, or
transformations, on static images, while Sequence performs
movements, or transformations, on a animated screen.  Thus, you can
use Sequence to roduce an additional layer of movement on already-
moving images - an effect equivalent to a move screen with animated
images moving through sace.

The second column of APM f/x options affects the function of the
slider bars on the right half of the menu screen.

TURN - Left-click on Turn to activate.  Turn lets you set the rotation of
your clip buffer or animation sequence.  These include the placement of
the Center of rotation about the X, Y, and Z axes; the axis (or axes)
about which the rotation will take place, and the number of rotations
(either full or partial) which will occur over the range of frames.

When Turn is selected, the following options are available in the
column to the right:

CENTER - Left-click on center to position the center of rotation. Once
activated, the three slider bars to the right will represent (from top to
bottom) the X, Y, and Z axes.  You may adjust any of the slider bars
by clicking on the arrows on either side, or by dragging the number in
the slider bar.  The direction of the arrows represents the direction of
movement along the chosen axis.  Thus, the X axis is horizontal from
left to right, Y is vertical from top to bottom, and Z is depth from back
to front.

The number in the slider represents, in pixels, the position of the
Center on your workscreen.  The ZOETROPE coordinate system is
based on the low-resolution Amiga screen, which is 320 pixels wide
by 200 pixels high. The X axis runs fro 0 on the left edge to 319 on
the right; the Y axis runs from 0 on the top edge to 199 on the bottom;
page 123-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

the Z axis, for the purpose of ZOETROPE, begins at 0 at the surface of
the monitor, and runs forward to 320, or back to -320.  At default, the
X, Y, and Z slider bars are set to 160, 100, and 0, which is the center
position on the screen.  Because ZOETROPE allows you to position
images outside the borders of the screen, the X axis has an overrun of
160 pixels, and the Y axis has an overrun of 220 pixels.  Thus, the X
slider bar runs from -160 (160 pixels off the left edge of the screen),
through 0 (the left edge), past 160 at the center, through 319 (the right
edge), to 480 (160 pixels off the right edge).  The Y slider bar runs
from -220 (220 pixels off the top pedge of the screen), through 0 (top top
edge), past 100 at the center, through 199 (the bottom edge), to 420
(220 pixels off the bottom edge).

You may alternatively set the center position along the X and Y axes
by using the two indicator boxes beneath the slider bars, described
below.

MOUSE XY - Left-click on Mouse XY to manually set the centerpoint
on your workscreen.  A full workscreen will appear, along with a
moveable crosshair and an X and Y coordinate readout in the upper-left of
your screen (see Center, above).  Use your mouse to move the cursor to
the point you want defined as the center, then left-click to set your new
centerpoint.  You may not set the Z axis with this option.

DEFAULT - Left-click on Default to set your center of rotation to the
center of the clip box (if you are in Clip mode) or the center of your
screen (if you are in Sequence mode).  The Z axis will automatically be
set to zero.

AXIS - Left-click on Axis to select the axis (or axes) around which your
clip buffer, or animation sequence, will rotate.  When Axis is selected,
the three slider bars on the right will represent, from top to bottom, the
X, Y, and Z axes.  The bottom row will now dislay 'X', 'Y', and
'Z'.

If you wish your rotation to be performed about a horizontal, vertical,
or deth axis, click on the X, Y, or Z box in the bottom row.  The
slider bar representing that axis will move all the way to the right and
become 100, and the other two axes will return to the middle and
become zero.

If you wish your rotation to be performed about a diagonal axis, you
may adjust the slider bars representing the axes.  The three slider bars
page 124-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

are adjusted by dragging the numbers, or clicking on the arrows to be
right or left of the bars.  The arrows represent the direction of the axis:
X axis is horizontal, Y axis is vertical, and Z axis is deth (represented
by diagonal lines).

The numbers in the bars run from -100 on the far left, to zero in the
middle, to 100 on the far right, and represent the axis as a vector in
three-dimensional space. Negative numbers create movement in one 
direction, and positive numbers create movement in the opposite 
direction.  (These directions are dependent on the Turn settings,
described below).

Other than the directional effect created by negative or positive
numbers, you must set more than one axis for the ranges to have any
effect.  Thus, if both X and Y are set to zero, any Z setting from 1 to
100 will create identical rotations about the Z axis.  (-1 to -100 will
create identical rotations in the other direction.)  However, when two or
more axes are set for rotation, the ratio of rotation about any set axis
will be affected by any other set axis.

NOTE:  None of the rotations mentioined above will operate unless a
Turn has been set, as described below.

TURN - Left-click on Turn to adjust the number of whole and/or partial
turns of your clip buffer or animation sequence.  A 360 degree rotation
is one complete Turn.

When you click on Turn, two labeled slider bars appear on the right;
Part Turns (Degrees), and Full Turns.  Part Turns lets you adjust any
portion of a single rotation - from no rotation (0), to one complete
rotation (360), to anything in between a single rotation.  Full Turns
lets you select the number of full rotations you wish (from -16 to 16).
Either bar is adjusted by clicking on the left or right arrows, or dragging
the number box.  Positive numbers create the rotation in one direction
and negative numbers create the rotation in the opposite direction.
(These directions are deendent on the Axes settings described above.)
Thus, to set a rotation that is 3-1/2 turns, set the Part Turns bar to 180
(degrees) and the Full Turns bar to 3.

SIZE - Left-click on Size to affect the scaling of your clip buffer or
animation over a segment of frames.  Once you've selected Size, the
selection area immediately to the right changes to offer a selection
page 125-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

between Center, and Scale.  Center ositions the center of expansion or
shrinkage, and Scale adjusts the amount of expansion or shrinkage.

CENTER - Left-click on Center and three slider bars will appear
representing, from top to bottom, the X,Y, and Z axes.  Below these, a
fourth row will dislay two boxes containing the labels: 'Mouse XY',
and 'Default'.  Through using these icon boxes you may place the
center from which your art will expand, or to which it will shrink.

You may adjust any of the three axis slider bars by clicking on the
arrows on either side, or by dragging thenumber in the slider bar.  The
direction of the arrows represents the direction of movement along the
chosen axis.  Thus, the X axis is horizontal from left to right, Y is
vertical from top to bottom, and Z is depth from back to front. Z zero
setting for all three axes is in the center of the screen at the screen's
surface.  Positive directions for the three axes are: X axis right, Y axis
bottom, and Z axis inward.

MOUSE XY - You may alternatively set the scaling center - along only
the X and Y axes - by clicking on Mouse XY.  A moveable crosshair
will appear, plus X-Y coordinate readouts in the upper-left of your
screen. Drag the crosshairs to the point you want to define as the X,Y
center, then left-click to set it.  This will become your new scaling
center. This operation will have no affect on the current Z-axis setting.

DEFAULT - You may automatically set your scaling center ot the center
of your clip buffer (or screen, in Sequence mode) by clicking on 
Default.

SCALE - While in Size mode, click on Scale, and two labeled slider bars
will apear: Reduce and Enlarge.  You may adjust the slide bars by
either clicking on the arrows to the right and left of the bars, or by
dragging the numbers themselves. The slide bar numbers represent the
multiplier (above), and the divider (below) of a fraction which, in turn,
represents the ratio of scaling that will be put into effect.  Underneath
the Scale box is the Size Ratio number, which is the result of dividing
the Reduce number by the Enlarge number.

When Scale is first selected both Reduce and Enlarge will be set to
100, and the size ratio number will be 1.00, meaning no scaling will
occur.  To reduce the scaling, set the Reduce number to be less than the
Enlarge number (e.g., Reduce=25, Enlarge=75, Size Ratio=.33, or one-
third).  To enlarge the scaling, set the Reduce number to be greater than
page 126-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

the Enlarge number (e.g. Reduce=100, Enlarge=50, Size Ratio=2.00,
or double).

MOVE - Left-click on Move to create a straight line path along which
your clip buffer, or animation sequence iwll move.  Three slider bars
will appear representing, from to to bottom, the X, Y, and Z axes.
Below these, a fourth row will display the label: 'Mouse XY".
Through using these controls, yo umay set the coordinates of the end
point of your ath.

You may adjust the coordintes of any of the three axis slider bars by
clicking on the arrows on either side, or by dragging the number in the
chosen axis.  Thus, the X axis is horizontal from left to right.  Y is
vertical from top to bottom, and Z is deth from back to front.  A zero
setting for all three axes is in the center of the screen at the screen's
surface.  ositive directions for the three axes are: X axis right, IY axis
bottom, and Z axis inward.  The sliders may abe adjusted up to 500 in
either direction so that entire pictures may be moved completely off of
the screen.

MOUSE XY - You may alternatively set the end point - on only the X
and Y axes - by clicking on Mouse XY.  An outline will appear around
your clipped image (or screen), and you may then drag the image to the
end point of your choice.  Release the mouse button to set the end
point.  This operation will have no effect on the current Z-axis setting.

PATH - Left-click on Path to create a path along which your clip buffer
or screen will move.  Path is different from Move (above) in that you
may create a path other than a straight line, and there are three different
types of paths.  When you select Path, four options will appear in the 
area to the right:  Clear Path, Path of Points, Clocked Sampled Path,
and Sampled Path.

	Clear Path - Left-click on Clear Path to erase any predefined
paths from memory.

	NOTE:  Clear Path is used to delete any path that may currently
exist.  Although there are three types of paths, only one path may be
used at any time.  Thus, the selection of a new path will also clear
any predefined path in memory.
page 127-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

	Path of Points - Left-click on Path of Points to activate.  Path of
Points allows you to set a pathway along which images may change their
rate of movement.

	When selected, your full screen will appear along with the cursor.
Create your path, point-by-point, by left clicking to set each point.  A
'rubber' line will appear between each set point to indicate your path.
When finished defining your path, click the right mouse button to
return to the APM f/x menu.

	When your clip buffer, or screen moves along the Path of Points, it
will take the same amount of time to travel between each point.
Therefore, it will appear to travel faster between points that are far
apart, and more slowly between points that are close together.  Thus,
the Path of Points can be used to alter rte of movement of the image
along the path.

	Clocked Sample Path - Left-click on Clocked Sample Path to activate.
The Clock Sample Path uses 'real-time' clock while recording your
path.  This makes rhythmic movement possible.

	Select Clocked Sample path and the full screen will appear.  When you
click on a second time a small representation of a spinning clock face will
be displayed on the screen.  While the clock is spinning, create your
path by moving the mouse (you do not have to press the buttons).
When the clock 'time' runs out, your path will be automatically
comleted and you may not draw any more.  The amount of time you
have to create your path depends on the number of frames in your
animation (or segment), and the setting of your Animation Speed Control
bar (see Time, above).

For example, if you are in To All mode on a 60-frame animation that
you are playing back at 30 frames per second, the clock iwll count out
two seconds, or exactly how long your animation sequence will be
accurately recreated by the APM Rendering (or the Preview).

	Sampled Path - This is the simplest method of creating a path.  Click
on Sampled Path and the full screen will appear.  Hold down your left
mouse button and trace out the path you want by moving your mouse
cursor.  Release the mouse button to comlete the path.  You can lay
down a maximum of 2048 path points in this mode.
page 128-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

KILL SEQ [K]
Select Kill seq to erase an entire animatin sequence from memory.  A
requestor will appear asking if you want to clear all frames from
memory. Select either Yes or No (or press [Y] or [N]).

WARNING - Kill Seq will erase all of your current animation sequence
from computer memory.  There's no way to undo this command - unless
you've saved a copy of your animation on disk.

PAUSE [,]
Select Pause to freeze ZOETROPE and provide access to the Amiga
Workbench.  All ZOETROPE functions will be frozen, a 'grab' bar
will apear at the top of the screen, and a requester will ask if you
wish to restart ZOETROPE.  You may now oint to the grab bar and drag
the ZOETROPE screen downward, revealing the workbench beneath.
Click on the Back Gadget of the Workbench to place it behind the
ZOETROPE screen.  Within the 'Restart Zoetrope?' requester, if you
click on No, the requester will next ask if you wish to leave
the workbench, click on No to return to Pause status.  To reactivate
ZOETROPE, select Yes in the 'Restart Zoetrope?' requester.

QUIT [Q]
Select Quit to exit the ZOETROPE program entirely and return to
the workbench.  A requester will appear asking if you want to leave
ZOETROPE.  Left-click on either Yes or No (or peres [Y] or [N]).

WARNING - Make sure that you have saved any changes to disk
before quitting ZOETROPE.  All work in memory will be lost at that time.

CLIP

The operations in the Clip menu all relate to an area of memory called
the clip buffer, which is reserved for block 'cut and paste' operatioins, 
such as those described in this section.  The clip buffer may also be
used as a form of brush in Streak, Stipple, or Airbrush drawing modes
(See Use Clip in the Brush menu, below); in APM f/x operations
(described previously), and the clip buffer may be accssed by disk I/O.
(See Load/Save, above).
page 129-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Only one image may be in the clip buffer at any time, and the image
laced in the clip buffer will remain there until replaced by another,
either through a cut or Clip operation, or by loading a .WIN file.

CUT [']
Cut allows you to cut out and copy all or part of an individual frame
into the clip buffer.

Select Cut and crosshairs will appear on your screen.  In the upper-left
corner of the screen will also appear the X and Y coordinates of the
center of the crosshairs. Left-click to set one corner of a 'rubber' box,
then drag the box (without releasing the button) to create the opposing
corner, and release the button to pace in the clip buffer whatever image
is within the box.  (The keyboard alternative for Cut is the key
immediately below the [Esc] key on your Amiga keyboard.)

Further screen coordinates will appear while the clip-buffer box is being
drawn.  The scren coordinates are in pixels, and are based on a low-
resolution Amiga screen, which is 320 pixels wide by 200 high.  The
X, Y coordinates are numbered, starting at zero, from the upper-left
corner of your screen.  The group of numbers, which appears during
the creation of the clip buffer are: (X starting point, Y starting point,
X box-size, X current point, Y current point).

PASTE [P]
Paste allows you to move and deposit the contents of your clip buffer
on the screen.  Depending on the setting of your frame mode (see Time,
above) you may paste the clip buffer to the single frame currently
displayed (To Frame); to a sequential range of frames (To Segment); or
to all frames in memory (To All).  Pasting the clip buffer while using
To Segment or To All is irreversable, so a requester will warn you
before you may proceed.  A single-frame paste may be undone by
pressing [Help].

When you left-click on Paste, your full workscreen will be activated,
and the contents of the clip buffer will appear inside the clip box.  You
may, at this point, click either mouse button to paste the clipped image
where it appears; or you may hold down the left button (from anywhere
on screen), drag the clipped image, then paste it by releasing the mouse
button.  If the frame mode is set to single-frame, [Help] will undo the
operation; otherwise, a requester will promt you before you may
roceed.  Multiple-frame astes will step frame-by-frame through the
selected frames and paste the clipped image on each frame.  If Tween is
page 130-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

active, and the pasted image was first moved, the multiple-frame pastes
will increment the image along the path of the movement.  If Tween is
inactive, the multiple-frame pastes will place the image in the same
position on each frame.  You may press any key during the multiple-
frame operation to abort the process.

As you drag the clip buffer, X and Y position coordinates, plus X and Y
delta coordinates will appear on the screen.  The low-resolution Amiga
screen is 320 pixels wide by 200 high.  The X and Y position
coordinates are numbered from the uper-left corner of your screen: X
runs horizontally from 0 to 319; Y runs vertically from 0 to 199.  The
first group of two numbers indicate the starting coordinates of the
upper-left corner of the clip buffer.  The second group represents the
deviation from the clip box's original starting coordinates.  As you
move the clip box to the left, the X-coordinate increase in negative
value; to the right, in positive value.  As you move the clip box up,
the Y-coordinate increase in negative value; down, in positive value.
(See Xray Copy in the Modes menu, below).

PASTE BELOW [B]
Paste below works exactly like Paste (above), except that the pasted
image will only appear through areas containing color register #0.  (See
Xray Copy in the Modes menu, below).

MOVE [M]
Move allows you to move a clip buffer image and position it anywhere
on your workscreen, without pasting it to the workscreen.  It works in
similar fashion to aste (above), but the frame modes (To Frame, To
Segment, To All) have no effect.

When you left-click on Move, your full workscreen will be activiated,
and the contents of the clip buffer will appear inside the clip box.  You
may, at this point, hold down the left button (anywhere on screen), drag
the clipped image to another location, then leave it by releasing the
mouse button. After you release the mouse button the clipped image
will vanish, but it will appear in its new positoin at the beginning of
subsequent clip buffer operations. On the other hand, using the clip
buffer as a brush (see Use Clip, below) does not alter its starting
position, or the position established by a Move operation.

As you drag the clip buffer, X and Y position coordinates, plus X and Y
delta coordinates will appear on the screen.  The low-resolution Amiga
screen is 320 pixels wide by 200 high.  The X and Y position
page 131-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

coordinates are numbered from the upper-left corner of your screen: X
runs horizontally from 0 to 319; Y runs vertically from 0 to 199.  The
first group of two numbers indicate the starting coordinates of the
upper-left corner of the clip buffer.  The second group represents the
deviation from the clip box's original starting coordinates.  As you
move the clip box to the left, the X-coordinate increase in negative
value; to the right, in positive value.  As you move the clip box upp,
the Y-coordinate increase in negative value; down, in positive value.

CLIP [TAB]
Clip automaticaly cust and places in the clip buffer all images in the
current frame which are not art of the background color.

Clip is similar to cut (above), except that it is automatic, and it places
in the clip buffer all images not made of the background color (register
#0).  When you select Clip, you will see a clip outline flash briefly on
the screen defining the erimeters of your clipped image (or images).  If
you have only one small image on screen, Clip will create a box just
large enough to encompass that image.  If there are two or more objects
scattered on the screen, the Clip boundary will be large enough to
encompass all images present.  If your entire screen is painted, Clip
will cut and store the whoel screen in the clip buffer.

ROTATE [R]
Rotate lets you rotate your clip buffer image about any one of the three
axes.  Rotate is afected by the framemode settings (To Frame, To 
Segment, To All) and the Tween setting in the Time submenu (see
Time, above).

When you left-click on Rotate, your full workscreen will appear
containing your last clip-buffer image.  You may now rotate, or move
this image.  To move the image, place the cursor anywhere inside the
clip box and drag the image to its new location.  Release the left mouse
button to release the image; you will remain in Rotate mode.  To rotate
the image, place the mouse cursor outside the box and hold down the
left mouse button.  A line will apear from the center of the box
radiating out to your cursor.  By rotating your cursor around the clip
box, a radius line will follow your cursor around the image (like hands
on a clock).  You'll also notice three other things:  You initial cursor
starting point has a line stretching from it to the center of the clip box,
the clipped image will start to rotate, and in the upper-left hand corner
of your screen is displayed the degrees of rotation from your initial
starting point. When you release the left mouse button, the image will
page 132-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

remain in its new position.  To paste the rotated image and exit Rotate
mode, click the right mouse button.

NOTE:  Rottion operations do NOT alter the orientation of the
original image in the clip buffer.

There eight ways to rotate your clip image, depending on where you
place your cursor outside the box. The cursor may be placed outside
any of the four corners, or any of the four sides.

The Clip box is represented as the center box of a 9-box grid, surrounded
by eight zones.  We'll use compass directions to refer to the zones.  
Thus, in a clockwise path the zones are: north, north-east, east, south-
east, south, south-west, west, and north-west. Placing your cursor in one
of these zones will enable you to rotate the clip box around various axes,
in various increments:

           Z-axis          X-axis            Z-axis
           (30)            (22.5)            (45)

           Y-axis          center            Y-axis
            (22.5)                            (1)

           Z-axis           X-axis            Z-axis
            (22.5)           (1)              (1)

North:		Rotate about the X-axis, in 22.5 degree increments.
Northeast:	Rotate about the Z-axis, in 45 degree increments.
East:		Rotate about the Y-axis, in 1 degree increments.
Southeast:	Rotate about the Z-axis, in 1 degree increments.
South:		Rotate about the X-axis, in 1 degree increments.
Southwest:	Rotate about the Z-axis, in 22.5 degree increments.
West:		Rotate about the Y-axis, in 22.5 degree increments.
Northwest:	Rotate about the Z-axis, in 30 degree increments.
page 133-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Counter-clockwise rotation is from zero to 360 degrees, clockwise
rotation is from 360 to zero degrees.

As an example, if you want to rotate your image 57 degrees around the Z
axis, point the cursor just outside the south-east corner of the box
(lower-left), hold down the left button, and move the mouse so that the
image rotates in a counter-clockwise direction.  Release the left mouse
button and the image will remain in its rotated position.  To actually
perform the operation (and exit Rotate mode) you must click the right
mouse button.

If Tween is on, and you are performing the rotation To All or To
Segment, a requester will first ask for your permission, since the
operation cannot be undone.  Choose Yes to proceed, or No to exit
Rotate. If you proceed, the original positoin of the image will be
pasted to the first frame, intermediate positoins will be pasted to
intermediate frames, and the final rotated position will be pasted to the
last frame. If Tween is off, an identical copy of the final rotated
position will be pasted to all selected frames.

Notice that, after rotating an image from outside a particular corner or
side of the clip box, you may release the left button, select a different
corner or side, and begin rotation again.  The clip box will immediately
return to its original orientation.

NOTE:  Rotations from the Clip menu are only done in one direction
(counter-clockwise).  The APM f/x menu can be used for multi-
directional rotations, or you may achieve reverse rotation by
refersing the Segment Range Bar before Rotating To Segment.

STRETCH [S]
Stretch lets you stretch or scale the image in your clip buffer along
the X and Y axes, elongating and distorting it.  Stretch is affected by
the framemode settings (To Frame, To Segment, To All) and the
Tween setting in the Time submenu (see Time, above).

Select Stretch and your full workscreen will appear containing your last
clip-buffer image.  You may now stretch or move this image. To
move the image, place the cursor anywhere inside the clip box and drag
the image to its new location.  Release the left mouse button to release
the image;  you will remain in Stretch mode.  To stretch the image,
place the cursor anywhere outside the clip box, hold down the left
button, and move the mouse.  Drag the mouse outward to enlarge the
page 134-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

image, drag the mouse inward to shrink the image.  When you release
the mouse, the image wil remain stretched. To paste the stretched
image and exit Stretch mode, click the right mouse button.

NOTE:  Stretch operations do NOT alter the size of the original 
image in the clip buffer.

During a Stretch operation, two sets of numbers wil appear in the 
upper-left corner of your workscreen. The first set of numbers, in the
parentheses, indicate how many pixels wide (X-axis) and high (Y-axis)
your clip box is. The following two numbers represent the percentage,
along the X and Y axes, of the stretched image as compared to the
original image.

There are eight ways to stretch your clip image, depending on where
you place your cursor outside the box.  The cursor may be placed
outside any of the four corners, or any of the four sides.

             X/Y              Y-axis               X/Y
            (INT.)            (INT.)              (INT.)

             X-axis           center               X-axis
             (INT.)                                (PIX.)

              X/Y              Y-axis               X/Y
             (PIX.)            (PIX.)              (PIX.)

As you can see in the diagram, the clip box is represented as the center
box of a 9-box grid, surrounded by eight zones.  We'll use compass
directions to refer the the zones.  Thus, in a clockwise path, the zones
are north, north-east, east,southeast, south, southwest, west and
north-west. Placing your cursor in one of these zones will enable you
to stretch the clip box along various combinations of the axes, in
various percentages.
page 135-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

North:		Stretch along the Y-axis (integer increments)
Northeast:	Stretch along the XY-axis (integer increments)
East:		Stretch along the X-axis (one pixel increments)
Southeast:	Stretch along the XY-axis (one pixel increments)
South:		Stretch along the Y-axis (one pixel increments)
Southwest:	Stretch along the XY-axis (one pixel increments)
West:		Stretch along the X-axis (integer increments)
Northwest:	Stretch along the XY-axis (integer increments)

Note that the side zones stretch the image along a single axis, whereas
the corner zones stretch the image along both X and Y axis.  Also the
south-east and north-west corners stretch both axes equally, maintaining
the proper aspect ratio of the original image;  the north-east and south-
west corners permit flexible change of either of the two axes.

The integer increments of the Stretch function work on the basic of a
percentaage of the last stretched size after the release of the mouse
button.  If you are in one of the integer move zones (see above) and you
move (or left-click) your cursor outward without releasing it, you will
stretch your clip box in percentages of 100 (1X), 200 (2X), 300(3X)
and so on.  If you are in one of the integer move zones and you move
(or left-click) your cursor inward, you will compress your clip box in
percentages of 50 (1/2), 33.3 (1/3) and 25 (1/4).

One-pixel increments stretch the image one pixel at a time.

If you are performing the stretch To All or To Segment, a requester will
first ask for your permission, since the operation cannot be undone.
Choose Yes to proceed, or No to exit Stretch.  If you proceed, and
Tween is on, the original position of the image will be pasted to the
first frame, intermediate positions will be asted to intermediate frames,
and the final stretched position will be pasted to the last frame.  If
Tween is off, an identical copy of the final, stretched osition will be
pasted to all selected frames.

Unlike the Rotate function (above), multiple Stretch operations are
cumulative.  That is, after stretching an image and releasing the left
mouse button, you may select a different corner and continue to stretch
or alter the previously stretched image.

INVERT [I]
Invert 'flips' whatever is in your cut buffer.  It will rotate images about
their X or Y axes 180 degrees, resulting in a mirror image of the
page 136-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

contents of your clip buffer.  Invert is not affected by frame modes or
Tween.

Select Invert and your full workscreen will appear containing the latest
image in your clip buffer. You may now move or invert this image.
To move the image, place your cursor anywhere inside the clip box and
drage the image, releasing the left button to release the image.  You will
remain in Invert mode.  Left-click anywhere outside the clip box to
invert the image.  The image will be fliped so that the side (or corner)
directly opposite your cursor becomes the side (or corner) nearest the
cursor.  thus, click outside the left or right sides to invert about the Y
axis; click outside the top or bottom sides to invert about the X axis.
Click outside any corner to invert both axes.  Right-click to paste
the image and exit Invert mode.

NOTE:  Unlike Rotate and Stretch operations (above) Invert DOES alter
the original image in the clip buffer.  After inverting an image,
however, you may left-click again in the same position to restore
the image.

FIT COLORS [N]
Select Fit Colors to adapt the colors contained in the clip buffer to
those of the palette in the currently dislayed frame.

If a current frame palette is different from that used originally by a
previously clipped image, the clipped image will take on the colors of
the new palette - which probably won't be correct for it. Fit Colors
will comare the old clip buffer colors with those in the new palette,
then remap the color registers in the cip buffer to match, as closely as
possible, its original colors.  The success of this effect will depend
largely on the similarity between the colors in the original clip-buffer
palette and those of the displayed frame palette.

As an example, Clip a yellow image from a frame where yellow is in
color register #2, then move to a frame where red is in color register #2,
but something close to yellow is in color register #6.  Before using Fit
Colors, the clipped image would red; after selecting Fit Colors,
ZOETROPE will match the yellows for a near-fit, and the clipped
image will now use register #6 and become yellow once more.

MASK [V]
Select Mask to change all colors in the clip buffer (except color register
#0) to one overall color - the color with which you have currently
page 137-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

selected to draw.  Note that color register #0 can be used with the Mask
functions and is often useful. (see Color)

DRAW

The Draw menu contains a list of ten drawing tools and their keyboard
equivalents.  Only one drawing tool may be active at any time, and the
currently active tool will have an asterisk indicator to the left of its
name.  The default drawing tool at boot-up is Draw with a one-pixel-
sized brush enclosed in an outlined cross-shaped cursor.

The operation of the drawing tools is unaffected by the frame mode or
tween setting, but the drawing tools are affected variously by options in
the Modes, Brush, and Color menus, and all drawing tools are 
affected by Cycle in the Color menu. (See Modes, Brush, and Color, below)

NOTE: Pressing [Help] will undo the last continuous drawing operation,
no matter what drawing mode you're in or what brush you're using.
Pressing [Help] again will restore the last thing you drew.

DRAW [1]
Select Draw to freehand draw a continuous, solid line using any of
ZOETROPE's colors or brushes.  To use the Draw tool, hold down the
left mouse button while moving the mouse.  A line will be drawn in
the current brush shape, using the selected color (See Brush, Color).

STREAK [2]
Streak is identical to Draw, except that the line drawn may not be solid,
depending on the speed of your mouse movements.  Swift mouse movements
will cause the Streak tool to skip pixels, giving a 'sketchy' look to 
the line.  As with Draw, Streak uses the current brush shape and
selected color.  Unlike Draw, Streak will operate with the Use Clip
function in the Brush menu.  The speed at which Streak begins to skip
may be set with the Air Speed menu (see Use Clip,Brush,Color & Air Speed).

STIPPLE [3]
Stipple sprays a small, randomly-arranged pattern of brush shapes in the
selected drawing color.  Unlike Airbrush (below), Stipple is not
adjustable, but it is functional with Use Clip (see Use Clip,Brush,Color).
page 138-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

AIRBRUSH [4]
Airbrush sprays a randomly arranged pattern of brush shapes in the
selected color.  Airbrush is similar to Stipple (above), but is adjustable
both in intensity of flow and in breadth of pattern.  Airbrush is
functional with Use Clip (see Air Speed in the Menu, above, and Use
Clip,Brush, & Color, below).

FILL [5]
Fill uses the selected color to fill any area of your screen composed of
a single color.  Thefill will alter all contigous pixels of the same color,
stoping when it reaches a different color.  Contiguous pixels may be
defined as those pixels whose sides are touching.

Upon selecting Fill, a hollow cursor labeled 'fill' will appear.  Place
the center of the cursor over the area you want filled and press the left
mouse button.  Your selected drawing color will fill that area (see Color).

LINE [6]
Line draws a straight line, in the selected color and brush, stretching
from one point to another. The Line tool will function differently
depending on the Distinct, Connected, and Concentric settings in the
Modes menu (see Brush,Color,and Modes).

Distinct:	Hold down the left mouse button while moving the mouse
		and a line will stretch from the first point in the
		selected color and using the selected brush.  Release
		the mouse button to draw the line.  You may now move
		the mouse cursor to a new position and repeat the above
		procedure to draw another line.

Connected:	Click once on the left mouse button to set the first
		point, move the mouse to stretch the line, left-click
		again to draw the line and set a second point, move the
		mouse again to stretch a line from the second point...
		continue in this fashion until you wish to exit the
		operation, at which point you click the right mouse
		button.

Concentric:	Concentric creates rays.  Click once on the left mouse
		button to set the center point of your rays.  Move the
		mouse away from the center and a thin 'rubber' line
		will appear.  Left click to draw the first ray, move the
page 139-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

		mouse, left click to draw the second ray - continue in
		this fashion until you wish to exit the operation by
		clicking the right mouse button.

POLYGON [7]
Polygon creates straight-edged geometric shapes in the selected color -
squares, rectanges, traezoids, etc.  The Polygon tool functions
identically inthe Distinct, Connected, and Concentric modes, but differs
depending on the Filled setting in the Modes menu (see Brush,Color, and
Modes).

Click once on the left mouse button to set the first point (or polygon
vertex), move the mouse and a line will appear, left-click to set the
second point, move the mouse a third time and a line will stretch from
the cursor to both the original point and the second point, click to set
this oint, then move the mouse again.  Each time you set a point and
move the mouse, a line will stretch fromthe cursor to both the original
point and the last point set.  Right-click to exit the operation.

If Filled is active in the Modes menu, a solid polygon will be created
and the selected brush shape will not be used.  If Filled is inactive in
the Modes menu, a hollow polygon will be created whose lines are
made up of the selected brush shape.

CIRCLE [8]
Circle creates circles in the selected color.  The Circle tool will function
differentlyi depending on the Distinct, connected, Concentric, and Filled
settings in the Modes menu (see Brush,Color & Modes).

Distinct:	Hold down the left mouse button and drag the mouse
		away.  A circle will be created, using the original
		mouse position as the center.  Release the mouse
		button to draw the circle.  If Filled is active in the
		Modes menu, a solid circle will be created and the
		selected brush shape will not be used.  If Filled is
		inactive in the Modes menu, a hollow circle will be
		created using the selected brush shape.

Connected:	Hold down the left mouse button and drag the mouse
		away.  A circle will be created using the original
		mouse position as the center.  Release the mouse
		button to draw the circle.  Now, repeat the above
		procedure to create a second circle.  This time, the center
page 140-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

		of the circle will automatically be placed at the position
		the mouse cursor was at when it was released after
		drawing the first circle. A third circle will use, as
		center, the release oint of the second, and so on.  If
		Filled is active in the Modes menu, solid circles will be
		created and the selected brush shape will not be used.  If
		Filled is inactive in the Modes menu, hollow circles
		will be created using the selected brush shape.

Concentric:	Hold down the left mouse button and draw the mouse
		away.  A circle will be created, using the original
		mouse position as the center.  Release the mouse 
		button to draw the circle.  Now, repeat the above
		procedure to create a second circle. This time, the center
		of the circle will automatically be placed at the center of
		the previous circle.  All subsequent circles will continue
		to use the same center, no matter where you click the
		mouse.  If Filled is active in the Modes menu, solid
		circles will be created and the selected brush shape will
		not be used.  If Filled is inactive in the Modes menu,
		hollow circles will be created using the selected brush 
		shape.

NOTE: Concentric circles will be most effective when used with Cycle,
or in non-Filled mode.

BOX [9]
Box creates squares or rectanges in the selected color.  The Box tool
will function differently depending on the Distinct, Connected,
Concentric, and Filled settings in the Modes menu (see Brush, Color,
& Modes).

Distinct:	Hold down the left mouse button and drag the mouse
		away.  The position where the mouse was first clicked
		becomes one corner of the box, while the current mouse
		position creates the opposing corner.  Release the
		mouse button to draw the box.  If Filled is active inthe
		Modes menu, a solid box will be created and the selected
		brush shape will not be used.  If Filled is inactive in the
		Modes menu, a hollow box will be created using the selected
		brush shape.

page 141-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Connected:	Hold down the left mouse button and drag the mouse away.
		A box will be created, as described above.  Release the
		mouse button to draw the box, then repeat the procedure
		to create a second box.  This time, the initial corner
		of the box will automatically be placed at the position
		the mouse cursor was at when it was released after
		drawing the first box.  A third box will use, as its
		corner, the release point of the second, and so on.
		If Filled is active in the Modes menu, solid boxes will
		be created and the selected brush shape will not be used.
		If Filled is inactive in the Modes menu, hollow boxes 
		will be created using the selected brush shape.

Concentric:	Hold down the left mouse button and drag the mouse away.
		A box will be created.  Release the mouse button to
		draw the box, then repeat the procedure to create a 
		second box. This time, the center of the box will grow,
		concentrically, from the center of the previous box. All
		subsequent boxes will continue to use the same center,
		no matter where you click the mouse.  If Filled is active
		in the Modes menu, hollow boxes will be created using the
		selected brush shape.

NOTE:  Concentric boxes will be most effective when used with Cycle, or
in non-Filled mode.

TEXT [0]
Text enables you to print text, of the selected color, in varying fonts
and point sizes.  To pick a specific size and type of font, use the Set
Font option, as described in the Menu section, above.  As a default,
ZOETROPE will use topaz 8.

When you select Text, the cursor will change to an 'L' shape. Point
the cursor to the position you wish to start typing, and click the left
button.  An outline box will apear that is the size of the selected point
size.  Type in the text you desire, either upper or lower-case (press
[CapsLock] to maintain all uper-case).  As you type, the text will
apear on your screen in the selected color.  Click the right mouse
button to return ot the L-shaped cursor.  You may now reposition the
cursor, and left-click to begin new text in another position.
page 142-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

If you mistype a character, simply backspace over it.  If you change
your mind, and do not want the text to appear in that position, either
right-click and press [Hel], or backspace over the entire line of text to
eliminate it, then click the right mouse button.

NOTE: ZOETROPE keyboard alternatives will not function while typing in
Text mode.

MODES

The Modes menu contains a list of modes which may be turned on or
off, and which affect various of the functions in ZOETROPE.  Selected
(active) modes will have an asterisk displayed to the left of their name.
The first four functions: Zoom, Ping Pong, Xray Copy, and Filled,
may be either all active, or all inactive. Of the last three functions:
Distinct, Connected and Concentric, only one may be active at any time,
and at least one must be active.

ZOOM [Z]
Zoom turns the workscreen into a magnified window of a selected
portion of the workscreen.  All tools in ZOETROPE will operate
properlyi in either Zoom or normal view mode.

Select Zoom and a box will appear which represents the magnify
window.  Move the mouse to whichever portion of your screen you
wish magnified, and click the left mouse button.  The area within the
box will be magnified to fill the entire workscreen.  You may use any
of ZOETROPE's functions while in Magnify.  To return to the normal
workscreen, select Zoom again from the Modes menu.

While Zoom is active, you may move the position of Zoom window
within the workscreen by pressing various of the number keys
on the keypad at the right of your Amiga keyboard.  The number [5]
represents the current position of the Zoom window, and the eight keys
surrounding it represent the directions you may move the window.

Remember that the keyboard alternatives are active while in Zoom
mode, so to move forward or backward through an animation sequence,
one frame at a time, just press the right or left cursor-arrow keys.  [F1]
will place you at the beginning of your animation, [F10] will take you
forward or backward.
page 143-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

PING PONG [W]
Ping Pong, when active causes animation playbacks to cycle from the
first frame to the last frame, then backwards to the first frame,
repeatedly.  For example, a five-frame animation sequence would play
as 1-2-3-4-5-4-3-2-1, etc.

Select Ping Pong to toggle it on or off.  When active (as shown by the
asterisk to the left of the word), you will be in Ping Pong mode.  No
effect will be seen until you play your animation.

XRAY COPY [X]
When X-ray Copy is active, the background color (register #0) of the
clip buffer is transparent during clip-buffer paste operations.  When X-
ray copy is inactive, all colors in the clip buffer, including register
#0 are opaque.  Select X-Ray Copy to toggle it on or off.

XRay Copy affects any operations where the clip buffer is drawn to the
screen, including Tween operations and APM f/x.  It does not affect the
Text drawing tool.

FILLED [F]
Select Filled to toggle it on or off.  When Filled is active, the Circle,
Box, and Polygon tolls in the Draw menu will create solid shapes.
When Filled is inactive, the Circle, Box, and Polygon tools will create
hollow shapes, and will use the selected brush for their lines (see
Circle, Box, and Polygon in the Draw menu, above).
page 144-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

The three Modes below affect the operation of the Line,Circle, and Box
tools in the Draw menu.  They do not affect the Polygon drawing tool.
(For details, see Line, Circle, and Box, in the Draw menu, above).

DISTINCT
When Distinct (the default) is active, you may define starting points or
centerpoints of line, circles, and boxes anywhere on your workscreen.
(For a detailed description of Distinct, see Line, Polygon, Circle and
Box in the Draw menu, above).

CONNECTED
Connected works slightly differently for either Line, Circle, or Box.
When drawing lines with Connected active, the end points of thelines
remain connected with each set point. If drawing multiple circles, the
end point of the drawn circle (on the circumference) becomes the
starting point of the next circle.  When drawing multiple boxes,the end
point of the drawn box (the oposing corner) becomes the starting point
(corner) of the next box.  (For a detailed description of Connected, see
Line, Circle, and Box in the Draw menu, above).

CONCENTRIC
Concentric works the same with Box and Circle, but differentliy with
Line.  When drawing lines in Concentric mode, the lines become
'rays'.  The first point set is the center, and all remaining lines emanate
in rays from that point.  If drawing either boxes or circles, the first 
point set becomes the center for all remaining boxes or circles (for a
detailed description of Concentric, see Line, Circle, and Box in the
Draw menu, above).

FRAME

The Frame menu contains options which effect either asingle frame, or
a range of frames, as indicated by the framemode (To Frame, To Segment,
and To All).

UNDO [Help]
Select Undo to eliminate the last change made to your frame.  Selecting
Undo again restores the change.  Undo will only eliminate the last
change. Thus, if you draw a line, release the mouse button, then draw a
second line, you may Undo the second, but not the first line.  Undo
does not work with multiple-frame operations.
page 145-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

RESTORE [<-]
Restore is a more powerful form of Undo - it eliminates all changes
you've made to your current frame since you arrived at that frame.
Unlike Undo, you may not revers the procedure by selecting Restore
again - though you may reverse it by selecting Undo.  Also, you may
not restore work that was done on the frame prior to going to the frame,
nor may you restore work on a frame once you leave that frame.  (The
keyboard alternative for Restore is the backspace key to the left of the
[Del] key on your Amiga keyboard.  Throughout this manual, it will be
refered to as [Backspace]).

SEPARATE [-]
Separate replaces every occurence of a specific color in a frame, or
range of frames, with the currently selected color.  Separate is affected
by the frame mode settings: To Frame, To Segment, and To All.

Choose your color from the Color menu, left-click on Separate, then
click on the color you wish to change on the workscreen.  Separate will
replace all occurances of that color with the selected color. If the frame
mode is set to To Frame, only the colors in the displayed frame will be
affected; if the frame mode is set to either To Segment, or To All, the
colors in the entire range of frames selected will be affected (The 
keyboard alternative for Separate is the dash, or hyphen, and is located
immediately to the right of the zero (0) on the upper row of your
Amiga keyboard).

SEPARATE MANY [_]
Separate Many replaces every occurance of a range of colors in a frame,
or range of frames, with the currently selected color.  Separate Many is
affected by the frame mode settings: To Frame, To Segment, and To All.

This function works exactly the same as Separate, above, except that it
affects all colors that fall within the Color Range Bar (see Palette in
the Color section, below).  First, set the Color Range Bar in the Palette
or Color f/x menu to cover the range of colors you wish to change.
Next, select a color from the Color menu.  Set your frame mode to
cover the range of frames you wish to affect; finally, select Separate
Many.  All colors covered by the Color Range Bar will be changed to
the selected color.  If you are in To Frame mode you may undo the
effect by pressing [Hel].  If you are in a multiple-frame mode there is
no undo, so you will be alterted before you can proceed (the keyboard
alternative for Separate Many is the underscore, achieved by pressing
page 146-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

[Shift] and the dash key, located immediately to the right of the zero (0)
on the upper row of your Amiga keyboard).

BLUE PIC [(]
Blue Pic allows you to 'blue out' the images on your workscreen,
turning them into a temporary mask.  This allows you to make changes
to the original details, then eliminate the original and leave only your
changes (see Unblue Pic, below).  Its name is derived from the 'non-
repro blue' color used in making blueprints or offset printing.

Blue Pic is affected by the current frame mode.  If the frame mode is set
to To Frame, only the current frame will be affected; if set to To All
Blue Pic will blue out every frame in the animation; if the frame mode
is set to To Segment, Blue Pic will blue out all frames in the selected
range.  Blue Pic is primarily designed to be used in single frame mode.

You can use this feature (and/or Next Blue, below) to trace over
previous artwork and make incremental changes between frames.  In
ZOETROPE, Blue Pic knocks out the details of everything on your
workscreen with a single color (Color register #1 on your Color palette
- see Color, below).  In the default mode, the color in register #1 is a
dark blue.

NOTE:  In some paletes, color #1 may be difficult, if not impossible
to see.  During 'blueing' operations, you might want to temporarily
brighten the color in register #1 using the Palette menu, then later
restore the color to its original value.

UNBLUE PIC [)]
Unblue Pic erases anything 'blued' on the current frame by replacing it
with the background color (register #0).  It does not erase any changes
you've made to the original, previous blued frame.  Unblue Pic may be
used with the three frame mode settings.  You may erase the blue from
the displayed frame in To Frame, from a range of frames in To
Segment, or from all frames in To All.

NEXT BLUE [/]
Next Blue automatically takes whatever changes you've made to your
current frame, copies them to the next frame, unblues the masked image
from the original frame, then displays lthe next frame with the changes
blued.
page 147-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

For example: Frames #1 through #4 contain identical pictures of, say,
a mountain which was drawn previously.  In frame #1, you draw a red
and yellow flower, then select Next Blue.  Your red and yellow flower
is copied to frame #2 as a blue mask and ZOETROPE advances to
frame #2 so that you may continue.  You draw another red and yellow
flower in frame #2, then select Next Blue again.  The blue mask is
erased from frame #2, the newest red and yellow flower is copied to
frame #3 as a blue mask, and frame #3 is displayed so you may
continue.  If, at this point, you were to select Next Blue without having
made any further changes, the blue mask in frame #3 would be erased
and frame #4 would be displayed.

HISTORY PIC [H]
The following two functions are designed primarily to assist in hand
tweening of silhouette animations during the initial stage of animation.
When selected, History makes all colors from the previous frame
(excet color #0) apear deep blue in the current frame, all colors from
the following frame apear deep red, and any colors in the current frame
appear bright green.

To use History for hand tweening, insert a frame by clicking on Create
Frame/Next [F7], clear the new frame, then select history.  Paint your
new tweened dportion in green (History will change your current color to
green automatically).  Select Unhistory (see below) to remove all but
the new green.

To use History in forward animation, create several blank frames, then
make your first drawing in frame #1.  Go to the next frame, then select
History.  Draw your second drawing, select Unhistory, proceed to the
next frame, select History, etc.  Alternatively, you may omit selecting
Unhistory, in which case, the past frame images will accumulate with
each successive frame.

NOTE:  The History function alters several colors in the palette.  It
is designed to be used during the initial stages of animation, which
are normally done in silhouette.

UNHISTORY PIC [J]
Select Unhistory to remove the blue and red History images from the
current frame, leaving the current green image (see above).
page 148-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

GET CHANGES [*]
Get Changes grabs whatever changes you've made to your workscreen
(since you began work on that particular frame) and places them in the
clip buffer.  It is used to copy your changes, intact, from frame to
frame (see Next Changes, below).

NEXT CHANGES [+]
Next Changes is equivalent to Get Changes, above, with the additoin
that it automatically advances to the next frame, and pastes the contents
of the clip buffer (the changes from the previous frame) onto the new
frame.

NOTE:  Get Changes and Next Changes only sense the changes
you've made to a frame.  If, for example, you draw a new, white
circle overlapping a previously drawn white mountain, the piece of
the circle overlapping the mountain won't be placed in the clip
buffer, since that area was already white.

CLEAR PIC [Esc]
Clear Pic erases your workscreen(s) without deleting the actual frame
from memory (see Delete, below).  This command is affected by the To
frame, To Segment, and To All frame modes.  If you are in To Frame
mode, select Clear Pic and the image on the current frame will be
immediately erased; press [Help] to restore the image.  If you are in To
Segment or To All, select Clear Pic to erase the images over the chosen
range of frames.  Using Clear Pic over a range of frames cannot be
undone, so a requester will warn you before you may proceed.

DELETE [Del]
Delete removes frames from memory.  This command is affected by the
To Frame, and To Segment frame modes.  While in To Frame mode,
Delete snips out the single frame currently displayed then renumbers
your animation sequence from that frame forward.  (For example, if you
have four frames of animation, and you Delete frame #2, frames #3 and
#4 become #2 and #3, and your Animation Frame Counter displays a
total of three frames).  If you are in To Segment, select Delete to erase
the chosen range of frames.  Delete in To All mode works the same as 
Delete in To Frame.  If you wish to delete all your frames, select Kill
Seq from Menu.  Delete cannot be undone, so a requester will warn you
before you may proceed.
page 149-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

FLIP 5 [Enter]
Flip 5 is used to get a feel of the current animation segment you are
editing.  When you select Flip 5 (or press [Enter] on the numeric
keypad) five frames are played, beginning with the frame two positions
prior to the current frame, and ending with the frame two frames
following the current frame.  Thus, if you were on frame #6 when you
fselected Flip 5, frames #4 through #8 would be played before the
display returned to the original frame #6.  Flip 5 has no effect on the
'blue' functions or the 'changes' functions in the modes menu, and
Undo and Restore will work as if you had never left the current frame.

BRUSH

From the Brush menu, you may select the brush shapes that will be
used by the various tools in the Draw menu (see Draw, above).  There
are 16 predefined brush shapes in the Brush menu, 15 of which may be
redefined.  In addition, by selecting the Use Clip option, you may use
the contents of the clip buffer to draw with the Streak, Stipple, and
Airbrush tools in the Draw menu.

The default brush shape in ZOETROPE is called 'Brush One'.  It is a
single pixel in size, and represented by a cursor shaped like a hollow
cross.  This is the only brush that may not be redefined.  To select any
brush shape from the Brush menu, point to the shape you want, and
left-click. The mouse cursor will become the shape of the brush, and
subsequent brush-drawing operations will use that shape.

GET BRUSH [G]
Get Brush lets you redefine the existing brush shapes by 'grabbing' a
small portion of your workscreen.

First, draw a shape on the workscreen that you wish to use as your
brush (or decide on a shape that already exists).  Now, select a brush
shape that you wish to redefine (you may not use Brush One in the
upper-left corner). Next, click on Get Brush and the mouse cursor will
become a small box representing the maximum size of the brush
(16x16 pixels).  Move the box over the place on the screen where you
want to grab your brush shape, then left-click.  Your mouse cursor will
take on the shape you just captured, and the new shape will appear in
the Brush menu in place of the previously selected shape.

NOTE:  The design you capture from the screen must contain some
amount of color register #0 or your brush will appear solid.
page 150-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Register #0 becomes the transparent part of the brush, and all other
colors take on the current drawing color.  If you grab a portion of
the screen containing nothing but register #0, ZOETROPE will do
nothing - to avoid an invisible cursor.

USE CLIP [U]
Select Use Clip, and an asterisk will appear to its left signifying that it
is active.  While Use Clip is active, the Streak, Stipple, and Airbrush
tools in the Draw menu will use the contents of the cli buffer as a
brush. If the clip buffer is empty, Brush One will be used instead.
You may deactivate Use clip by reselecting it, or by selecting any of
the brush shapes from the brush menu.  While Use Clip is active, you
may change the cli buffer contents at any point, then continue to draw
with the new contents.

NOTE:  Because Use Clip uses multi-colored clip buffer contents,
Cycle mode will not work while Use Clip is active.  However, Fit
Colors from the Clip Menu will affect Use Clip, as will the X-Ray
Copy setting in the Modes menu.

COLOR

The Color menu offers 32 blocks of color (numbered 0-31), each
representing a color register.  Also available are a color Cycle mode, a
Palette menu (from which you may adjust any or all of the 32 colors in
your palette), and a Color f/x menu from which you may create special
color effects using ZOETROPE's multiple palette feature.

To select your current drawing color, point your cursor at the color
register block containing the desired hue and left-click.  When you point
at a color block it will be outlined.  The selected drawing color will be
indicated by a small cross in the center of its color block.  The selected
color will be used by all tools in the Draw menu (see Draw, above).
You may also select colors directly from the workscreen by placing the
mouse cursor over any color, and pressing [C].

Because ZOETROPE can use a different color palette for every frame of
animation, it might be a good idea to examine the basic color
architecture of the low-resolution Amiga display, before continuing
with the description of the Color menu options.

The Amiga hardware offers a total of 4096 colors in low resolution.
These colors are achieved by mixing all possible combinations of 16
page 151-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

levels of intensity of red, green, and blue (RBG).  16 x 16 x 16 = 4096.
However, there are only 32 color registers available at any one time, so
you have a total of only 32 colors to choose from for any one screen.

The three important terms to understand here are: color (or hue), color
register, and palette.  The relationship is:  Choose your colors (hues)
from among 4096, place them in any order in the 32 available color
registers, and the combination becomes your color palette.  Thus, when
we say ZOETROPE can use a different palette for each frame, we are
really saying the ZOETROPE can use a different combination of 32 out
of 4096 colors within each frame.

This relationship of colors to color register positions is important when
you begin juggling multiple-palette animations.  Keep in mind, when
reading this documentation, that descriptions of effects on colors often
really mean effects on color registers. For example: The palette in
frame #1 has color blue in color register #2.  In frame #2, color red is
in color register #2.  If you select blue and draw in frame #1, you get
blue.  Draw in frame #2 from the same register, however, and you get
red.

Some ZOETROPE functions (such as Fit Colors in the Clip menu)
adjust automatically for color register juggling.  But the best rule of
thumb is to be aware of the position of a color in the color palette; this
is your color register.  In the Color menu, the color registers are
numbered from 0 to 3 across the first row, followed by 4 to 7 across the
second row, and so on.  In the Palette and Color f/x menus, the color
registers are simply numbered from 0 to 31, left to right across the
screen.

CYCLE [!]
Cycle is a mode which lets you cycle through a selected range of colors
as yo are drawing.  Select Cycle to activate it, select it again to
deactivate it.  An asterisk will indicate that Cycle is active.
Cycle works differently with the various tools in the Draw menu:

Draw:		Creates a multi-colored line in the shape of the chosen
		brush.
Streak:		Same as draw, except that the multi-colored brush lines
		may be broken if the mouse is moved quickly enough.
Stipple:	Creates random, multi-colored brush shapes.
Airbrush:	Creates adjustable random, multi-colored brush shapes.
page 152-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Fill:		Each fill will be a different, solid color.
Line:		In new line will be a different color.
Polygon:		In filled mode, each new polygon will be a different color.
		In outline mode, each face of the polygon is a different
		color.
Circle:		Each new circle will be a different color.
Box:		Each new box will be a different color.
Text:		Each new letter will be a different color.

NOTE:  While Cycle is active, your current selected color will be ignored.
As soon as you select another color from the Color menu, Cycle will
automatically be deselected.

The range of colors that Cycle will display are selected with the Color
Range Bar in either the Palette menu or the Color f/x menu, described
below.  (See Shift, in the Color f/x menu, for another form of color
cycling).

PALETTE [@]
Select Palette to activate a submenu that lets you alter the colors in
your color palette, and adjust the range of colors affected by the Cycle
function.  You may exit the Palette menu at any time by pressing the
right mouse button, or you may move directly to the Color f/x menu
(described below) by clicking on the [%] symbol in the upper-right
corner (or by pressing [%]).

Any palette changes made while in single-frame mode may be cancelled
by clicking on Restore on the right side of the menu. (If you have 
exited to the main screen, but have not left the altered frame, yo may
click on Restore in the Frame menu, or press [Backspace] to cancel any
color (or rendering) changes.  Changes over a range of frames will not
take place until you exit the Palette menu.  Multiple frame changes
cannot be undone, so a requester will prompt you when you exit the
Palette menu.  Should you answer Yes to the first prompt, the changes
will be applied and you will exit the Palette menu.  If you answer No, a
page 153-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

second requester will appear asking if you want to ignore the changes to
the palete.  Answer Yes, and you will exit the Palette menu with all
changes cancelled; answer No, and you will be returned to the Palette
menu to continue editing your colors.

The top row of the Palette menu contains the Playback bar, which has
been described earlier.  Its functions are identical in the Palette menu
(see the Playback Bar).

NOTE:  Activating any of the Palette-Playback-Bar functions which
take you to another frame will bring up the 'Propogate changes..'
requester, if you are in a multiple-frame mode.

Color Palette Bar - The third bar in the Palette menu is the Color
Palette Bar which displays the 32 available colors in the palette of the
currently displayed frame.  Any color changes which are made, using
the other features in the Palette menu, will be reflected in the color
Bar.  You may select any color by pointing and clicking on it in the
Color Bar, or directly from the portion of the screen that shows above
the menu.  A single highlighted pixel will indicate the selected color.
Color registers in the Color Palette Bar are numbered from #0 on the
left, through #31 on the right  (The matching color registers in the
Color menu are numbered #0 - #3 across the top row, #4 - #7 across the
second row, etc.).

NOTE:  The bar at the far left of the Color Bar is color register #0,
and is always the background color. Color register #0 will also be
the transparent color in various of ZOETROPE's functions.  The
second color in the bar is color register #1, and is the 'bluing'
color used for the various options in the Frame menu. If you can't
see your 'blueing' color, adjust this color register.

Color Range Bar - Immediately below the Color Palette Bar is the
Color Range Bar, which may be adjusted in the same manner as the
Segment Range Bar. (See Segment Range Bar, in the Time menu), 
described earlier).  The Colro Range Bar indicates which color registers
will be affected by certain changes.  To adjust the Color Range Bar, drag
one of the dots to below a color in one end of the desired range, then
drag the second dot to below a color at the other end.  If you wish to
affect only one color, drag both dots to below a single color.  In some
cases, the direction of the bar is significant.  The diamond is the
beginning of the bar, and the 'x' shape is the end.
page 154-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Color Adjustment - There are two modes of color adjustment in
ZOETROPE: RGB and HLS.  RGB stands for Red, Green, Blue - the
three colors available on an RGB monitor which are blended in
intensity ot create the full possible range of 4096 colors.  HLS stands
for Hue, Luninence, Saturation, and is an alternative method of
adjusting colors, somewhat closer to that of pigment color mixing.

There are three steps to adjusting a color.  First, select the color you
wish to adjust by clicking on it in the Color Bar (or on screen); second,
select the adjustment mode by clicking on either RGB or HLS; finally,
drag the three slider bars to adjust the color.

RGB Mode:	RGB color adjustment is a matter of mixing the colors
		of Red, Green, and blue by altering the intensity level
		of the three colors. There are 16 levels of intensity,
		from 0 (no light), to 15 (full light).  Black, for
		example, would be 0-0-0, white would be 15-15-15, and
		pure red would be 15-0-0.  When RGB is selected as the
		adjustment mode, the slider bars represent (from top to
		bottom) Red, Green, and blue, and the sliders contain
		numbers indicating the intensity value of each color.
		To adjust the selected color to pure red, for example,
		you would slide the top bar all the way to the right, and
		slide the bottom two bars all the way to the left, so that
		the slide numbers read, from top to bottom: 15-0-0.

HLS Mode:	HLS color adjustment is excellent for making slight
		alterations to existing colors.  When HLS is selected as
		the adjustment mode, the sliders become vertical bars
		and represent (from top to bottom) Hue, Luminence,
		and Saturation.  Hue really means 'color', and may be
		thought of as the position of a color in the overall
		spectrum of colors - regardless of its intensity or
		saturation.  Luminance is the color's intensity, or how
		dark or light it is.  Saturation is the purity of a color -
		or how vivid it is.

Moving the Hue slider will change the hue of the selected color without
altering its saturation or intensity.  Moving the Luminence slider will
increase or decrease the intensity of the selected color without changing
its hue; at the left extreme, any color will become black, and at the
right extreme, any color will become white.  Moving the Saturation
slider will change the amount of saturation of a chosen color without
page 155-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

affecting its hue or intensity; at the left extreme, any color will become
some shade of grey.  A color modified with saturation might go from a
grey to a pastel-pink to a bright red.

Cut - Click on Cut to place the range of colors within the Color Range
Bar in a special buffer.  These may be pasted elsewhere within the
displayed palette, or in another palette - or range of palettes (see Paste,
below).

Paste - Paste places the colors previously cut into the buffer (see Cut,
above) at the positions in the palette indicated by the current position of
the Color Range Bar.  The direction and size of hte Range Bar affect the
pasted colors.  For example, if four colors (red, green, blue, yellow - in
that order) have been cut, and the Range Bar is reversed, the colors will
be pasted: yellow, blue, green, red.  If the Range Bar is shortened to
cover only two color blocks, yellow and blue will be pasted.  If the
Range Bar is lengthened to cover six blocks, only the four colors
previouslys cut will be pasted. Furthermore, once the ofur colors have
been cut, you may move to another frame palette and paste them into
it.  As with any changes in the Palete menu, if your frame mode is set
To Segment or To All, the palette changes will be applied to the
remaining frames when you exit the Palette menu.

Copy - Copy may be used to copy a color from one color register to
another. First, left-click on the Color Bar to select the source color that
you want to copy from; second, click on Copy; finally, click on the
destination color in the Color Bar that you wish the color copied to.
As soon as youclick on the destination color, it will become the same
color as the previously selected source color.

Restore - Click on Restore to cancel any changes made since you
entered the Palette menu. If you exit the Palette menu while in To
Frame mode, and have not left the currently displayed frame, you may
still restore your palette by clicking on Restore in the Frame menu (or
by pressing [Backspace]).

Use Clip - Use Clip uses the palette of whichever frame the clip buffer
last accessed, and applies it to the current palete. The entire palette of
the cliped frame is used, nomatter how small an area was clipped.
Use clip is particularly handy for copying whole palettes from one
frame to another.  Simply clip any portion of the screen in the source
frame, move to the destination frame, and select Use Clip.
page 156-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

Range - Click on Range, while RGB mode is active to average the
colors between the two end colors selected in the Color range Bar.  For
example, if the color at one end of the Color Range Bar is pure white
(15-15-15), and the color at the other end is pure black (0-0-0), clicking
on Range will give you a swath of intermediate colors ranging from
white, to light gray, to dark gray, to black.  Range will also work on
odd color combinations, such as purpose to green. While HLS mode is
active, click on Range to create a rainbow of colors.  The most effective
rainbows are created by using a wide range, and by placing identical
pure colors at both ends (such as 15-0-0; red).

COLOR f/x [%]
Select Color f/x and a submenu will appear that lets you apply certain
special effects on the palette of a frame, or paletes over a range of
frames, as set by the frame mode.  All options in the Color f/x menu
are aplied to those colors within the Color Range Bar.

You may exit the Color f/x menu at any time by pressing the right
mouse button, or you may move directly to the Palette menu by
clicking on the [@] symbol in the upper-right corner (or by pressing
[@].  Any changes made to a single frame may be cancelled by
clickingon Restore in the lower left corner of the menu.  If you have
exited to the main screen, buthave not left the altered frame, you may
click on Restore in the Frame menu, or press [Backspace] to cancel any
changes.  Changes over multiple frames cannot be undone, so a 
requester will prompt you to proceed.

The top tow rows of the Color f/x menu contain the Playback Bar, and
Segment Range Bar respectively.  Both of these have been described
earlier, their functions are identical in the Pixel f/x menu (see The
Playback Bar section, and Segment Range Bar in the Time section).
The one addition to the Segment Range Bar is the [@] symbol which
lets you move directliy to the Palette menu.
page 157-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

The third bar in the Color f/x menu is the Color Palette Bar from which
you may pick the current drawing color from among the 16 available.
A small pixel will indicate the chosen color.  You may also select a
color directly from the portion of the screen that shows above the
menu.  Color registers in the Color Palette Bar are numbered from #0
on the left, through #31 on the right.

Immediately below the Color Palette Bar is the Color Range Bar, which
may be adjusted in the same manner as the Segment Range Bar.  The
Color Range Bar indicates which color registers will be affected by the
Color f/x functions.  The direction of the bar (as indicated by the
diamond on one end and the 'x' shape on the other) only affects the Shift
options in the Color f/x menu.

The far left column of the Color f/x menu contains the three 'action'
comands: Preview, Render, and Restore.  These act upon the choices
which have been made in the remaining boxes of the menu.  Preview
gives you a preview of hte chosen effect without actually rendering it.
Render performs the actual effect upon the palette(s).  Restore will undo
any palette effect on a single frame.  Palette effects rendered over a range
of multiple frames cannot be restored; a requester will prompt you to
proceed.

The second column contains three modes which change the selection
boxes in the remainder of the menu.  At default, f/x is highlighted.
Click on Shift to activate the color shifting choices.  Click on Fade to
activate the color tinting and blending choices.

f/x - There are nine color effects which may be applied to one or more
palettes.  In all cases, the effect is aplied equally to all colors within
the Color Range Bar, reglardless of the Tween setting.  To effect a
alette, or palettes, click on the effect so that it is highlighted, then
click on Preview or Render.

Normal:		Restores the selected colors to the default ZOETROPE
		palette.
Inverse:	Reverses the RGB values.  For examle, a bright green (0-
		15-0) will inverse to a bright purple (15-0-15).
Mono:		Changes the indicated colors to shades of grey, based on the
		relative intensity value of each hue.  In effect, a color 
		picture will look like a black and white snapshot.
Xerox:		Most effective when used over the entire color range -
		particularly when defocused, digitized picture.  Xerox turns
page 158-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

		each color either black or white, based upon the luminence
		value of its combined RGB values.  Any luminence value
		greater than 30 becomes white, the rest become black.
		Luminence value is the result of the following formula:
		R+B+(2*G)=0 to 60.
Metal:		The same as Xerox, except the boundary of the luminence
		value is split by four: 0-14 - black; 15-29 - white, 30-44 -
		black, 45-59 - white.
Chrome:		The same as Xerox and Metal, except the luminence
		boundary is split by eight.
Red:		Zeros out the green and blue RGB values of the selected
		colors so that only the existing red intensity remains.  If
		there was no red in the color, the resulting color will be
		black.
Green:		Zeros out the red and blue RGB values of the selected
		colors so that only the existing Green intensity remains.  If
		there was no green in the color, the resulting color will be
		black.
Blue:		Zeros out the red and green RGB values of the selected
		colors so that only the existing blue intensity remains.  If
		there was no blue in the color, the resulting color will be
		black.

Shift - The Shift otions let you shift a range of colors in either
direction within the palette, based on the placement and direction of the
Color Range Bar.  Shifts over multiple frames, using To Segment or
To All, create color cycling animation effects.  When Shift is selected,
the right side of the menu offers two types of shift: FPSh (Frames Per
Shift), and ShOT (Shift Over Time).  Both are affected by the Tween
status.  To accomplish the shift, highlight the desired form of shift,
adjust the slider bar, then click on Preview or Render.

A single 'shift' is defined as a one-register move to the right or the left.
With each shift, the order of the colors is maintained, and they 'wrap'
so that the first color becomes the second, and the last color becomes 
the first.

FPSh:		With Tween set to on, Frames Per Shift shifts the colors
		within the Color Range Bar (in the direction indicated by the
		bar) once every n frames.  With Tween set to off, Frames
		Per Shift shifts the colors within the Color Range Bar, in
		the direction indicated by the bar, n places - once - over all
		frames indicated by the frame mode. In both cases, n is the
page 159-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

		number set by the slide bar.  Thus, in the first instance, if
		the slide bar were set to [2], and Tween were on, the colors
		would shift by one color every two frames.
ShOT:		With Tween set to on, Shift Over Time shifts the colors
		within the Color Range Bar (in the direction indicated by the
		bar) a total of n times over the range of frames indicated by
		the frame mode (where n is the number set by the slide
		bars).  Thus, if the slide bar were set to [8], eight single
		shifts would occur, spread equally over whatever number of
		frames in the segment.  ShOT with Tween set to off is
		identical to FPSh with Tween off (see above).

Fade - Select Fade to access the color Tint and Blend options. Once the
Tint or Blend options have been set, click on Preview or Render to
activate.

Tint:		Tint applies a percentage of the value of the current drawing
		color to the colors within the Color Range Bar (regardless of
		the direction of the bar).  White, for example, wil pale the
		chosen colors, whereas black will darken them. With Tween
		set to on, the tint will be applied gradually over the range of
		frames indicated by the framemode.  With Tween set to off,
		the ful tint will be applied equally over all frames.  The
		percentage of tint is set with the Max Tinting slide bar.
		(Tint can be used to create fades: Set Max Tinting
		percentage to 100%, select black in the palette, and set the
		Color Range Bar to include all colors.  Set the frame mode
		to To Segment and select the range of frames you with to
		fade out.  You can accomplish a fade by reversing the
		direction of the Segment Range Bar).

Blend:		This option is only effective over a range of frames.  Blend
		tweens the colors (within the Color Range Bar) of the first
		frame palette with those of the last frame palette - regard-
		less of the Tween setting.  Thus, given identical, colorful
		palettes in 19 out of 20 frames, and a monochrome palette
		in frame #20, Blend will create a gradual fade from color to
		greys.

NOTE:  The Max Timing slide bar has no effect on the Blend option.
page 160-------------------------------------ZOETROPE REFERENCE SECTION

We've reached the end of our documentation.  We hope you enjoy using
ZOETROPE.  As with all our products, we're very interested to see the
results of your efforts.  Please let us know if you discover new
techniques.

Jim Kent is constantliy looking for ways to improve his program.
Current plans include music nd digitized sound effects, a whole new
toolbox of drawing tools, additional APM f/x, and more.  We need
feedback if we're going to develop the program you are looking for.
Send us a 'dream sheet'.  Give us a list of items you'd like to see 
added to ZOETROPE.  List your suggestions in order of importance and
send them to:
                    MORE ZOETROPE
		    Product Development Dept.
		    Antic Software
		    544 Second Street
		    San Francisco, CA  94107
page i -----------------------------------APPENDIX A - MEMORY CONSERVATION

ZOETROPE can store u pto 4096 frmes in RAM memory, with pixel-
level accuracy and real-time playback - all through the magic of a delta
compression scheme which only stores the differences between frames.

Normally, delta compression lets you work on much longer animations
than if you were using a 'page flipper' package where each frame would
take up 40K.  But in the worst case (digitized data is particularly bad)
Zoetrope will also take 40K per frame.  Sooner or later, (sooner if your
Amiga has one-megabyte of RAM) you will see an 'Out of Memory'
alert.  The easiest, but most expensive, solution is to buy more
memory for your Amiga. But here are a few tips that will help you get
the most out of the memory you already have:

1.  Avoid detailed scrolling backwards.
2.  When possible, use color registers #1, #2, #4, #8, or #16 for any
    moving images.
3.  Never use a 'Separate' or 'Fill' action where you could get the
    same effect by changing the color palette.
4.  Remember that color palette and color effects are the least memory
    intensive type of animation.
5.  With digitized data a 'defocus all' followed by an 'apm seq reduce
    50% no tween' often roduces vidio appearing to have all the detail
    of the original, but using 1/4 of the memory.
6.  Moving parts made up of a solid color take up less memory than
    moving patterns.
7.  Moving parts using only color registers #0, #1, #2, and #3 will
    only take up 40% of the space of moving parts using color register
    #31 (if they're both moving over a color 0 background).
page ii -----------------------------------APPENDIX A - MEMORY CONSERVATION

Once you have run out of memory, the best thing to do is save your
animation in two or more pieces via 'save segment', and work on the
ieces separately.  Sometimes this is inconvenient, or you're working
on a file too large to fit into memory to begin with.  For this urose
there's a 'Patch' option in the Load/Save menu.  Large files may be
loaded a piece at a time via Patch.  You may even edit a patch in the
middle of a file and save it back out, or age through a file.  Unless
your disks are faster than mine, though, you'll want to work on files
that fit in RAM whenever possible.
page iii ----------------------------------APPENDIX B - ZOEPLAY & QUICKRIF

ZOEPLAY and QUICKRIF are dislay programs for .rif file animations.
Both these programs may be freely distributed to friends and user groups,
and uploaded or downloaded via BBS or commercial online services.  However,
Jim Kent owns the copywright on both programs - they are NOT in the
public domain, and they are NOT to be sold.

ZOEPLAY
ZOEPLAY is the easiest to use of the two animation display programs.
After double-clicking on its icon, a blank screen, cursor, and abbreviated
PlayBack Bar will appear.  Hold down the right mouse button to display
the 'Zoeplay' menu.

Select Load to load any .rif file, using the ZOETROPE file selector.
The animation will be loaded into memory and each frame displayed
during the load.

Select Play to play the animation.  Hold down the left mouse button to
speed up the playback.  Press the right mouse button, or any key, to
halt the playback.

The Status display shows the total number of frames in memory, and
the current memory usage.  CHIP free is the total bytes available in
CHIP memory, followed by the largest contiguous block of CHIP
memory.  FAST free is the total bytes available of FAST memory,
followed by the largest contiguous block of FAST memory.

Select Speed to adjust the playback rate with the slider bar.
page iv ----------------------------------APPENDIX B - ZOEPLAY & QUICKRIF

Select ing ong to activate ping-pong playback mode.  An asterisk
will appear next to the menu selection signifying that Ping-Pong is
active.

Select Quit to return to the workbench.

The Playback Bar at the bottom of the screen works the same way as
the main ZOETROPE Playback Bar, except there are no frame creation
icons.  Fromleft to right are: fast-reverse, reverse, move one frame left,
frame slider bar, move one frame right, forward, and fast forward.

QUICKRIF
QUICKRIF is a short program designed to be run from within the Amiga CLI.
As a result, it has no file icon, but can be found by typing DIR from
the CLI prompt.  It is most useful for making self-running demos, but
some knowledge of the CLI is necessary to successfully operate the program.

QUICKRIF uses a different and much denser memory delta scheme than
ZOEPLAY and ZOETROPE.  Animations will load much faster, but they
may not replay as smoothly.  You tend to get a jerk as things loop
from the last to the first frame in particular.

The following commands may be entered directly at the CLI prompt, or
they may be added to your s:Startup-Sequence file for auto-booting.
(See your Amiga User's Manual for details on creating Startup-Sequence
'execute' files).

To play once forward through an animation file called, say
MyCartoon.rif, type:

	quickrif MyCartoon.rif

To play the same file 100 times

	quickrif 100 MyCartoon.rif

To play multiple files sequentially

	quickrif 1 title.rif 10 demo.rif 1 credits.rif

(Plays title.rif once, then demo.rif 10 times, then credits.rif once)
page v  ----------------------------------APPENDIX B - ZOEPLAY & QUICKRIF

To play multiple files alternatively

	quickrif 5 a.rif + b.rif + c.rif

(Loads a.rif, b.rif and c.rif into memory, and plays them, spliced
together, five times).

QUICKRIF has been included primarily as an example for programmers,
its source code is available on the ZOETROPE disk.  See the RIF
section of the following appendix for details.
page vii ---------------------------APPENDIX C - FILE FORMATS & CONVERSIONS

Zoetrope uses five different types of files directly, and several others
may be converted to ZOETROPE format with the utility programs on the
ZOETROPE disk.

The directly accessible ZOETROPE file tyes include the main animation
file, .rif, which is used to store complete video sequences.
ZOETROPE can also use single-frame IFF picture files, and brush (.win)
and color (.col) files.  There's also a file type (.apm) for saving
the settings of the APM f/x menu.

Using the two file utilities on your ZOETROPE disk, you may convert
Aegis Animator .script files, Videoscape 3D and Video Titler .anim
files, CYBER PAINT (Atari ST) .SEQ files, and non-320x200 .rif
files (from Live!) into 320x200 .rif files.

NOTE:  More file formats may be added at a later date.  Look for any 
README files on your ZOETROPE disks for the latest update information.

ANITOZOE
ANTIOZOE converts Aegis Animator .script files to ZOETROPE .rif
files.  Double click on the ANITOZOE icon. When the blank screen
appears, hold down the right mouse button to dislay the menu bar,
labelled 'AntiToZoe'.  While still pressing the right button, point to
AntiToZoe to dislay the menu.  Select Load Script, then select the
Aegis Animator script file that you wish converted.
page viii ---------------------------APPENDIX C - FILE FORMATS & CONVERSIONS

The first frame of the animation will be displayed.  At this point, you
may immediately create a .rif file by selecting Save Rif, entering a new
filename in the file selector, and clicking on OK.

WARNING:  If you are using one disk drive, your disk must have enough
room for both the original as well as the new animation file.
No matter how many drives you se, YOU MUST LEAVE THE
DISKS IN THE DRIVE DURING THE CONVERSION.  You must also leave the
disks in the drive during playback (see below).

Once the initial frame of an animation is displayed,the following
options are available:

You may play the animation in a continuous loop by selecting Play
from the menu.  Halt the animation at any point by pressing any key or
button.

Select Time to alter either the playback speed of the script animation or
of the resultant .rif animation.  Two slider bars will appear.  The upper
bar, labeled 'Ani Speed', alters the speed of the script file playback,
based on the Aegis Animator system (the higher the number, the faster
the rate).  This adjustment will noticeably change the playback within
ANITOZOE.

The lower slider sets the ZOETROPE rate at which the .rif file will be
saved (the higher the number, the slower the rate).  This adjustment
will not be noceable during playback from within ANITOZOE, but
will affect the smoothness of the animation (and the total number of
frames used) from within ZOETROPE. Thus, a very slow Ani Speed
combined with a very fast Zoe Speed creates the smoothest possible
animation in ZOETROPE, but uses the greatest number of frames.

The Status display shows current memory usage.  CHIP free is the total
bytes available in CHIP memory, followed by largest contiguous
block of CHIP memory.  FAST free is the total bytes available of
FAST memory, followed by the largest contiguous block of FAST
memory.

Select Quit to return to the Workbench.
page ix ---------------------------APPENDIX C - FILE FORMATS & CONVERSIONS

CROPPER
CROPPER converts ANIM (VideoScape 3D, Video Titler) files,
CYBER PAINT (Atari ST) .SEQ files, and non-320x200 .rif files
(from Live!) into 320x200 .rif files.  It can also save out .rif files as
ANIM or Aegis Animator .script files.

To operate CROPPER, double-click on the CROPPER icon.  Hold
down the right mouse button to dislay the two menus: File and Crop.
Select Load from the file menu, then select the file you wish to
convert.  This may be any of the file types mentioned above; CROPPER
will automatically identify the chosen file type.

The first frame of the animation will be displayed.  At this point, you
may immediately convert the file by selecting Save Rif, Save Anim, or
Save Script in the File menu, entering a new filename in the file
selector, and clicking on OK.

WARNING:  If you are using one disk drive, your disk must have enough
room for both the original as well as the new animation file.
No matter how many drives you se, YOU MUST LEAVE THE
DISKS IN THE DRIVE DURING THE CONVERSION.  You must also leave the
disks in the drive during playback (see below).

Once the initial frame of an animation is displayed, the following
options are available:

You may move to the next frame of the animation by selecting Next
Frame from the File menu.

You may play the animation by selecting Play from the File menu.
Playback will be jerky and somewhat slow since each frame of the
animation is loaded from disk.  You may halt the animationat any 
point by pressing any key or button.

If you are converting an anim file that is a resolution other than
320x200, the entire screen will not be visible on your monitor, and the
aspect ratio (X to Y ratio) may be wrong.  You may use the options in
the Crop menu to correct this.

Select Center to center an oversized animation within the 'window' of
your monitor screen.  Select Upper Left to place the monitor 'window'
at the upper left corner of an oversized animation.  Or, you may select
Mouse Move, and drag the animation to any position.
page x ---------------------------APPENDIX C - FILE FORMATS & CONVERSIONS

Select Half Width to shrink the width of an oversized animation to fit
within the width of the monitor display.  Select Half Height to shrink
the Height of an oversized animation to fit within the height of the
monitor display.

The Status display shows current memory usage.  CHIP free is the total
bytes available in CHIP memory, followed by largest contiguous
block of CHIP memory.  FAST free is the total bytes available of
FAST memory, followed by the largest contiguous block of FAST
memory.

Select Quit to return to the Workbench.

RIF FILES
The following is a brief description of the .rif file format.  For 
programmers, source code in C nad assembler, to read and play .rif files,
is provided on your ZOETROPE disk in Quickrif.arc.  This is the full
source to the quickrif utility compressed with the arc program (arc is
avilable at most Amig users groups, bulletin boards, and many Amiga
dealers).

Rif files are a highly compressed form of picture storage capable of real-
time forward-only decompression.  (Since ZOETROPE needs to ping-pong
it stores pictures in RAM differently).  Rif files are used by the
Live! real time video digitizer as well.

ZOETROPE rif files are composed of three parts.  First there is a 64-
byte header starting with the ASCII letters RIFF.  This structure
contains the seed, length of file, frame count, and other useful bits.  A
C declaration of the structure is in vcomp.h.  The second part is a list
of offsets to each frame from the beginning of the file.  The last part is
composed of the frames themselves.  Each frame has a 56 byte header,
64 bytes of color map, followed by the compressed pixel imagery one
bit-plane at a time.

The first frame of a .rif is compressed using a vertical byte-run-length
compression scheme.  This, typically, is 30% smaller than the IFF
ILBM horizontal byte-run-length scheme.  Subsequent frames are also
vertically run-length encoded, but runs which are the same from frame
to frame are skipped entirely.  The interesting source code for this is in
unvscomp.asm.

		            Finally, The End...

                            Typed in by EAST COAST
                            for M.A.A.D.
